Chapter 1.

The moment she opened the kitchen door, the smell of various ingredients and hot steam hit her. The maids were busy preparing lunch, not even having time to look back at who opened the door.
To be honest, there was no need to look back.

Because it was an ordinary maid who stepped into the kitchen, where the sound of knives and oil sizzled. A black maid’s uniform brushed the tip of her knees, a spotless white apron, and plain dark brown hair. It was a look as common as a crystal chandelier in the Winston mansion.

The maid picked up a wooden tray, a soup plate and a spoon from the cupboard. She went to the cupboard lined with colorful canned goods and picked up a white loaf and two boiled eggs from the basket, when someone spoke to her.

“Are the guests from the annex still there?”

The chef, Mrs. Appleby, clicked her tongue as she took the freshly baked meat pie out of the oven. The young maid, as usual, pretended to be sullen and pouted her lower lip slightly.

“That’s right. Still, I think they might go out today.”

“Tsk, tsk. Sally, you are really having a hard time.”

Mrs. Appleby placed the meat pie on a large table in the middle of the kitchen and held out her empty hand to the maid named Sally.

“Give it to me.”

The woman who took the empty soup bowl opened the large pot next to the stove, and when it had cooled down, she filled it with clam soup and placed it on Sally’s tray. The only thing floating in the bowl was crumpled scraps of ingredients.

“I can’t believe you’re doing that tough job without Ethel alone.”

Ethel was a middle-aged maid who, up until a month ago, was in charge of the ‘private room’ in the basement of the annex with Sally. She now dreamed of making a fortune with her husband, a gambler, and would be boarding on a ship heading to a new continent.

Although she felt sorry for Sally when she was left alone with the disgusting and reluctant job of all the employees of the Winston mansion, she never said she would help. So, Sally was relieved.

“Speak well to Mrs. Belmore—either she gets another person or gives you a higher salary.”

“Yes, I should see it.”

But, Sally was never going to get such a favor from the maid chief.

She then grabbed the tray and walked out the side door to the west of the mansion. A gravel path continued through the neatly mowed green grass. Before long, the annex, which seemed only small, became so close that the sharp barbed wire on the wall was clearly visible.

In the clear spring of cherry blossom leaves, the annex alone exuded the gloomy energy of winter. It was no wonder. It was like a haunted house over there, where screams resounded through the basement.

Sally wet her dry lips and raised the corners of her lips as she saw the soldiers standing guard at the front door of the outhouse.

“Hello, Martin.”

“Hello, Sally.”

The soldier she saw every day opened the iron door straight away without asking anything.

Sally walked slowly to the entrance to the annex, squinting every nook and cranny of the front yard. There was no car of the mansion’s owner, Captain Winston. It meant he hadn’t returned from the unit yet.

Great.

She went straight into the building and went down to the basement. She walked along the hallway to the left as if she was accustomed to it. The soldier who stood guarding the iron door in the middle of the hallway opened the door as soon as he saw Sally.

The strict security was threefold. In other words, there is one more group left to go through.

As she turned the corner to the right, two soldiers were sitting on chairs, chatting.

“Hello.”

“Hello, Sally.”

Across from the soldier, a black and crude iron gate was firmly locked. It was a place that exuded an aura that was far from the luxurious mansion annex.

“Did you two have dinner?”

Sally walked over to the soldiers and smiled, curling the corners of her eyes.

“No, we haven’t eaten yet”

The Private, who had the name ‘Fred Smith’ on his chest, received a squinting eye from the Corporal sitting next to him.

“I’ll get it from the main building soon.”

At the time of full hunger, a talk about a meal and the smell of soup wafted through, so there was no one who wouldn’t bite the bait.

“What’s on the menu today, Sally?”

“It’s meat pie. As soon as I opened the kitchen door, I could smell the fragrant smell. I was dripping with saliva.”

The Corporal’s hazy eyes flashed for an instant.

“Ah If I’m late again this time, won’t there be none?”

The Private, who had not yet taken off his boyish appearance, glanced at the Corporal and hinted. Then, he immediately gave Sally a daunting gaze. His eyes were like a puppy asking for praise, though she pretended not to see it and stared only at the Corporal’s face.

“Damn it I’m tired of consommé soup”

Those who did not know would say that a man who was tired of high-end cuisine knew nothing of gratitude.

Still, if they give a strong young man a soup with only chicken meatballs and a few pieces of vegetables for lunch, he couldn’t help but complain.

The practice of generously providing expensive meals to ordinary soldiers who were not officers was in fact rooted in the vanity and coldness of Mrs. Winston, and there was no reason to be grateful for Sally.

“I don’t think she cooked a lot You should go to the dining room quickly before it’s too late. I will lock the door.”

The Corporal made a troubled face as Sally shifted the tray into one of her hands and pulled a black key out of her pocket.

“The captain said I shouldn’t let Sally in alone”

There was a hint with just a tap from the blurry words that it would tilt to one side.

At that, Sally pricked her eyebrows as if she didn’t mind it, and she smiled.

“It’s okay. I don’t think the guest is violent. I’ll just leave the tray and bring the laundry and come out right away. Greg is out there as well.”

She glanced at the soldier who was guarding the iron gate over the corner. Only then did the Corporal pretend to reluctantly get up.

“Smith, let’s go.”

As the two men disappeared around the corner, Sally took the key to the heavy iron door. With a squeak, the door let out a sharp creak and retreated inside. The smell of fishy blood flowed out of the gap two spans wide.

Sally wet her dry lips again and placed her hand into the darkened room.

She immediately grabbed her switch in her hand. The next moment, all four lights turned on at the same time with a click, but the room didn’t get very bright. It was because the walls, as well as the floor and ceiling, were all black.

As the lights turned on, a middle-aged man crouching on a narrow bed on one wall trembled. Sally quickly entered the ‘private room,’ and she closed the door.

“Uncle, it’s me.”

The ‘guest in the private room,’ who had been hardening his whole body, let out a long sigh and relaxed. It was still blinding. Even though he hasn’t seen Sally’s face, he must have heard her voice.

The man’s appearance was no joke. She had seen countless times where lively faces dry and twisted like a corpse the moment they stepped into this room.

However, her heart hurt even more since the face was the village uncle she had known since childhood.

“I brought you food.”

She walked over to the little table at the foot of the bed.

Meanwhile, the man tried to get his body up, although he couldn’t even get up and groaned in pain. Placing the tray on the table, she quickly approached the man. Sally didn’t say anything while she supported him and sat him in the chair in front of the table.

She knew now because she had been through it many times

She knew that she could be a catalyst for cheap consolation to a person who was enduring all kinds of terrible torture with a thread of mind and stamina.

When she silently gave the spoon to him, she then began to peel the hard-boiled egg. The man couldn’t even do the simple task of cracking eggshells because he had all his nails pulled out.

“What happened last night? Last night there was a party in the main building, and I was called”

“Nothing, cough, cough.”

As the man started coughing, Sally poured water into a cup from the kettle on the table. He was still lucky, though because he was allowed one meal a day and water. There were times when they didn’t even give them water, let alone food.

His dry throat clenched, and the cough was quelled. Sally quickly pulled a vial out of her pocket before he picked up the spoon again.

“Eat this.”

It was an analgesic potion with morphine. As the man opened his mouth as if waiting, Sally let a drop of painkiller into his mouth.

She hid the vial again in her pocket and cracked the eggs. In the meantime, she kept talking to the man busy eating the soup. There was no time to wait until the meal was finished since they had to finish the conversation quickly before someone came in.

“You didn’t say anything at all, right?”

“.”

The man stopped his spoon and raised his head. There was fierce contempt in his eyes.

This happens every time.

Sally’s question to her colleague, who had been tortured for several days, was something she should be unwilling to ask. Was she interrogating? Was she monitoring? They could even make such an illusion.

Nonetheless, she couldn’t help it either. If there was any leaked information, she needed to know it as soon as possible to deal with it. It could endanger not only the uncle, but also the lives of others.

“You know you have to be honest with me, right?”

“Nothing.”

The man stared at Sally for a long time before bowing his head to the bowl of soup and spitting out the answer.

“I think we will move around today. I’ll send someone as soon as I find out where it is. So, never open your mouth and be patient. You know? People in the rescue team don’t want to know about failure”

It was the time when she poured out her last request.

Chapter 2.

The sound of blunt footsteps came from behind the torture chamber door. However, the time was too short for the two soldiers to have finished eating.

At that, Sally stopped and hurried to the bed. As she pulled off one side of the duvet stained with blood, the door swung open.

“Sally Bristol, what are you doing here?”

A voice that was as slow and soft as feathers fell sharply in her spine.

Why did Captain Winston return now, of all time?

Sally took the loosely removed duvet in her arms and looked back slowly. A young private was holding the wide-open door in a rigid posture.

A man with a light gray trench coat over his shoulders walked in between them without hesitation. Under the fluttering coat, a black officer’s uniform was hung straight, as if decorated with colorful medals.

Every time the medals were added one by one, she got sick of it. Because the stench of blood seemed to vibrate from the medal.

“Hello, Captain. I was giving lunch to the guests and packing up the laundry.”

She mixed a little bit of a curious look on her innocent face as though she didn’t know anything.

“You alone?”

“Yeah. Aunt Ethel quit a month ago”

“Ha”

Although Winston raised his lips softly and let out a low laugh, his ice-cold eyes were not smiling at all.

Facing him like that, Sally also had the urge to moisten her parched lips, but she resisted. It was because the other person would notice that she was nervous.

‘Has he not noticed already? There are many excuses to give if you ask me what kind of conversation we had’

As she rushed to plan all sorts of things inside her, she tilted her head, blinking her eyes and pretending to be puzzled on the outside.

Winston stood between the man at the table and her.

Sally felt a sense of intimidation as if she was facing a wall because of his large height and body.

He stared down at the man who had already begun shaking his hands for a moment with cold eyes and then took off his sharp look. His outstretched fingers that were as sharp as his eyes neatly swept over the blonde hair.

“I know that, Sally. You know that’s not what I mean.”

He pressed Sally lightly with a tone that seemed to appeal to a lover before suddenly turning around. The tip of a riding whip in his hand, clad in black leather gloves, pointed to the second lieutenant, who looked like his lieutenant.

“Campbell, get the men guarding the door right now.”

A terrifyingly low voice.

At that moment, in Sally’s head, the hallucination of that whip slashing through the air and tearing her flesh rang out.

She was standing like a prisoner against a wall with the duvet in her arms.

As Winston waited for the men, he glanced around as if seeing the torture chamber for the first time. Her spine shuddered as he lifted the chain hanging from Sally’s side and put it playfully in front of her neck.

If only she brought ‘it’ though she didn’t

“Captain, I have brought him.”

Sally sighed inside. She didn’t know whether she was relieved or frustrated.

The lips of the two soldiers glistened with grease as though they had been dragged in the midst of a meal. The Corporal took a salute position with a tense face. Meanwhile, the hand on his forehead was trembling slightly.

“Captain, did you call?”

“Right, why did I call you? Guess.”

Uttering lightly as if he was treating a friend, but no one took the situation lightly.

The Corporal’s eyes darted around the torture chamber with anxious eyes. What did he do wrong? The answer must be in this room. The moment he saw the maid who was standing on the wall, one step away from the Captain, he found the answer.

‘She said she’ll come in and out quickly, so why is she still here?’

He chewed the swear words to himself.

“You, you told me not to let the maid in alone.”

“Correct.”

Winston’s eyebrows curled loosely, but the tension in the torture chamber only grew tighter.

Swish. Swish.

The whip in his right hand sharply cut through the chilly air and lightly struck his left palm. Each time, the two soldiers trembled as if they had been hit.

“You have ears to listen to my instructions, though you don’t seem to understand because you don’t have a brain?”

“No, no—”

“Then, let me tell you why I told you not to let my Miss Sally Bristol in alone.”

Sally’s stomach churned.

Why did she become ‘Miss Sally Bristol’? It wasn’t just because of the overly gentlemanly title or an overly rude name.

The next moment, Winston came closer to her side and even grabbed her shoulder. From the place his hand touched to the waist of her back, her hairs stood upright. If it was another maid, how would they act?

Sally rolled her head quickly, biting her lower lip and placing a cold hand on one of her cheeks.

‘I hope that pretending to be shy works.’

She pretended not to see Private Fred Smith’s agitated eyes.

“That bastard”

The Corporal glanced at the man, who had hardened like a piece of wood in front of the table on the other side of the room, and looked again at the Captain politely.

“He said he might go into heat and could attack Sally.”

Sally? In heat? He didn’t even have the strength to lift a spoon—

Besides, Sally was a dull woman. Even though she looked pretty, she had no corners to arouse the lustful curiosity of a man. So therefore, the reason didn’t make sense.

Nonetheless, if the superior said so, it could not be helped.

“Sally, did you hear that?”

Winston finally took his hand from Sally’s shoulder. Though just as he was about to relax, his fingertips lifted the tip of her chin.

“This place is dangerous for a feeble lady.”

“Yes, I will be careful.”

Although she gave the answer he wanted right away, but he didn’t let go of her chin. He tilted her head at an angle as if kissing, as he gazed down at Sally.

‘You are more dangerous to me.’

This time she had to wet her parched lips.

As the tip of her tongue brushed against her lower lip, Winston wrinkled his brow slightly and pulled his hand from the tip of her chin.

“Did you guys hear it, too?”

He approached the soldiers who broke the rules.

“This place. Is dangerous. For feeble Sally.”

Every time he paused his words, the angular tips on the tip of the slender and flexible riding-whip pierced the soldiers’ stomach.

His voice gradually grew as fierce as the roar of an angry lion.

A cold sweat ran down Sally’s back. She was friends with Fred’s third older sister. Besides, she had been watching him since he was a baby, so she was scared that Fred, like a real younger brother, would be severely punished.

Sally bowed her head.

Soon, her shoulders trembled as she curled up like a frightened rabbit as tears fell from her big eyes.

“I’m, I’m sorry It’s because I came in. So, I will take the punishment for them, Captain.”

Quietly, she grabbed the hem of his trench coat and shook it.

“A man becomes a fool when a woman cries.”

That was what her mother said.

However, she said that it doesn’t work if she uses it too often, so she told her to do it in moderation.

Was he a man who couldn’t help but pay attention? Winston stopped the whip that had stabbed Fred in the chest, and he walked over to Sally.

“Sally, you don’t have to do this again. Huh? got it?”

“Sniff, yes”

She tried to wipe away the false tears with her sleeve, but he stopped them. Winston’s hand wrapped around her chin. Shortly, the straight-folded handkerchief gently pressed each tear print to dry it.

Everyone’s eyes widened at the not cold-blooded behavior. Their eyes widened with surprise as he stared down at the handkerchief drenched with the maid’s tears for a moment and then put it in the pocket of his jacket.

He was the one who threw the handkerchief on the floor once he had used it. Whereas this, was nothing else but a handkerchief soaked in bodily fluids of a lowly maid.

“Leave the meal outside from now on.”

“Yes, I will”

It was a moment when Sally was able to let her guard down with a voice that was as friendly as if teasing a child. Winston’s hand resting on her chin stopped in mid-air before he picked up the thumb of her left hand. His soft eyes set sharp in an instant.

Sally’s blood became cold as she followed his gaze.

A small piece of eggshell stuck under her fingernail.

He grinned at the pile of eggshells neatly laid out in front of the spy. His eyes were not smiling at all.

Winston’s close-cut fingernails dug under hers. The nails that had entered deep as if they were going to dig through her flesh were brutally twisted.

Sally held back a groan from the pain that crushed her delicate flesh. It was a bad habit for her to endure even when she didn’t need to because the training to endure the pain of torture was ingrained into her body.

Winston silently glanced down at the white shards adhering to the tip of his fingernails and tossed them off.

Cold words flew over her head along with the shells.

“Sally, you’re so kind that it bothers me.”

Chapter 3

While cleaning the annex office, tenacious gazes ran over Sally’s body. It felt like a cheap nylon brush was running through her body. The gaze became stinging for a moment as if she felt itchy from time to time.

Without realizing it, she shuddered.

“Captain, if I’m getting in the way, should I clean up later?”

She turned back and asked politely. Winston had just turned his gaze to the papers on his desk.

The tip of a cigar, sandwiched between his fingers, was chewed. He had a golden lighter in his other hand as though he had forgotten to light it.

“No, go ahead. I do my job, you do yours.”

Saying so, he looked down at the paperwork, spitting out the answer from the script in Sally’s head. She shouldn’t leave anyway, so she turned her back and moved the mop. The end of the chewed-up cigar kept running through her mind.

‘Did he imagine chewing something while looking at me?’

Suddenly, the tip of her chest hidden in the thin bra stung and tingled.

Dirty monarchy pig

Even though she wanted to leave right away, she couldn’t. It was because there was an important task left. What was reassuring was the fact that the two soldiers standing in front of the door were like statues.

She got up on the low chair and slowly wiped the bookshelf. Her calf, which got closer to his eye level, kept tickling.

‘Should I rather get rid of carpet stains on the back of the sofa?’

While she was thinking, someone knocked on the door.

With Winston’s permission, the door opened and Lieutenant Campbell walked in and saluted.

“Captain, the convoy to Govurn is said to be arriving at three o’clock.”

At the sound of a convoy coming to the camp, Sally was relieved. The uncle didn’t turn away. It was also her job to identify the spies in advance.

“Well There’s still time. We shouldn’t make our guest bored.”

‘Blood-crazed devil. May you fall down to the hell worthy of you.’

As she heard that there would be another torture, Sally cursed herself.

“Yes, I will prepare right away.”

As Campbell left, Sally walked over to Winston’s desk. It was an excuse to empty the ashtray, though that damn bastard still hadn’t lit his cigar. He just raised his gaze with his head still to the paperwork.

Sally smiled and picked up the tray of empty sparkling water bottles. On the way to the door with a bucket and a tray of cleaning tools, her heart stung once again.


The screams that had leaked out through the crack in the torture chamber’s door stopped. Then, Fred came out with a pale, blue face. He was clenching his teeth as if he was putting up with nausea. He took the prison uniform from Sally and went inside.
As she pulled a piece of cotton from her ear and put it in her pocket, the letter in the pocket rustled.

When the door opened again, she held a bucket full of cleaning tools in her hands. A group of soldiers poured out and bowed their heads to her. In the middle of it, there was an old man who was more emaciated than at lunch.

In the prison uniform, he was being dragged like cattle with shackles around his limp hands and feet.

Reading the horror in his trembling eyes, Sally gave a determined look on her face without a smile.

‘The rescue team will definitely come.’

When she saw the hem of the gray coat, she immediately drew her attention. Out of the torture chamber, Winston exuded the energy of a man coming out of a brothel or cabaret.

He had a fresh face, relieved of the accumulated desires.

“Then, I look forward to your cooperation today.”

As he tapped Sally on the shoulder and disappeared beyond the hallway, she immediately began cleaning the torture chamber.

The mattress had to be replaced every time a ‘guest’ left. Messed with blood and dirt, she put the mattress out in the hallway and whimpered while taking out a new mattress from the warehouse and putting it on the bed.

Managing the torture chamber was the most arduous and disgusting job in the mansion. Because of that, everyone was reluctant.

However, the weekly wage was also high.

For that reason, it was originally a middle-aged maid with a gambler husband, Ethel, who had been in charge of it for several years.

When Sally first infiltrated this mansion as the maid, she was assigned to attend to Mrs. Winston. Dress shopping, ladies’ refreshments, and Mrs. Winston’s whims and gossip Truly, as an agent, it had no beneficial value at all.

So, by the time she built her credibility as an excellent working child amongst the employees, she pretended to run out of money because of her ill mother.

Just as expected. The maid chief, Mrs. Bellmore, assigned her to the annex in a hurry. A maid who did her job well was precious, though a maid whose money was scarce was dangerous since Mrs. Winston’s dressing room was full of expensive things.

So, she got along with Ethel and took over the torture chamber, but Ethel started to get suspicious of Sally’s frequent sniffing.

[ “If you’re trying to win the Captain’s favor like that, then stop. Do you know how many children have been kicked out for arguing with the Captain so far?” ]

Fortunately, her original intention was completely undiscovered, though it was bothering the mission. Consequently, she used her head a bit and drove her away.

[ “My distant relative, an uncle, became crazy rich with it. How envious. Occasionally, when he comes to my hometown to play, he pays for my mother’s hospital bills, but I wondered where the old miser went. From the head to the toes, he was so dazzling” ]

Ethel, who lived on endless debt due to her gambler husband, eyes widened when she heard the story of a gold mine in the New World.

She wasn’t making it up very much. It was the truth that her aunt’s family got rich by the developing gold mining in the New World. She now lived in a big city over the ocean. Her aunt would occasionally send letters to Sally, asking her to live with her, but Sally refused each time.

Step on the weaker and climb higher and higher Accumulating blood-stained wealth, wears smooth clothes, and eats lavishly.

In a class made of money, they looked no different from the pigs of the monarchy.

The world that Sally’s deceased parents and moreover, the comrades whom she considered family dreamed of were not like that.

[ “The utopia will grow on the blood of the revolutionary army and bear fruit.” ]

Sally recalled the slogan, which she had chanted frequently since childhood. Literally, the blood of the revolutionary army was stuck between the black stone floors.

As she scraped it off with the brush, the letters in her pocket were rustling.

[ “I want Sally to be my daughter.” ]

Mrs. Appleby used to lament to Sally, who waited for her at 5 pm every day.

[ “My daughter only sends letters on Easter and Christmas.” ]

When the mail carriage came to the Winston mansion, she rushed to the door and held out a piece of letter. Mrs. Appleby thought it was a letter to her mother in the hospital. Only she and the postman, Peter, knew that the secret code to her comrade was actually hidden in the sweet and imaginative text.

Hidden in today’s letter was the message that the Uncle was moving to the Govurn camp.

The convoy has already left. Although she thought she should call the branch right away, the mansion’s phone could be tapped. The phone would be placed as soon as Peter returned to town.

It was a five-hour drive from here to the Govurn camp. In the meantime, there was enough time for the rescue team near Govurn to set up a rescue operation and wait. Perhaps, the uncle would return to the arms of his comrades before he even arrived in downtown Govurn.

Eventually, she came out of the torture chamber, which smelled of disinfectant and bleach.

Entering the hallway and turning the corner, there was a laundry chute that led up to the top floor of the annex. She opened the drawer and filled the basket with blood-soaked laundry.

As she was on her way to the laundry room in the main building with a full basket—

“Miss Bristol.”

At the sound of the voice suddenly pouring over her head, Sally missed the basket and the willow basket fell to the floor.

“Captain?”

When did he come? She couldn’t hear any footsteps.

She turned her head up, and the hot breath touched the back of her exposed neck.

Goosebumps welled up on Sally’s forearm.

The tip of his nose dug under the sparsely fine hair. Her legs trembled as Winston inhaled with his nose buried in her skin. She wanted to escape, but she was blocked by cold walls and the hot walls of blood and flesh.

“Sally, you smell good.”

All that came from her was the smell of blood and disinfectant.

He then took one step closer.

Sally’s heart, trapped between the wall in her mouth and between Winston’s chest, pounded in a thump.

‘Dangerous This is dangerous.’

A hard object pierced between her hips as she pushed the wall with her hands. It was easy to tell that it wasn’t a pistol. The heat that could not be stopped even with several layers of cloth warmed Sally’s delicate skin at will.

Chapter 4

‘Please, this way.’

The sound of military boots was heard from over the corner.

‘Please, come this way with an eye to see, so Winston wouldn’t do anything dirty anymore.’

However, the footsteps stopped just before the corner.

Now, what excuse should she use to get out? Sally hurriedly shook her head.

Although she hid her pistol under her skirt, she shouldn’t shoot Winston because her mission for over a year would be in vain. Besides, the moment she was found hiding a gun, she was afraid that even the letter might be taken away.

As she clenched her teeth, the tip of the nose, which had been buried in the nape of her neck, ran up her hair and rubbed over her earlobes. He whispered languidly as he exhaled a hot breath, rubbing between his earlobe and cheek.

“Why are you nervous like that?”

‘Is he asking because he didn’t know?’

Turning her head with tears in her eyes, he suddenly took off his black gloves.

Sally held her breath as his outstretched fingers climbed up the seam at her side. His fingers moved forward, fiddling with the buttons on her bulging chest. Not a single hair touched her chest, but the way he rolled his fingertips was the same as rolling her nipples.

Dirty pervert bastard

“Captain.”

“Yes?”

The hot breath tickled her ear again. Sally sniffled her nose.

“I need the money. I have to pay my mom’s hospital bills soon I can do anything the Captain wants.”

As if Winston had been baptized in cold water, he fell off in an instant.

He was a man with severe mysophobia. It was more when it comes to sex. More than anyone else, Winston hated a woman who jumped at him with her legs spread apart.

Sally erased her smile of relief and covered her weeping face. She turned behind him and found Winston leaning at an angle to the opposite wall, vagina his wallet. A look of disappointment was evident on his face.

“Sally, you are a good child. Do not speak such dirty words in front of any men.”

“Did you say that I’m good because I was annoying?”

Sally clasped the wad of bills he was handing out, and his eyes widened. Winston opened his mouth and had a look that he wanted to say something, though only a small sigh came out.

“Thank you, Captain.”

You have to run away when the hungry predator is showing a loophole. Thinking that, she politely said her greetings and tried to run away although, his arm grabbed her.

“Don’t get me wrong, I didn’t mean to offend you. I like you.”

Is this a confession?

Sally froze on the spot.

“I like the boldness of not blinking an eye when seeing blood.”

No It was only then did Winston’s face relax. The corners of his straight lips held a gentle smile.

“If it were any other woman, they would have passed out already. Of course, the boys, too. You’re more trustworthy than these nauseous young recruits.”

The kid recruit he was talking about was obviously Fred.

“I didn’t mean to push you today. Don’t be kind to those rats, they are cunning.”

‘He knew that? He’s a cunning rat, too.’

Sally didn’t hide the smug smile from her lips. After all, the greedy monarch pigs would not know the true meaning of her smile.

“I want you to stay long”

Winston let go of her arm. His fingertips ran across her shoulder, and his well-proportioned knuckles caressed her cheek.

“I wish you could be part of the torture chamber.”

All of the nerves were focused on the tips of her soft, brittle hair.

This meant that he wanted her to remain as the maid in charge of the torture chamber for a long time. That was the way it should be. But, what that cruel man spit out could not have been kind words.

It sounded like to become an organ in a monster that suck human life

Is that not it?

Did that mean he wanted to put her in that torture chamber, put chains around her neck, and pulled out her nails? If no one was being tortured, the torture chamber was just an ordinary room, nothing more, nothing less.

Since Sally didn’t know his reason, it was probably just a simple request to work as the maid for a long time.

Nevertheless, the scary imagination was not easily shaken.

“If you are injured and shed even a drop of blood”

Winston suddenly stopped talking. The hands that were gently stroking her cheek also stopped. His clear eyes, as though he had been stabbed at what he said, went blank. It was as if his eyes, which had always been cold, were quietly blazing hot.

Moments later, his hand, which had stopped, moved again. His fingertips felt unusually hot because of her cold lips.

He pressed down on her soft flesh, scanning from one end to the other. At that moment, he bit his lips with a white tooth. It looked like blood would be oozing out.

Camden’s vampire.

Sally’s face turned pale, recalling the nickname that followed Captain Leon Winston like the hem of his coat. What was this bloodthirsty man imagining about her now that he wanted to bite her lip and suck her blood?

Dangerous This was fatally dangerous.

Sally smiled brightly and clasped her hands together as if praying so that the bills in her hands could be seen very clearly.

‘Look carefully. In my blood, like other women, the filthy snobbish spirit flows.’

“Thank you for your concern. Captain is really generous and kind. I also want to work under Captain for a long, long time.”

The moment she poured out praises that he didn’t even want, Winston’s eyes returned.

Sally was somewhat relieved under the sharp gaze as cold as the blade of a knife. She immediately turned her back and ran away from him. He didn’t hold her back until she got to the corner.

Turning the corner at a rather quick pace and passing the soldiers guarding the door to the torture chamber, Sally sighed in her relief.

But then she bit her lips, just like Winston did.

A rotten world.

It was sadly quite common for a maid to be abused by the filthy hands of the master’s people. Still, she had never heard of such a thing happening on the Winstons. The Winston brothers were notorious for not paying attention to women.

The eldest son, Captain Leon Winston, was a sadistic figure that even the Royal Family that trusted him was fed up, but was famous for his polite and gentle manner only to women. Even he never brought the revolutionary army women into the torture chamber.

The second son, Jerome, was more of a modest scholar than his older brother, who was a soldier. There was no difference in terms of family history or arrogant disposition.

He used to take women into a pedantic discussion when they showed personal curiosity and kicked them out. He hated a woman who was like a porcelain doll with an empty head more than anyone else.

So, would she have imagined it when she infiltrated this mansion as a maid? One of the brothers was rude to her.

A spy must not stand in the eyes or ears of the target. Like all the maids, she tried her best to be treated like the furniture, though the interest was either loved her too much or hated her too much

Where did she go wrong?

To her surprise, she found out the answer in less than ten minutes.


‘Late.’
She couldn’t meet the mail wagon on time because of the goddamn erotomania. Sally ran out the front door of the mansion.

As her breath reached her chin, she saw the front door. Peter, the postman, who had been waiting for her as she chatted with the gatekeeper of the mansion, sneered through her slender grates and laughed.

“You are a little late today, Miss Bristol.”

Even though, at first glance, it looked like a generous smile, she was not unaware that the impatience was a vivid rebuke.

Because time was urgent.

“Yes, ha, Captain, was looking for me.”

’I didn’t come here to play, you bastard.’

When she mentioned ‘Captain,’ Peter’s eyes visibly froze. Sally said she was fine and smiled before holding out the letter from her hand.

“Please, take care of it again today”

“Sally.”

Sally froze at the sudden sound of the voice. Behind her, the soft engine sound of a luxury sedan growled softly.

“Then, I’ll get going.”

Peter snatched the letter from Sally’s hand and ran to the wagon. As he came nearer, the sound of stepping on the little pebbles from behind her grew closer and closer. She turned around casually and smiled.

“Captain, are you on the way out? It’s dinner time soon.”

“I have an engagement.”

He was still wearing an officer’s uniform.

‘Is that a private advance?’

What other heinous things was he going to do?

“I see. Mrs. Winston might be lonely. Then, please enjoy”

“No sweet talks.”

He approached. Again, the distance narrowed to the point of being dangerous.

“Sally, every time I see you, I want to ask you something.”
Chapter 5

“What?”

He regarded his employees as the cogs in the mansion. No one wanted to ask something every time they saw the parts of a machine.

What the hell was he curious about? The maid named Sally Bristol and her family? If that were the case, it would have been enough to recite the details the revolutionary army had already carefully organized.

However, if she recalled his actions from a while ago, it may be very vulgar and private curiosity.

Insults and curses were about to come out of her at once. Sally bit her lips tightly.

“Perhaps”

For some reason, Winston, who had been staring tenaciously into her eyes, spoke softly. The question was neither vulgar nor overly private, though it made Sally hope for a rather vulgar curiosity.

“Did you ever go to Abbington Beach as a child?”

Abbington Beach. The moment she heard the words, her heart sank.

‘Dirty pigs—!’

The mistakes of her childhood were repeated in her mind like a faded movie. Just over a dozen years later that summer was about to take all of her time.

‘No. If you have to ask, it’s just a feeling. There’s no proof.’

It was fortunate that he didn’t ask a trick question. As calmly as possible, that was the only way to live

“Yes?”

Sally tilted her head as if confused.

“No My parents were poor, so we couldn’t afford to go to such a luxury resort”

This time, she lengthened her words sullenly. The corners of her eyes and lips drooped with the weight of the woes of poor Sally Bristol, a poor rural daughter and her only family member was her mother with tuberculosis.

“.”

Winston was silent again.

He stared tenaciously into her eyes, like before he threw a bomb masquerading as a question. Was he looking for evidence of lies or evidence of truth in the turquoise waters of Abbington Beach?

She wanted to close her eyes.

But, even if she did, nothing would change. It wasn’t until Sally’s maid’s blouse started to cling to her skin, wet with sweat, that Winston caught her eye.

“Well, yes.”

He went back to the car with a chuckle and ridicule as he believed that he had made an unreasonable guess.

Soon, the iron gate opened.

With the sound of the ferocious engine, Winston passed Sally. She muttered quietly as she watched the car getting smaller and smaller.

‘Damn my eyes.’


The wheel, which was rolling down the entrance road lined with square bricks, gradually lost speed and stopped.
The iron gate at the end of the road was firmly shut.

Even though the butler had already been informed of the arrival time, the driver, who glanced at Leon’s expression in the rearview mirror, immediately blew the honk loudly. After ringing twice, a middle-aged man hurriedly ran out of the window and opened the door.

The car started moving again, and as they passed by, the gatekeeper hurriedly saluted him, though Leon smiled and turned his gaze to the front.

There was nothing surprising. It was not a matter of a day or two for Grand Duchy Eldrich’s subtle negligence.

‘It’s understandable.’

It was the Winstons who immediately benefited from the deal of engagement. The Grand Duke just looked to the future and invested. So, shouldn’t the scale be tilted to one side?

Leon’s neglect was simply ridiculous.

In order to injure one’s pride, it was necessary to expect, or at least have even the slightest interest in, this transaction.

‘Oh, mother might be outraged.’

The corners of his lips, which had been raised at an angle, soon came down again.

The road that seemed to have no end was finally coming to an end. The magnificent mansion at the end was just one of the many villas of the Grand Duchy.

Even the villa was designed to overwhelm those who set foot in it, worthy of the Grand Duchy’s prestige. But, that also works for those who are in debt with the Grand Duchy. Leon was just annoyed by all of this.

As the car stopped in front of the mansion, the butler of the villa walked slowly. While Leon’s personal attendant, seated in the passenger seat, hastily went out and opened the back seat door, the butler brushed off his shiny hair with pomade.

“Captain Winston, I will guide you to the parlor.”

Even the polite greeting was slow.

Leon closed the folder that had been on his lap and opened the black briefcase on the seat next to him.

His attendant, Pierce, approached to do so, but he raised his hand and refused. He put the file folder and fountain pen in its place and picked up a black cap. Then, he gently put in his hair neatly, pressed the curled hair, and even fixed the shape.

“Captain, if you hurry up a little bit more”

He got out of the car and followed the butler into the villa after the arrogant butler bowed down. He stopped Pierce from following because he was only going to bring the woman out, anyway.

“The Grand Duke is waiting for you.”

However, the news that Grand Duke Eldrich was at Camden’s villa was unexpected. Upon entering the parlor, the Grand Duke, in comfortable clothes, sat up at an angle on the sofa, read the newspaper, and stood up.

“Oh, Captain Winston.”

It was a formal title to call someone who would soon become a family member.

“Your Highness, long time no see.”

“Okay, are you here to pick up Rosalind?”

“Yes.”

“Hmm”

The Grand Duke was fiddling with the long mustache that stretched to the side. His gaze glared down at Leon’s neck.

“It’s nice to see a serious attitude towards dating like fighting a battle.”

The Grand Duke’s words sound like a compliment to the naive, though Leon was far from naive. He couldn’t have not known that the Grand Duke was displeased that he was wearing an officer’s uniform rather than a high-class suit to a date arranged by the adults.

“The work was delayed and this was inevitable.”

He pretended to be modest and smiled, but the Grand Duke couldn’t have not understood that Leon was not interested in this date or even this deal.

“Yes, you must be very busy.”

It was not really work, but his departure was delayed because he had twice glanced at the annoying maid.

“Because even the Captain who keeps his promises like a sword is late today.”

It was an unexpected word. Did the Grand Duke know the time of the appointment with the Lady?

‘Is he really waiting? What business does he have?’

He had a strong feeling that it would be a troublesome story.

“Would you like a drink?”

He didn’t have to answer since it was neither a question nor a suggestion. The Grand Duke walked right into the corner of the parlor and picked up a crystal glass. It was when the liquid was pouring into the glass that someone knocked on the parlor door.

“The Grand Duke, Lady Rosalind has arrived.”

“Oh, come in.”

As the door opened, Leon’s prospective fiancée walked in, ready to go out.

“Captain Winston.”

“Your Highness Lady Aldrich.”

Both of them called each other by names that were too formal for both men and women to be engaged.

As they exchanged greetings, the Lady’s dress couldn’t help but catch his eye. It was far from the fashion these days when skirts were getting shorter every day. The long dress, barely showing her ankles, looked cramped rather than pompous.

She wore only expensive things like the Grand Lady who boasted enormous wealth, though she was a boring woman who made everything seem plain.

Rosalind Aldrich was such a woman.

Even if it was boring, a mission was a mission, even if it was a mission that the elders of the family threw at him to satisfy their greed.

Leon approached the Lady and held out his arm modestly. It was so light that he couldn’t even feel a hand resting on the inside of his arm. She was reluctant to have physical contact with him, so the girl didn’t really like going on a date either.

“Grand Duke, I’ll have a drink next time. The departure time of the cruise ship is near.”

“Yes, please have a meaningful time.”

Only the adults in the family think this deal was meaningful.

There was no conversation between the two people sitting next to each other in a car running along the river across the city.

Pierce, unable to withstand the awkward atmosphere, whispered. He lightly recommends the menus of the cruise ships’ high-end restaurants and bars, adding that he hopes the two will have a good time.

“I don’t like alcohol.”

It was the Lady who spoke first.

This nonsense was probably due to her father recommending drinks to Leon at the villa, or because Pierce recited the bar’s cocktail menu. The Grand Duke was famous for being a drinker. It was common for a woman whose father was a drinker to dislike alcohol.

“I don’t really enjoy it either.”

“Alcohol confuses people’s judgment. They say it makes you forget the pain of life, but it seems to only give you a bigger problem. In particular, it is easy to lose self-control and become indecisive when meeting people.”

Was she trying to say he would make a big mistake when drinking? Leon grew annoyed when the Lady, who would not usually speak her words, gave unsolicited opinions.

He didn’t want to do anything like wasting time in the name of dating. Although since he was in the inferior position in this deal, that woman seemed to know how to attack him and made her pregnant, so as not to smoothen the deal.

‘It’s ridiculous.’

If he really wanted to close this deal, he would have done it sooner. Even if it was not as disgusting as pregnancy, the cards were overflowing, even if he heard it being mean.

In the first place, he was not uninterested in sex to the extent that even seeing a woman’s naked body made him reluctant. It was quite common for high-class prostitutes, who smelled of strong perfumes, to hang out with the officers at drinking parties. Still, no one had ever moved him.

But, why is he in heat with the maid who smelled of blood?

Staring at the Lady’s face, who smelled of powder, Leon repeated the same name in his closed mouth.

‘Sally Bristol Sally, what the hell is she?’

Chapter 6

However, as the speeches of the Grand Lady continued without end, he couldn’t keep thinking of the maid.

“You won’t be able to smell alcohol today. Don’t worry, Grand Lady.”

The woman stared at him.

Did she have more to say? She wiggled her hand nervously as she gripped the tiny crystal and tassel-studded evening bag. Seeing that, Leon tilted his head at an angle and urged her to open her mouth.

“Please, call me Rosalind.”

He lost his words for a moment at the least unexpected request. The woman who was acting like a chihuahua barking to keep from being caught up in fear just a moment ago was suddenly trying to close the distance.

However, they were supposed to live as husband and wife, anyway. A distance they would have to narrow down someday. It would be a big disrespect if the other person did not hold the hand that was reached out first.

“.”

But, even when he opened his lips to call out the name, those three simple syllables did not come out of Leon’s mouth.

Rosalind Aldrich.

Rosalind. Rosalind. The name didn’t stick to his mouth. She was as old-fashioned as her old-fashioned name. In addition, her teaching-like tone and monastic mood made her luxurious evening dress like a nun’s robe.

Come to think of it, there was a person in the Winston family who had the same tone and atmosphere and made a high-class suit into a police suit.

‘Don’t you get along better with Jerome than with me?’

Although it wasn’t Jerome, who might one day receive the title, so, in the marriage talk with the Grand Duchy, his younger brother was not considered from the beginning.

“If you could call me Leon instead of Captain Winston, I would be glad.”

Leon smiled slyly as if he had played a dirty trick on the woman. Of course, he wouldn’t do that kind of trick.

She was a woman with a timid corner, so it was the card that he handed out, knowing that there was no way to call him by name first. Besides, she was so knowledgeable that she would not be pleased with the man’s light trick.

As expected.

The Grand Lady hesitated for a moment before only smiling awkwardly. Her gaze turned to look out the window again, and silence fell inside the car again. Consequently, he managed to get the woman to withdraw her firsthand without being rude.

The car stopped at the marina dyed with the red sunset. The river overflows with gold, and the luxury cruise ships dazzle in the orange lights.

Leon crossed over to the other side of the car and opened the door. On the way to lead the Grand Lady to the cruise ship, he took out the ticket Pierce had given him.

The departure time of the cruise ship was four hours later. It was like a mother’s message to get up earlier than what was written on the ticket.

‘It’s going to be a boring night.’

Following the servant in a black uniform, he got on the elevator to the top floor of the cruise ship. The driver lowered the lever and the elevator, which had been sliding uphill, came to a rough stop as soon as the lever was raised again and shook violently.

“Ah”

Leon’s arm was gripped by a hand that had been resting like a ghost on his arm. The Grand Lady made a slightly bewildered face, and she immediately withdrew the grip from her hand.

The driver behind winked with one eye at Leon and smiled. It was apparently a surprise show for the men and women who were dating.

‘What a useless thing to do’

It looked like the driver wanted a tip, though he just looked away coldly.

The lattice door of the elevator opened, and the servant walked along the soft carpeted hallway. The moment the massive door at the end of the hallway opened on both sides, the sound of music blew out, leaving Leon smiling lightly at it.

A man in a tuxedo slid his fingers over the keys on a grand piano in the corner of the restaurant hall. It was classical music, not jazz, which his mother said was disgusting.

A chair lined with dark mahogany and floral fabric. Columns and frescoes adorned with patches and feathers The classic interior was completely to his mother’s taste.

At a time when corsets were becoming obsolete, she was still a conservative person who insisted on wearing corsets made of whalebone. Thinking back, even the prospective fiancée followed his mother’s taste.

Eventually, the two sat down at the table by the window and accepted the menu brought by the waiter. The wine menu was returned immediately, and the dishes were picked.

“What would you like?”

“I will take what you recommend.”

Did she grow up with an old-fashioned education to not reveal her intentions and be quiet?

The Grand Lady wasn’t very helpful in choosing the dinner menu. It was completely different from when she said she didn’t like alcohol a while ago. She was a mysterious woman, though he was not even interested in finding out more about her.

Leon ordered the most expensive thing and started chatting nonsense—today’s weather, the scenery outside the window, the Grand Duke’s health The conversation often got cut off and scrambled.

He was already bored.

“What are you doing these days?”

The Grand Lady’s question was unexpected. She must already know his nickname and asked what he was doing.

‘Do that girl really want to hear it?’

How much trouble the Western Command suffered because of a rat of the Blanchard rebels that was caught three years after infiltrating as the knight of the Western Command He spent days and nights trying to figure out what information had been leaked.

And, how the cunning man trembled with fear.

How funny it was to be foaming at the mouth when he plucked the little fingernail of his right hand.

‘If I tell her, that woman will turn blue.’

Oh, one more thing. How ridiculous it was that the commander’s scruffy face had become thin like a mummy these days.

If he told her, would she laugh or would she be offended?

It turned out that one of the commander’s numerous mistresses was also a rebel spy, so he was in danger of being summoned to the royal court.

What about the mistress?

The spy was a woman. Besides, they are prostitutes in the name of the Revolutionary Army. Leon felt dirty, so he handed it over to the superiors to take care of.

Mean people who used women for dangerous and dirty work Though could he do it without being a mean person? Because he didn’t think the superiors know how to deal with women, it was enough as long as he didn’t get his hands dirty.

A Lady who wrote poetry and embroidered in the corner of the room didn’t need to know about such dirty things.

“It would be a boring story.”

At his euphemistic refusal, the Grand Lady misunderstood and blushed her face.

“Ah, this It’s like I’m asking for a military secret.”

“It’s no secret that the Western Commander resembles a frog.”

At the silly joke, the Grand Princess laughed innocently.

He was utterly bored, hoping that the work of adding one more ‘Mrs. Winston’ to the family would be completed soon.

It was like something one would say when buying a watchdog. After marriage, his duties as the eldest son of the family would be completed. It meant that he didn’t have to waste time on such frivolous ‘dates.’

‘Looking at the slowness, there must be a formidable battle going on.’

Leon didn’t know how far the engagement discussions had progressed. This was because the terms of the engagement were being discussed only by the elders of the family, away from the parties involved. Besides, he wasn’t really interested, so he never asked.

“Leon, you do your job. This is my job.”

Even though he had no intention of getting involved, his mother used to say, with a serious face, like how the main character would say while rolling up their sleeves. It was the attitude regarding his marriage as her own masterpiece.

That was understandable.

Elizabeth Winston. Before she became Mrs. Winston, she was called the Count’s Lady.

She married his father, who she firmly believed would soon receive the title, though when her son grew up, she was still only ‘Mrs. Winston.’ Since she was born as a Count’s Lady, she was told that she would die as a Countess, like how a terminal tuberculosis patient vomits blood.

‘I’m out of luck.’

All of Winston’s predecessors Madam had died as Countesses.

From generation to generation, the Winston family was Count Winston. However, as the royal family fled abroad after being chased by a rebellion under the guise of a ‘revolution,’ the payment was cut off.

His grandfather, who was a count at the time, abandoned the royal family at once and took the hand of the rebels. His father often sneered, recalling that his grandfather pretended to be the prophet that said a new world had arrived.

The new world he spoke of was a world in which capital, not status, became power. His grandfather raked in his fortune from a business he had run as a dog of the first ‘revolutionary government.’

At the time, his father, who was a vigorous cadet, despised his grandfather and followed the royal family abroad. He said it was like hearing the voice of a blind person who couldn’t see the future and was blocked in front and behind.

However, the blind person who could not see the future was his grandfather.

The ‘revolutionary government’ had disintegrated within a decade. Their ideals were very lax, and individual understanding easily seeps into the gap.

Evidence of this was that even rats who still support the rebel ideology throw away their ideology after spending three or four days in the torture chamber. Ideology was not going to help them when they got whipped and had their nails pulled out.

The royal family and the royalists could not miss the chaos. The monarchy was restored in an instant, and the ‘Republic of Lippon’ became the ‘Kingdom of Lippon’ again.

As soon as the royal family returned, it was only natural that they set out to punish the traitors.

Fortunately, his father made a significant contribution to the restoration of the monarchy. The Winston family was only deprived of their Count title. They were able to defend his position and property as a wealthy landowner in the Camden area.

The royal family made a promise to his father, who was then young. They said they would return the title if he did a good job in eradicating the remnants of the rebels. It was said that his father, who was originally a royal dog, had since become a more loyal royal dog.

And, around this time, a Count with a title but no money made his daughter Mrs. Winston, saying it was a prospective investment.

‘Everyone is so stupid.’

Because that promise has yet to be kept.

Chapter 7

His father was attacked by a rebel spy and met a disgraceful end at a young age.

Because of that, the duty to reclaim his title thereafter naturally fell to the eldest son, Leon. He entered the military academy earlier than others. After his appointment, he traveled through numerous battlefields and rebel hideouts, earning the title of war hero and vampire at the same time.

Now, it was his next duty to marry the daughter of the family who would help him regain his title.

He was raised with military-style education from birth. They didn’t ask if he didn’t want to do it, anyway, and it was no longer unusual now that he did it silently.

He was called Camden’s vampire because of the notoriety that the places he passed were going to be bloody, though in fact, the nickname Camden’s loyal military dog ​​might be more appropriate.

‘Can I call that woman the Grand Duchy’s gentle sheep?’

Leon stared at the Grand Lady, who was looking out the window on the deck.

Compared to the Grand Lady, the eldest son of the Winston family was of a lower rank. Nevertheless, the reason why the Grand Duke took this marriage seriously was because the civil war was not over yet.

It was a world where soldiers were on the road to success.

Among the many young officers, Leon was the most promising. The Grand Duke was just starting to rise, and he was using one of his daughters to buy this high-risk but high-return stock at a bargain price.

So, Rosalind Aldrich was the Grand Duke’s scapegoat.

He spoke to the woman with a dull face again.

“Do you like this place?”

“Yes.”

According to his intuition, who had been interrogating spies for many years, that was a lie.

“I’m glad. It was a mistake to leave the restaurant reservations with mother. I was a little bit regretful.”

At his words, a smirk spread across the Grand Lady’s face.

“Mrs. Winston has a good eye.”

“Thank you. I will pass it to my mother.”

After a meaningless smile, the Grand Lady smiled slowly along with him.

The waiter brought the meal as soon as the woman opened her mouth firmly as if she had something to say. After that, every now and then, talking about cooking a word or two, was all they had in the conversation.

Emptying the plate quickly didn’t make it any faster to escape from here. Nevertheless, his body wanted to get out of this place quickly, so he finished the meal in an instant.

The Grand Princess also put down the fork and knife, even though the plate wasn’t even half empty.

“Sorry. If you’re in the military, you’ll get used to the speed of men’s meals.”

Apologizing for the menu, he moved to the cafe on the same floor later. Since he couldn’t starve his guest, he was thinking of offering a cake.

“No. In fact, it was too much for me to eat.”

The Grand Lady, like a lady, declined the dessert and ordered tea. While she was waiting for the tea, her eyes kept getting closer to his face as he stared out the window.

Leon, who became embarrassed, finally could not bear it and asked.

“Do you have anything to say?”

The Grand Lady looked like she had been caught. She did the obvious, and it wasn’t even funny. Then, what was so funny, as he said to himself, he smiled softly and opened her mouth.

“You’re not as scary as the rumors are.”

Leon suppressed a ridicule.

‘Stupid woman. Did you know that I could wield a whip at you?’

No matter how vicious the rumors were, they wouldn’t be wrong. It was just that he couldn’t show his true face to the Grand Princess.

“The Captain is really generous and kind.”

What kind of woman saw all of his true qualities and called him generous and kind?

Sally Bristol.

He didn’t think she was stupid. Rather, she looked like a fox pretending to be stupid.

The gap between her mouth, which uttered she admired him, and her eyes, which said she despised him, were worth seeing. He wanted to take off her mask and drive her to a dead end until she fully revealed her true feelings.

Then, would he know if the fox was a wicked female or a cunning trickster?

‘For example’

Leon took a deep breath as the cruel impulse suddenly simmered.

Rolling Sally’s black maid’s suit skirt and spread her slender calves. Shoving his pistol into the cramped, damp spot that would reveal itself if he ripped open the middle of the pure white bloomer.

As the cold muzzle stirs the soft flesh, she would out a moan closer to pain than pleasure. Pulling the pistol from her twitching flesh, the woman’s lewd water would run down through the moist muzzle and wet his hands.

‘I can’t stand it.’

Leon crossed his legs, which had already been crossed to one side, more tightly. Why did the front of his trousers become so tight just by imagining that poor woman?

Was it because of her eyes?

“It was a good time.”

It was already close to midnight when he dropped off the Grand Lady at the villa.

“I had a good time, too.”

Leon’s bright smile made the Grand Lady widen her eyes in surprise. She thought he would tell lies like her, although he expressed it as if he really enjoyed it.

It looked unbelievable.

Indeed, it was a pretty good time. The last two hours on the cruise ship were so much fun that his pants were tight and uncomfortable.

“Well, see you next time.”

As he was about to let the Grand Lady into the villa and get into the car, the butler quickly walked out of the entrance.

“Captain Winston, the Grand Duke asks if you are not busy, how about paying off the debt you owe today?”

It was for having refused to drink alcohol in the evening.

“Oh, dear”

Leon pretended to be flustered and rubbed his forehead with his index finger, which was wearing black gloves, before answering.

“I already promised the Grand Lady that she won’t be able to smell alcohol today If you tell him that I don’t want to be a man who already lost his wife’s trust, then His Grace would be very understanding. Tell him that I will pay back the debt with interest.”

Then, he got into the car, leaving the Grand Duchy and the butler staring at him strangely. Overtime work without results was prohibited.

In fact, there was a pile of things that had to be done urgently in the front of his pants.


In short, it was a very difficult day.
Sally sighed as she lay on her bed and thought back on the day.

Creak.

The creaks of the old bed echoed in the empty room. The maid’s room in the attic of the annex was spacious enough to accommodate four people. After Ethel left, she was the only one left in the annex, so she was enjoying the luxury of being alone.

“Oh, what kind of wind is really blowing today?”

So, even the complaints in her head can come out of her mouth.

There had never been a day she had been more weary with Winston than she was today. Although he was a very fickle human being, she thought she was going to become a ghost due to a heart attack because he flashed here and there like a ghost today.

Did that wild beast-like intuition get triggered?

“Have you ever been to Abbington Beach as a child?”

Her long sigh crossed the still room.

Those damn eyes.

Spies should be plain-looking.

Because when people tried to make a montage in their head, it had to be so uncharacteristic that it would be difficult to describe in detail. In fact, she thought she just had a typical look. It was because her usual dark brown hair was a simple impression that was difficult to catch at a glance

Except for these turquoise eyes.

Even if she honed her other skills as a spy, her natural appearance could not be helped. In addition, disguises were also limited.

A day like this might come because of her unique eyes, she warned before being placed in this mansion. However, she didn’t listen.

“The leaders must set an example.”

James ‘Little Jimmy’ Blanchard Jr. The young leader of the Blanchard Revolutionary Army and her fiancé.

Sally never complained, no matter how hard he entrusted his fiancée with any grueling operations.

She never wished for a life that was sitting quietly in the house, raising children, rummaging through a catalog of kitchenware, and preparing a course meal just in time for her husband to arrive. Rather than being loved as a woman by her fiancé, she wanted to be recognized as an equal comrade like her father to her mother.

So, it wasn’t because she was a coward that she rejected the Winston infiltration operation. It was because she feared that the operation would be ruined by her physical features that Captain Winston might remember.

‘Look at this now. I’m right, wasn’t I?’

It might be better to put someone else in here and then withdraw quickly. After all, one small crack could lead to collapse. Today’s negligence did not mean that Winston had completely cut off the buds of suspicion.

‘I’m going to have to call Jimmy’

Regardless, the torture room was empty, so there wouldn’t be much work tomorrow.

‘Shall we go to the post office tomorrow? I’ll also use the phone’

Sally stared across the room into the chest of drawers. Inside a rolled-up sock contained a large sum of money unintentionally extorted from Winston today.

‘Shall I send them some money?’

She was sending it to headquarters along with last week’s weekly pay as military funds. Unlike the weekly wage, it was money that no one knew about, so she could spend it in a gulp. Still, her conscience did not allow it. Besides, she had nowhere else to use it, anyway.

Well A cup of cafe au lait and a piece of cake at Madame Benoa’s cafe would be fine?

“You know what’s better than a piece of cake?”

She knew. It would be one thing.

Chapter 8
She suddenly remembered her older brother, although they had different looks and personalities, though with the same taste that liked sweets.

Was this voice right? The more she tried to remember, the fainter it got.

It had been a while since she met her brother because he abandoned his family. The moment his older brother, who was more proud than anyone that his grandfather was a pivotal player in the revolution, fell in love, he changed.

“I will live for my family.”

“Family? The Revolutionary Army is our family.”

But, he resisted Sally’s suggestion.

“My children will not be raised like my father. My wife, like my father Ha, damn it”

“Are you crazy? There was no one better than our father.”

The revolutionary army was like a family, and the cause of making the world a better place for all. Eventually, her older brother gave up on all this and succumbed to the ugly reality.

Sally must have been the only one who felt heartbroken when she was pointed out by her comrades, who were once family, for being a coward. She called him once a year to restore his heart on every anniversary of their mother, who died honorably during the operation.

However, her brother said he had no regrets.

[ Rather, I am really happy now. Mother will be proud of you. ]

Were those words sincere? How could he be sincere?

Moreover, her mother, who had devoted her life to the revolution, could not be proud of her son, who had run away cowardly.

[ You, too, come out of there. Let’s live together. Martha is looking forward to living with you. ]

No, that was not going to happen. Like her mother, even if she had to sacrifice her life, she would not run away. She would be the child her mother would be truly proud of.

Creak.

The bed creaked again.

Sally, who had been tossing and turning without being able to sleep, suddenly froze. It was because a man’s footsteps echoed outside the door.

‘Who?’

At this time, the purpose of the man who comes to the room where the maid was alone couldn’t be pure. To make her run an errand, it was enough to ring the bell by pulling the cords all over the annex.

Sally put her hand under her mattress and picked up the little revolver pistol. As she double-checked that it was loaded, the blunt footsteps stopped in front of the door.

Pushing the magazine back in, an intruder from the night knocked on the door.

“Who is it?”

She pretended to just be awake and paused for a moment before asking. She felt a little relieved once he knocked on the door. If he had turned the doorknob, it would undeniably impure intentions.

“it’s me.”

It’s me.

She was stunned, and a sigh broke out. She already knew who he was just by the voice. She had no chance to think about the arrogance of assuming that she would know who he was even if he didn’t say his name.

Sally turned her gaze to the clock on the side table. It was already past midnight, though what had brought him up here?

“Ah, Captain Please, wait.”

Although her mouth was a steady maid, her act of sticking her revolver into the back of the pajama pants was of a seasoned soldier.

She strode towards the door. Before she opened the door, Sally pulled a small wooden wedge placed in the corner with her feet and placed it in front of the door. Then, she cleared her expression for a moment and unlocked the locks.

“Captain, do you need anything?”

The moment she opened the door half a span, she carefully pushed the wedge with her foot and slid it under the door. It would not be seen in Winston’s eyes.

As long as she stepped on the wedge she had set, he could not easily open the door, no matter how muscular the man was.

Sally held the doorknob in one hand and the revolver behind her back in the other. The narrow doorway barely let in the light from the hallway, making it difficult to see Winston’s face. This was because his huge figure had filled that long gap.

“Captain?”

He took a deep breath, and she paused for a moment before vagina his mouth.

“Hello, Sally.”

“Oh, yes. Hello. Are you back now?”

Pretending to wake up from her sleep, she deliberately opened her eyes in a drowsy way and lowered her voice.

“Yes.”

“You’re late. You must have been very busy.”

“It was rather boring.”

“Ah Then Lieutenant Campbell and”

“Sally.”

“Yes?”

She was going to ask him to go there as she saw the other soldiers playing billiards at night, but Winston cut off her words.

In addition, his voice as he greeted her, “Hello, Sally,” was heavier than when he politely said hello. Sally gave strength to her foot as she stepped on the wedge and stretched her index finger next to the trigger of the revolver.

“I did my job, so you have to do yours, too.”

An unusual sense of intimidation emanating from his instructions, which she did not know the intention of, crossed the narrow gap in the door and weighed her down. She slowly pulled out the revolver’s muzzle that had been lodged under her waist.

“What are you talking about”

“I mean, you have to do the cleaning.”

Her mind went blank.

“Yes?”

“The office.”

Sally swallowed a lethargic sigh again. The revolver’s muzzle rested quietly on her waist.

‘What? Office cleaning?’

She originally thought he was insane. However, had he really turned crazy? At that, she stared blankly at the figure, who she still couldn’t see the expression, and took a deep breath.

‘Is he drunk, you insane man?’

Nonetheless, there was no smell of alcohol at all.

In the middle of the night, too, well past midnight, the story of waking up a maid to finish cleaning the office. Sally didn’t know if the office was a mess like a pigsty, though it was the place she most painstaking cleaned after the torture room.

They had to break the status system because of people like him.

“Ah Yes”

Just as she answered, revealing her trembling heart, Winston pushed the door inward. The doorknob wobbled. Not only that, he muttered in a slightly bewildered voice when it didn’t even budge.

“Good power.”

“Haha Yes, I am originally thank you.”

“Come on out.”

“I’ll just change my clothes and go down immediately, Captain.”

Even though she was about to close the door, this time, it didn’t even move because of Winston. He stood silently outside, clutching the doorknob.

Though she couldn’t see what he was doing, Sally felt it.

The skin that was hidden under the thin pajamas stung. He was now scanning her body with his eyes.

Dirty horny.

She had already said she would go down, so she had no excuse to suddenly say she couldn’t go.

Should she force Lieutenant Campbell to sit down? She decided to bring a sleeping pill, just in case. If she saw any strange signs, she would put the sleeping pills in the carbonated water he would normally drink.

“Captain?”

“Yes. I’ll go down first.”

As soon as Winston released the doorknob, she closed and locked the door. It took quite a while before she could hear footsteps moving away from the door.

‘Damn it! I’ll be sure to call Jimmy tomorrow.’

The hard day isn’t over yet.

“Ah”

As soon as she entered the office with her cleaning tools, she let out a mournful sigh.

The office was a mess comparable to that of a pigsty. Between the desk and the coffee table, the red carpet was strewn with large black stains. Should he see it as kindness for not asking what the mark was? There was still an ink bottle lying on the side.

Crazy bastard

The crazy bastard was sitting proudly behind his desk, smoking a cigar.

She didn’t know if he had a plan, or if he was just venting his anger at the maid who has been ignoring that things weren’t going well.

“Are you here? It took a long time to come in wearing only clothes.”

If the other person were a normal person, she would have been relieved to see that bright smile on his face. However, the other person was a human who smiled as he saw a prisoner being chased by a bloodthirsty military dog.

Sally had a bad feeling about it.

Before she came here, she looked around the library. However, there was no one there as if everyone had gone to sleep. She thought about waking up Fred, who was sleeping on the first floor, but she stopped because she feared that the soldiers in the same room would find it suspicious.

Then, she would have to put him to sleep with sleeping pills

Set down a bucket of cleaning tools next to the stain, Sally put on an expression that she had made a mistake as she deliberately walked over to the desk.

“Oh sorry. I’ll bring you something to drink right now.”

There should be a bottle and glass of sparkling water Winston always drinks on the desk. She took the tray on her way out during the day and never brought it back.

“No, I don’t need it.”

As soon as she turned around, his words blocked her escape.

“Come here.”

As she turned around and glanced at Winston, their gaze intertwined through the ghostly smoke, and he lifted his straight index finger at Sally.

Her steps toward the desk, carrying the bucket again, were cautious. It felt like she was walking on thin ice rather than a soft carpet. The hot gaze that never left her seemed to melt the thin ice. If she fell into the black pit as it is, what kind of hell will open its mouth wide inside?

Standing at the desk, Winston shook his head lightly.

“Yes?”

“This way.”

Uttering so, the tip of his index finger pointed to his side.

Sally’s legs were as good as tortoises as she walked around the desk as instructed, though her heart raced like a hare.


Chapter 9

‘If Winston attacks me, is there any way to get out?’

There were many ways to get out. It was rare to find a way to escape undetected as a specially trained spy.

While she stood politely with her hands next to Winston, he turned to Sally. With his outstretched legs slid over the other knee, the sharp black nose lifted up and caught on the hem of Sally’s skirt. As soon as she took a step back, he held out his empty hand to her.

Though his feet lifted the ends of her skirt like a mischievous boy, and his hand was like a gentleman.

“Yes?”

Not knowing what to ask, she tilted her head. At that, Winston pointed to the ceiling with a hand holding a cigar. When she followed his hand, a black chandelier caught her eye.

As Sally glanced down again, he held out his hand again, pointing his eyes at the chandelier.

“If you wait on the sofa for a while”

“Just do it.”

“The dust will fall.”

“It’s your job to clean it up.”

What kind of trick was this?

Deeply buried in the leather backrest, he showed his strong will to keep getting hit by the dust falling from the chandelier.

‘Yes. If I could hit your head with a duster, I’d gladly clean it up.’

With no choice, Sally eventually put down her bucket and picked up the duster in it.

She stopped as she tried to hold his hand, which was held out in front of her as stubborn as someone who had come to collect a debt. It would also be her job to erase her footprints when she went up to the desk with her shoes.

Standing on the desk and lifting one foot behind, she tugged at her thin shoelaces. As Sally pulled them apart, she grabbed the heels of her shoes with her hands and pulled them gently down.

From the moment her white stocking-covered feet were pulled out of the black shoes, Winston kept his eyes on her as if taking them off was an interesting spectacle.

His eyes ripped her open even at these everyday things like a newspaper.

The only way to get out of the uncomfortable gaze quickly was to do what was ordered quickly and leave. With that thought, Sally took his hand without hesitation and placed her knee on her desk.

“Ahh”

It was just then Winston’s hand fell off, and she was about to stand up with one foot on the desk. Sally grabbed his left foot, which had been sticking out of the edge of the desk. As the wind shook her body, she hurriedly put her hands on the desk.

She looked over her shoulder, lying face down like a sprinter right before starting. Perhaps, he will pull up her skirt. She hurriedly reached back with one hand and pressed the hem of her skirt, but stumbled.

His gaze was on something else entirely.

“Captain?”

Winston grinned, not taking his eyes off Sally’s toes. His thick thumb touched the soft flesh with the thin stockings in between and gently swept the gentle curves. From her toes to the back, goosebumps rose.

The sound of pain seemed to come out at the intentionally tickling touch. If she did, it was clear that it would be a promiscuous misunderstanding.

Sally bit her lips firmly.

His soft touch changed when she pulled her foot in as a sign to let go. Winston asked as he clasped his long fingers together and wrapped them around her feet.

“What do you do with the money I gave you?”

Sally’s resistance stopped at the unexpected topic. What was his reason for suddenly bringing up the money story?

“My mother’s hospital bills”

“Did you send it?”

“No, not yet.”

She could give it back if he asked for it, that was no problem.

A large landowner was said to be a bit shy, though the more he had, the more greedy he was. But, what if not? A sensible author would have noticed loopholes if they bit into Sally Bristol’s personal details.

Sally opened her mouth again, wetting her dry lips.

“Why?”

“Set some money aside to buy a pair of stockings.”

“Ack—!”

What was he talking about? Sally didn’t even have time to ask, because moments later, a screeching sound came out of her mouth in horror. It was because of the thick thumb digging into her stockings and rubbing her thick flesh.

“There is a hole.”

Winston’s voice was mixed with a light laugh. It was fortunate that it was only a mischievous playfulness, not a sharp sense. Still, she couldn’t relax.

As he put his thumb in the hole in the bottom of the stocking and swung it around, his fingers went deep into the hole and teased her little toe.

Riip.

As the hole ripped even more, Sally’s cheeks turned bright red.

“What kind of hospital, huh? Do I pay less per week? It’s probably not like that, but you don’t have the money to buy a pair of stockings, so you’re wearing things with holes in them? Sally, how do I feel when you see this?”

“Ah, that’s not it Captain, I’ll definitely buy a new one tomorrow, so please let me go. Well, the cleaning”

Leon smiled and raised his hand.

Even though she was on his desk, the maid got up hastily and ran to the corner. A woman whose face did not change even when she saw blood was turning red because of this.

“How fun.”

Maniac.

Sally quickly wiped the chandelier, pouring into herself all the vulgarity she knew.

Son of a bitch. Eat the dust

She brushed the ostrich fur on the tip of the duster against the top of Winston’s golden crown. However, no matter how many times she rubbed, the dust did not come off. After all, it had only been a few days since she cleaned the chandelier.

In the end, she had no choice but to finish quickly and go down. Her timid retaliation was abandoned, and she turned her back as she rubbed the front of the chandelier.

“That’s right.”

A muffled murmur passed over her calves wrapped in thin stockings.

“Yes?”

As she turned around, Sally could hear a creaking sound.

Looking down, Winston pretended not to have done anything and was leaning far away from the back of his chair. The cigar in his hand seemed to have been burned, not smoked, so a lump of grayish ash was hanging from the end of the short cigar.

“No, I’m talking to myself.”

“Ah. Yes”

The maid smiled politely. However, the moment she turned her head, her turquoise eyes cried out.

‘I hate you.’

Leon smiled obliquely as he brushed his cigar into the ashtray.

White.

This evening, sitting face to face with the Grand Princess, his imagination was correct.

Sally’s bloomers were white.

Now that he had checked the color of her underwear, it was natural that he wanted to check the color inside. Was it the same color as his imagination?

He wanted to put his hand inside that black skirt and white underskirt and rip open the dense seam in the middle of the bloomer at once. Leon bit his smooth lower lip with the tip of his tongue and abruptly chewed it with his sharp teeth.

He wondered if a man had ever seen it?

He rubbed the tip of the cigar into the ashtray and put it out, as if hitting it in the eyes of a man whom he didn’t even know existed.

“It’s done, Captain. Then, I will clean the carpet.”

Pretending to clean the chandelier was almost over. Sally crept down under the desk before Winston scolded her.

Dirty horny.

It was disgusting to hold her hand as if he was a gentleman when he was just spying under her skirt.

It was fortunate that Winston didn’t bother her anymore. Sally knelt down on the carpet and started wiping away the black stains. She was engrossed in the thought of cleaning it up and leaving. When she came to her senses, quite a bit of time had passed.

Meanwhile, Winston was as though he had evaporated.

There was no sound of him flipping through papers, nor of lighting a lighter. She confirmed with occasional deep breaths that the other person, unfortunately, had not evaporated.

Since the ink did not dry out because he had just spilled it, it was not difficult to erase it. The spot where it was stained was a little darker than the other places, but she’ll just let it go.

Sally raised her body, unwrapped her crumpled skirt, and turned behind to face Winston. He was gazing at her with his hand lightly clenched against his slanted chin. Was he no longer smoking cigars? His right hand was under the desk and was not visible.

What was so interesting to see an ordinary maid routinely wiping carpet stains? The corners of his lips curled up slightly.

Where did his usual sharpness go? A strangely soft, sticky gaze fell from Sally’s face into her hands, which were carefully clasped together.

Did he take a drink? Though there was no water, let alone alcohol, on the desk.

“It’s all done. Do you need anything more?”

Winston nodded his head lightly.

So, was there something to be done or not?

Sally tilted her head slightly, and her gaze turned to the ashtray under his chin. An ashtray made of black marble lay in the ashes of a high-quality cigar that Winston had wasted a while ago.

‘I can go out with the excuse of emptying the ashtray.’

Thinking that, she walked over to Winston with a light foot and picked up the ashtray.

However, she hardened like stone.

It was because his hand, covered in thick tendons and veins, had slid slowly under the desk. The copper-colored object he held in his hand also had tendons and veins that stood out smoothly.

“Gasp!”

Bang.

The ashtray slid from Sally’s hand and fell to the edge of the desk.

Chapter 10
The black marble shattered, and shards splattered.

As soon as she closed her eyes reflexively and opened it, Sally regretted it. She shouldn’t have opened her eyes.

It was because Winston still had the copper-colored object in his hand.

At first, she thought he was holding a cigar. He was casually holding it in both hands, so it was really similar to ordinary things like a cigar, and the color and shape were similar.

However, could a cigar be as thick as Sally’s wrist?

He put the maid in the same room to do the cleaning, and it was creepy to know that he was masturbating in secret. But, what was even more creepy was the fact that he was holding his penis in his hands even after being caught.

‘This horny manic is really’

So far, calling Winston a maniac was half the truth and half as an insult. Though now, this moment had become an impeccably complete fact.

A maniac who needed to be put in a mental hospital right now.

Sally was holding back her tears.

For the cause of overthrowing the corrupt monarchy and making a more equal and fair world for all, she had taken on all kinds of dirty and filthy missions. Still, was looking at the enemy’s dirty and thick penis a sacrifice for that cause, too?

She even sensed a feeling of doubt she had never felt before.

If one day the monarchy was overthrown, she would chop it up with a guillotine.

“What’s the matter? It’s your first time seeing it?”

His questioning voice was clear. It was then that Sally realized that she had been unable to take her eyes off that awful ‘cigar’ and was startled. Raising her gaze to Winston’s face, he smiled with gentle curls of his eyes.

What was the difference between a neat smile and an unneat object?

That filthy bastard didn’t even look surprised. On the contrary, she felt like she had become a strange person instead. Between his smiling eyes, his pale blue eyes stared straight at her. Sally realized at that moment, that he was observing her reaction.

He was not caught masturbating. He was deliberately showing it to see how she behaved.

She didn’t know what the hell he was doing. It didn’t take a day or two for the royalists to try to identify the spies. Nonetheless, none of the tricks she had ever seen and heard of was pulling out their penis and showing it.

“I’m sorry, Captain!”

First of all, running away from the office was a priority. She turned her back from the carpet that had been messed up by the ashtray she had dropped and pretended not to know.

“If I give you money, you said you will do anything?”

Behind her back, the chair creaked.

Winston got up. As the sound of stepping on the soft carpet drew closer, her heart pounded with every blunt sound of his hard heels.

“I can do anything the captain wants.”

It was meant to tie up Winston, who was attacking her in heat. Instead, now, the noose was holding her.

“I don’t know what that ‘anything’ is.”

Although he whispered in a low voice like sharing a secret between the two of them, Sally listened carefully.

His lips were close enough to gently caress her earlobe. It wasn’t just the lips that were close. His chest pressed against her shoulders. Something was pressing on her back as well, but Sally didn’t want to know what it was.

“Can you show me?”

“What are you talking about?”

She asked, swallowing a gulp.

“You know what to do.”

Before she could say something, his long fingers wrapped around her forearm. He suddenly turned her body, and she had to face Winston. The tip of her nose was close enough to hit his chest. Sally lowered her head to cover her nose and then tightly closed her eyes.

Crazy guy. Crazy guy. Crazy guy.

‘Is he still holding that one out?’

“You don’t know?”

Sally shook her head swiftly and shut her eyes till her brow furrowed.

The corners of Leon’s lips, which were raised formed perfect symmetry. He grabbed the maid’s chin lightly and pressed her cheeks with his thumb and middle finger. At that, the soft flesh slipped in and her pink lips fluttered open.

Sally finally opened her eyes, and she made eye contact with him.

The eyes were the windows of truth. And, Leon tenaciously digs into the truth and lies through the mysterious turquoise eyes.

“I can do anything you want”

As Sally tried to close her mouth, he tightened his fingers on her cheeks even more. A thin moan escaped from her mouth, moist with saliva, making it even more difficult to take his eyes off the red hole.

Wouldn’t it be nice to get bitten by that sharp tooth and bleed?

Putting his index finger in her mouth, he pressed against her soft tongue. The woman flinched and tried her best to get away from him.

Brave woman.

At this point, she would cry for fear. However, her dry eyes were tearing off his fingers and chewing them up.

“I mean, have you ever put anything like this in your mouth with those dirty words?”

He swept up the object he was holding in his other hand.

As Leon took one step closer, the woman was startled and took a step back. If she touched it, it would spread illness and she would die.

“Your answer?”

The woman grabbed his wrist and whimpered like a puppy, then shook her head briefly. It was strangely unpleasant to gasp with her mouth open forcibly every time his penis caught her eye.

‘It doesn’t look like she’d ever done it.’

If she had ever sold herself for money, she wouldn’t close her eyes in horror when he asked her to show him what she could do.

Though he used some snarky method, he achieved it.

Leon smiled contentedly and took the strength from his hand. Because of that, Sally stumbled for a moment as he accidentally released her.

‘What the hell is he up to?’

Winston, on some whim, suddenly adjusted his clothes.

Her mind was so messed up that she forgot for a moment that she had to run when she saw a gap. She glared at Winston, wiping the saliva from her lips with her sleeve.

She had occasionally seen vulgar photos hidden under the mattresses of her male comrades. How disgusting it was to see the naked women in the photos with the men’s genitals in their mouths. She didn’t know how many were burned with a lighter.

Even though she had never seen anything like that under Winston’s bed in the annex, the other person was also a man. There was no way he’d be unaware of such a disgusting thing.

Consequently, she figured he would just grab her shoulder and press her down. So, when he pressed her shoulder, she would immediately try to kick between his legs.

A soldier who left his vital points in front of the enemy. How pathetic.

But, as soon as she said she had never done such a disgusting thing, he let her go, just like a person who did this absurd thing just to hear the answer.

In the end, she was caught by him.

Whether this maid has ever had a man or sold her body has nothing to do with him.

Winston turned around while he bucked his belt again. This time, the frightened maid tried to run away without even saying her greetings, though she was caught again.

“There.”

Sally secretly clenched her fist. She wanted to pound that sharp nose with her fists to make it a puffy, bulbous nose. Still, she couldn’t do it, so she released the power from her hand.

This time, instead of turning her around, Winston walked in front of her. In his hand was the handkerchief that had wiped Sally’s tears from the torture chamber at lunchtime.

Was he telling her to wash it?

She politely held out both hands to get it and leave, but the handkerchief was next to Sally’s lips, not her hand.

“Sally, you’re bleeding.”

The moment she broke the ashtray, she had a tingling in her cheek. Although all of her senses were paralyzed by what was happening before his eyes, she completely forgot that she was injured.

He wiped the wound with an uncharacteristically friendly hand. The sweeter Winston was, the more anxious she became.

His true form was far from sweet.

‘Hey, please come back to your original arrogant one. As you always do, shouldn’t I be treated as a consumable item for the mansion?’

He didn’t even know that Sally was staring at him. His gaze was fixed on the red stain on the silk handkerchief.

“I’ll wash it”

Sally raised her gaze as she held out her hand toward the handkerchief. The moment their eyes met, her intuition exclaimed.

Dangerous.

As Winston grabbed her chin, she stepped backward. His lips came straight up. Before their lips overlapped, she tried to turn her head in bewilderment.

Winston turned Sally’s head first. His lips touched her cheek. It was the wounded spot. Immediately, a stinging pain erupted as a soft mass of flesh soaked in warmth and moisture licked her skin. Hot breaths poured down her cheeks.

Sally froze as if she had been hit by a bitter winter storm.

He lifted his lips, but she was still frozen blank. The nickname vampire was by no means a metaphor. Winston’s breath grew heavy as he tasted her blood. It was quite different from the sound of his even breathing when he stroked his genitals in front of her a while ago.

His sharp eyes were also disturbed. He squeezed his eyes shut and bit his lower lip. Meanwhile, his adam’s apple went up and down once, and he sighed before vagina his eyes.

The eyes did not return.

Dangerous.


Chapter 11

“Captain, I”

“Sally, should I cut your lips next?”

He lifted the hand holding her chin and paused.

Don’t say he remembered? Does he know her true identity?

She had to be prepared for unforeseen circumstances. Sally put her right hand in the pocket of her skirt, cautiously so he wouldn’t notice.

“No, what am I talking about now? Right?”

“Captain!”

Sally was dragged near his chin with no room to resist.

“You can bite it yourself and cut it.”

As Camden’s vampire smiled, revealing his white teeth, Sally covered her mouth with her left hand. A scuffle broke out with the man who was about to remove her hand and swallow her lips.

No matter how hard she had been trained, it was impossible to defeat a military officer whose physique was exceptionally good with one hand. She wasn’t yet ready to use her last resort. So, eventually, Sally had to pull out her right hand from her pocket—the last resort she held, and mobilize it in the fight.

Winston grabbed her wrist as she tried to stab him in the eye. He then wrapped his arm around Sally’s waist and lifted her up.

The moment her body floated in the air and was placed on a hard object, Sally kicked, and the papers and pens neatly laid out on the desk fell onto the carpet.

Her foot slammed Winston’s chin as targeted, but he only grimaced for a moment.

“You fought well. Do you have any brothers? Or, where did you get your training?”

She stiffened as she twisted her ankle, which was caught by Winston. If she fought, her identity would be revealed. If she didn’t fight, she would have to sleep with that filthy royal pig.

Sally’s breathing was harsh as she searched for a way in her confused head. When she stopped her resistance, Winston smiled as he ran a few strands of her hair that had run down her forehead from the fight and moved it back.

Contrary to his calm demeanor, his body was even hotter, and the front of his trousers bulged even higher than before.

“I am still curious. What you and I can do.”

“Captain, please let me go.”

“Why? Oh, yes.”

Sally’s resolute refusal was taken lightly by Winston. His clean hands buried inside his officer’s jacket, then pulled out the black object and placed it on her chest, which was lying on the desk.

“I am a person who is sure of reciprocation.”

What he gave was a heavy wallet full of bills. He was a man who hated women who spread their legs in front of money, but why did he give her the money and force her to spread her legs?

Was his test not over yet

“Captain, it must have been about what happened during the day. I have someone to marry. I don’t want to betray him.”

Ignoring Sally’s pleas, his hand popped into the hem of her skirt and rolled up over her lap.

“Sally, the more you say that, the hotter it gets. You don’t know men No, you know me too well.”

“Captain! Stop—!”

It was when he was about to press on a sensitive point. His hand, which was running up her thigh, grabbed something, and Sally froze in fright. The light smile on Winston’s face disappeared in an instant.

“Whatis it?”

The object stuck under the band of the right stocking came out at once. Sally’s heart fluttered as the silver revolver exposed its muzzle outside her black skirt.

‘Calm down. You have to be calm.’

Winston held the revolver in front of him as Sally slowly raised her torso. The cold gaze of the absurdly small pistol in his hand turned over to her face.

“What is this, I asked.”

‘It’s a pistol.’

If she behaved like an idiot, his shallow patience might be completely exhausted today. After he lost his temper, even Winston wouldn’t know her fate.

“My fiancé gave it to me.”

“Your fiancé gave you a forbidden thing.”

After the monarchy was restored, civilians were not allowed to possess firearms unless they had special permission from the police or military. It was because they feared a second rebellion.

“What does he do? Is he like a back alley gangster?”

“He is not that kind of person. He is a good man.”

Winston’s sleek brow wrinkled as she sided with her fiance with a half-serious, half-plausible performance.

“Since I work in the torture chamber, it was dangerous, so he just wanted to help me from something dangerous. I know it’s forbidden, Captain. but”

“Dangerous Sally, no one will touch you in this mansion. I have given a strong warning.”

You are touching me.

Sally swallowed the words that filled her throat.

Winston’s right hand, standing inside the bloomer’s left edge, was still lightly gripping her bare skin.

“You must be the only one gutsy enough to disobey me.”

Was he talking about going into the torture chamber alone during the day? His lips raised and he smiled. But his eyes were not smiling.

“I’m sorry.”

Sally lowered her head, dropping her gaze like a gentle sheep. She was such a docile sheep that she seemed to have to live like that until the headquarters gave an order to evacuate.

Though she was suddenly startled when his thumb, buried in her bloomer, stroked the inside of her thigh once.

Was he going to attack her again? He was a human being who threatened to use illegal weapon possession more as an excuse. No, he was a human being who started attacking her without any excuse.

When she opened her eyes slightly and peered into his eyes, Winston’s gaze was fixed on the revolver. Soon, his five fingers slipped out of her bare skin, leaving a brisk fiery trail in her stockings.

However, it was too early to be relieved.

Winston peered into every nook and cranny of the revolver. He opened the revolver’s magazine, pulled out the bullet, checked it, and found that the serial number that was supposed to be engraved between the magazine and the barrel had been erased, and he grinned.

Sally’s heart beat faster.

“Have you ever shot it?”

She had used firearms countless times, so there was no way she didn’t know. That revolver was a well-maintained item. If she said she never shot it or that her fiancé gave it to her, so she only had it, he would immediately know it was a lie.

“A couple of times Having fun with cans”

“And?”

“I met a robber in town a month ago”

“Did you get him right?”

“Yeah”

Winston burst into a burst of excited laughter and then asked.

“What about me?”

“Yes?”

“Did you try to shoot me?”

Sally stared into his eyes, which flashed with cruel playfulness, and then nodded slowly and resolutely. Regardless, if she said no, he would know it was a lie.

“Ha”

Winston burst into laughter again, but it was different from the laughter he had just had before. Laughing and biting his lower lip, she could vaguely feel a look of embarrassment at being caught off guard.

“Me? How funny.”

Snap, the magazine is closed. There was still a slight embarrassment in the words he uttered in a comical tone.

“If you shoot, you die.”

“Yes.”

“I have no intention of killing you.”

Sally struggled to compose her grim look.

Although he was trying to scare her, he was also trying to give her life. Should she say thank you? She had tried to kill her master, so did he want her to apologize?

“I’m having fun, don’t you think it’s fun?”

The corners of Winston’s eyes and lips drooped down. Anyone who didn’t know what the other person was doing would have thought that this sullen puppy-like expression would suit his well-groomed face.

He didn’t ask for an answer anyway, so Sally kept her mouth shut and stared at him. She was just busy looking for a way to get out with her breath intact.

“I think it would be fun to stir with this.”

He raised the revolver’s muzzle up and swung it through the air.

“It’s too small. Well, you’re small, too.”

The meaningless words continued, yet her intuition shouted that he was going to do something dangerous.

“Captain”

Sally sniffed, clutching her two hands so that her wrinkled apron crumpled even more. She had to put up with anything, even if it was an unreasonable number. Immediately, her tears dripped down the back of her pure white hand.

“Are you crying again?”

There was a hint of tiredness in Winston’s voice.

“Am I getting kicked out now?”

The moment she deliberately distorted her face and raised her head, Winston wrinkled his brow. His hand, holding his muzzle up, gradually tilted to the floor.

It worked.

Her mother said so. Tears tactic wouldn’t work if she used it too often. However, it depends on how she defines the definition of ‘work.’

“Please, don’t, sniff—kick me, out.”

As he was wiping her tears with her sleeve, Sally peered to see that the front of Winston’s trousers was sinking. Seeing that, he sobbed and cried even more.

“Caaptaainn, huuuck”

It was not fun.

Leon looked at the woman crying like a child with cold eyes and let out a sigh of anger. She was acting like a child, so neither her disheveled clothes nor her legs dangling helplessly from the end of the desk looked strange.

She had to bite him till the end.

A cornered mouse was only fun when it tried to bite the cat. Losing her courage completely and squeaking was just a drag. He’d rather have her try to kill him when he said he was going to kill her.

The atmosphere cooled down as time was wasted with the teasing.

“Go.”

At the blunt command, the woman lifted her face buried in her sleeve.

Rounded eyes, red-tinted shades, and nostrils twitching from sniffling It was like a mouse that seized the opportunity.

‘Go for it. Run away from me.’

Leon smacked his lips quietly like a cat just before it attacked its prey.

Chapter 12
“Am I being kicked out?”

Something like a silly little mouse

A long sigh escaped the teeth that pressed his lower lip.

If she ran away as if she had waited for him to go, he would try to catch her and knock her down on the carpet because he would be tempted again. However, what if she asked him if she was going to be kicked out?

Sally would be so pathetic that even the slightest bit of interest had cooled off.

“I won’t kick you out. So, please go.”

“Th, thank you.”

The maid came down under the desk, hesitatingly thanking him. Leon walked over to the chair without paying attention and opened the desk drawer.

“The gun is confiscated.”

After putting the revolver in the drawer and closing it roughly, the maid turned her wrinkled face toward the door.

Leon leaned heavily against the heavy chair and sat down.

He repeated as he watched the maid slip out of the door like a mouse. In the first place, he was just letting her go for a while. It was fun to chase after she ran away, so he was just letting her go on purpose.

But, why didn’t it have a pleasant aftertaste, like a mouse that untangled the trap and ran away?

Glancing at the tightly closed door, Leon shifted his gaze to the desk that had been swept away by a storm. When the woman left and the fever went down, he felt pathetic that he had lost his mind like a rutting dog.

What was even about that lowly, wretched woman?

However, that didn’t last long.

The reason he lost his mind was that she had everything spread out on the desk. Leon picked up a silk handkerchief that had been lying around beside the wallet, which Sally had left behind. Because it was white, the red bloodstain in the middle stood out even more.

The moment the faint smell of blood awakened his sense of smell, his tongue remembered the taste.

The exhilarating taste of licking a cold muzzle, the dizzying smell of death stinging his nose, but the warmth and faint beat that shouts that it is still alive.

An old memory revived in his mind as he recalled the taste of the maid’s blood.

Now, it had faded to black and white, though only the girl’s dark brown hair, turquoise eyes, and red drops of blood on her lips were as clear as a colorful postcard from a resort.

A bitter smile engraved on Leon’s lips as he remembered the girl’s last cry.

His naive childhood ended on that day. The blood he tasted the first time he ran away from the tight duty of being the eldest son of the family—the bloody smell he smelled from his father, who met a tragic end the next day.

A brief vacation at Abbington Beach as a child completely changed the meaning of blood in his life.

Deviation.

It was a pity that his first deviance and his father’s last deviance had a bad ending. After that, Leon couldn’t resist the urge to taste the blood again.

“Dirty pig!”

The path had already been set before he was able to express his own will, but it was right to walk the path of a soldier. Deviations made for private interest soon become public achievements.

Should he thank a girl named Daisy?

Daisy.

It was a cute name that didn’t really suit her dark skin and bold temper.

Actually, Sally might be her real name. Every time he gazed into Sally’s eyes, he was skeptical. Although her skin color was much whiter than that of the girl, and brown hair was common, turquoise eyes were uncommon.

If Sally was that girl, he finally found the reason why he lost his temper and wanted to hang her on the hook and chain her slender neck with a chain.

Sally This name was too cute unbefitting her nerves.

Leon re-opened the drawer he had closed roughly.

A small revolver was placed next to a closet of medals his father had left behind. When he asked if she was about to shoot, without a moment’s hesitation, she nodded her head sternly. It was a fun woman to tease as she was without fear.

Recalling that, he smiled quietly and picked up the revolver.

When would she try to shoot?

Perhaps, it was when she was about to kick between his legs right before he found the gun?
Rather, since when did she make up her mind to shoot him? Every time she ran into him, was she slowly pulling out the muzzle stuck in the band of that old stocking?

Just before he was about to kiss her, he suddenly remembered Sally putting her right hand carefully in her pocket.

She was a fox pretending to be stupid A fox stupid enough to get caught.

Sally Bristol.

She was seemingly docile, though she hid dangerous things under a well-groomed skirt, and she was a dangerous maid who was thinking of shooting him. She was a brazen woman, yet she took money from him.

Among those under his command, she was the most selfish person while diligently doing what she was asked to do.

As he laid out the definitions one by one, it felt unnatural, like forcing different puzzles to fit together. So, why did he keep getting hung up on it?

Leon placed the silver revolver in the middle of the desk and lowered his hand to his waist. The belt buckle quickly unbuckled, and the buttons that were about to bounce off the front of the pants came out one by one from the narrow hole.

He wanted to take off the owner of that pistol. He wanted to look inside that woman as she was.

His hand, holding the handkerchief stained with the woman’s blood and tears, naturally turned downward. Soon, the sound of a soft cloth rubbing against his skin broke the silence of the office. A sweet sigh escaped between his smooth lips.

“Dirty pig!”

Would Sally curse him like that girl?

When she fell naked on the cold metal table in the torture chamber and her handcuffed arms and legs at the corners

He wished she hadn’t shrieked as she had just a moment ago, although screamed and howled with all her might, twisting her limbs and it echoing in the torture chamber.

It was sweet just imagining it.

Leon leaned his elbows against the armrests of the chair and clenched his chin, and glanced down. Dark watermarks appeared on the white cloth that wrapped around the copper-colored tip. The more he moved his hand, the more it spread and permeated the woman’s red traces.

Where should he start first?

Her mouth wouldn’t be bad.

Recalling his previous impressions, it was soft, moist, warm, and quite good. To be more honest, it was quite impressive that when he pressed her tongue with his index finger, she rather wrapped around his fingers and sucked it.

First, he would grab her chin to the side and shove himself between those tiny pink lips — Deep. Rough — Until her lips lose their pink color and turn blue. Her narrowed throat would squeeze and tighten as she swallowed a chunk of hard flesh instead of a soft breath.

What would be next?

Leon breathed, imagining the next place to be tormented, and moved even harsher. He hung his straight index finger in the knot of the black tie that was tightening his neck and pulled it loosely.

On his handkerchief, the clotted blood was oozing out with his liquid. Sally’s traces of blood, which spread out through the clear marks, clung to Leon’s most sensitive point. The mysterious smell of a mixture of a woman’s blood and his own fluid stimulated his sensitive sense of smell.

He gave strength to his hand, rubbing the handkerchief, imagining Sally’s blood dripping onto his genitals.

Was the flesh that blocked the narrow path pink like the lips?

If he held her thin waist with both hands and aligned the tip of his manhood with the flesh, she would cry out. She would try to close her legs that couldn’t be closed because of the handcuffs, without knowing how lascivious she was shaking her breasts

Then, he would suggest to her, generously, if she begged him to quit, she could quit.

When that happened, would she tremble and beg with all kinds of flattery right now?

In fact, he would pull her back down suddenly, saying there was no need for such a thing. If he tore through the flesh at once with his body, Sally would pour all kinds of curses on him with the mouth that was begging.

Would the texture be as good as her mouth? Leon clenched his hand and recalled the moment he stirred her mouth.

He was going to put it all in one go in those moist walls until a gasp of breath escaped between Sally’s torn lips.

He would slowly, very slowly, pull out the genitals buried in its hot flesh to the tip of its roots. Let the copper-colored skin be dyed with a beautiful blood color.

“Ha”

Leon let out a sigh as the white and cloudy liquid burst out, and soaked in bloodstains. It wasn’t just a feeling of relief that he had resolved the desire that had been bothering him all day.

“Didn’t I say that you’re annoying because you’re nice?”

The woman had misunderstood the meaning of his words that she was annoying. Still, it was annoying that she couldn’t be put in the torture chamber because she was nice.

He couldn’t quite get it right.

No matter how infamous a torturer he may be, he had his own principles. First, women were not tortured. Second, he would not bring an innocent person to the torture chamber.

It was a problem for Sally to get caught up in both of these principles.

Even if you grab and tear off the leg of a worker ant carrying a piece of bread that was diligently walking its way, and by the time the third leg got torn off, it would become dull. It was no different from unilaterally torturing a good child.

‘In order to be punished, there must be a crime worthy of it.’

Picking up the revolver that had been placed on the desk as if it was a lewdly painted picture. Even though illegal possession of firearms was also a clear sin, it was because it was such a trivial sin that he would not use it as an excuse.

Since the ban was less than a century ago, there were still many people caught by the police for carrying firearms for self-defense as was the old custom. His mother must have been hiding a female revolver in one of her many hat boxes.

Sally, do something worse

Because I want to teach you a lesson.

Chapter 13
“Should I have let you shoot?”

Leon put the revolver back into the drawer and closed it. He didn’t lock it with a key.

Stealing would be a slightly bigger sin. Besides, disobeying the master might be a felony within the walls of this mansion. Could it be an excuse to break the rules and drag her to the torture chamber?

Thinking that, he twisted his lips and narrowed his eyes sharply.

Bloodstains that were fading caught his gaze.

Perhaps, it was not the eyes. Maybe it was just the smell of blood. So, even if she was another woman, would he be so lustful if she smelled of blood?

That was a hell of a taste.

He smiled bitterly and stood up. The carpet was a mess of shards and ashes from the shattered ashtray. Tomorrow morning the maid would clean up this mess with grumbles towards him.

Leon unrolled a ‘message’ of encouragement to the maid and dropped it on the carpet.

 


 
The sun shone softly through the wooly clouds. Her dark brown hair fluttered in the wind, gleaming in the shattering sunlight.

It was a perfect day to go out.

April’s weather was as unpredictable as the Winston’s though, although she didn’t know what kind of whimsical it would bring. It was a ten-minute bike ride from the Winston Mansion to Halewood, the nearest town.

Sally parked her bike in front of a three-story brick building past the general store with a large discount sign.

Just when the lunch break was over, she met the post office manager who was turning the “closed” sign hanging on the window to ‘open.’ A middle-aged man raised his glasses with his index finger and gave her a glance before vagina the door right away.

“Good afternoon, Miss Bristol.”

“Hello.”

Sally stopped as she stepped inside.

The post office in this small town had four employees, including the director, but today, for some reason, there were only three.

“Is it Mister Peter’s have a day off?”

“The postal train is late today, so he’s at the station.”

Peter spent the whole day in the village disguised as a postman, although he always eats lunch here. Because of that, she purposely came on time but apparently not today.

Then, she brought the money she got from Winston yesterday to send to headquarters for military funds. She entrusted the remittance to Peter, and he made it untraceable. For other employees, it was risky to disclose the addressee, even with disguised information.

“If you wait a minute, he’ll be there soon, haha.”

As Sally gripped the straps of her old bag and sighed, the postmaster grinned as he rubbed his long mustache with his fingertips. The people at the post office thought Sally had a rosy crush on Peter.

No way.

Even though she behaved modestly because of her duties, her eyes on men were not that simple either.

‘Shall we spend some time, then?’

Two buildings from here, she would find Madame Benoa’s Cafe. It had been a long time since she wanted to indulge in a little luxury.

As a middle-aged woman dragged three of her young children into the cramped post office, it soon became noisy with the voices of the woman and the children. Sally was about the leave, but she went into the corner phone booth.

She closed the door tightly and squinted out the small window in the door. They were all busy with their business, so they didn’t even look at her this way. Draping her butt on the chair in her corner, she found the purse in her bag and opened it.

She didn’t just take one, two, or three biggest coins.

She sighed as she was about to pick up the four. Normally, Sally didn’t make long-distance calls because it was expensive. Still, this was important, so she couldn’t help it.

She picked up the earpiece that seemed like the bottom of a candlestick, put it to her ear, and put money into the coin slot. As soon as she turned one of the dials, the chirping voice of a young woman resounded in her ears.

[ This is a long-distance call. ]

“Hello. This is Halewood’s Blackburn.”

Sally leaned over to the speaker on the phone.

Blackburn The name the operator would pass on to the other person meant a withdrawal request.

“Please, call Crawford 1499 in Brayton.”

Subsequently, she gave the name of the area and the name of the exchange company of the other party.

[ Please wait a moment. ]

After the operator’s voice, there was only a mechanical clicking sound that continued for a long time.

At the same time, she sneaked out of the booth nervously.

The woman who had brought her children started chatting with the woman behind the desk as if she would not leave even after all her parcels had been sent. Seeing that, Sally hoped that she would keep the place noise for the next ten minutes.

‘Yes, it’s worth kicking her ass.’

Although she spent an hour alone arguing with the chatter that faintly leaked into the booth, she couldn’t hear her partner’s voice. Rubbing her hand on the bag strap that had faded due to scratches here and there, someone came into the post office door.

Just as she raised her head, thinking it was Peter, she heard a familiar voice.

[ Halewood’s Blackburn? ]

Without asking who it was, Sally’s fiancée recited the code for the withdrawal request.

“That’s right.”

[ What? You? ]

He was a bit surprised since he was expecting Peter or Fred’s voice in Halewood.

[ What’s going on? ]

He went to the point without saying a greeting to his fiancée, whom he had not heard from in a long time. Since the operator may still be listening to the call, a conversation that obscured everything without calling a name followed.

“I want to go home.”

Jimmy would know. He would know that sarcastic tone was just a disguise because Sally never acted like a child.

[ What’s the matter? What about mother’s hospital bills? ]

The phrase ‘mother’s hospital bills’ had to be changed to ‘your mission.’

“The employer is weird.”

[ Weird? What are you talking about? ]

“Did you forget what I said before I came here?”

She couldn’t have forgotten that she warned that Winston would pierce her ear for her encounter with Winston at Abbington Beach as a child.

A long sigh was heard over the receiver.

[ But, you haven’t been cut yet. ]

He meant she was not cut yet because she wasn’t arrested.

“I might be cut soon.”

[ No. You’re good. There would be no evidence anyway. Is it not so? ]

This time Sally let out a long sigh on the speaker.

[ I need you. ]

Jimmy knew very well what his fiancée was weakest to in words. After all, they grew up together from when she was a baby, so she was like his real sibling.

“Still”

Sally took a deep breath before stopping. She didn’t want to tell anyone—no, she didn’t want to tell her fiancé more than anyone else Nonetheless, she had to.

After a momentary hesitation, she shut her eyes tightly and let a breath out.

“Yesterday, he tried to attack me.”

A silence continued on the other side of the receiver. What thoughts were going through his mind right now, five hours away by train?

Worried about his lover who almost got raped? A determination to get her out of Winston’s filthy grasp right away? Anger at the filthy beast who tried to assault his fiancé?

Perhaps, disappointment for a comrade who ruined the operation by being impure in the eyes of the target?

[ Really? ]

It was all wrong. Sally burst into anger.

“Would I lie about this?”

[ No, you know that’s not what I meant. With the person I know it doesn’t fit. ]

There was no way Jimmy, the leader of the Revolutionary Army, was unaware of Winston, a first-class state figure’s characteristics. The consistent information was that even though he was a man of filthy manners, his lower body was clean.

That was why he put his fiancé into Winston’s stronghold safely.

However, it was the first time a statement that contradicted the consistent information came out of Sally’s mouth. Aside from disappointment, she knew well that it was something that was hard to believe at once.

She added some more to Jimmy to add to a sense of urgency.

“I lost what I hid under my skirt.”

[ But, you’re not cut off? ]

“That’s why it’s even more dangerous.”

Only Winston treated her differently. She couldn’t quite predict what was going to happen next.

Sally pondered, waiting silently for Jimmy’s answer.

Should she tell him something else? It wasn’t enough that Winston had sucked her blood yesterday, so he left on the office floor evidence of him pleasuring himself with a handkerchief that had wiped her blood.

Even though he was a fiancé who was like her family, this story was too humiliating for her.

“I don’t have time.”

It was because the phone bill would run out soon.

A heavy sigh was heard over the receiver, and Jimmy gave the order in a voice calling for his lover.

[ I’m going to my friend’s house. I’ll talk to some adults and call you. ]

It meant he had to discuss it with the executives, so he told her to wait in a safe house in Winsford which was an hour by tram from here.

Sally immediately hung up the phone and walked out of the booth. Should she send the money next time? Peter hadn’t come back yet, anyway.

In the end, she greeted the postmaster and headed out of the post office.

Chapter 14
On the way to the tram stop, she stopped by Madame Benoa’s cafe.

“Pack this and this, please.”

Due to her tight pocket conditions, two pieces of cake at a high-end cafe were unreasonable. However, she wanted to give Fred’s older sister and childhood friend, Nancy, who works in the safe house, a little luxury.

The bike was tied to a pole at the tram stop and loaded onto the tram heading to Winsford. As she sat by the window and looked out, the idyllic landscape of sheep grazing soon turned into a gigantic factory area emitting black smoke.

It was once an apple orchard.

Although the landlord cut down all the apple trees a decade ago and sold them to an auto parts company.

As technology advanced, those who owned the land became richer and those who farmed the land became poorer. After being kicked out of the farm and working intensively without seeing sunlight for dozens of hours in a factory, the meager wages they get are usually wasted as medicine.

The building that passed in front of her slowly rose. The gap between the rich and the poor, which was inconspicuous in small rural villages, became more pronounced as it approached large cities.

Sally got off the tram when she saw the grand opera house.

Walking through the crowd busily on her way, she came across a large department store. A young woman, with colorful sable fur over her shoulders, unsuitable for the mild weather, was walking towards the sidewalk taxi stop, holding the hand of a boy about ten years old.

In the child’s hand was a train set that was recently made famous by the youngest prince as a gift from a foreign royal family. A boy of the same age standing by the side of the road was glancing at it with unfocused eyes.

A piece of cardboard was hung from the neck of the child, with coal soot smeared on the child’s face.

Seeing that, Sally took some of the bills from her money, which she was going to send as a military fund, and handed it to the child.

The child widened his eyes, though he did not take the money willingly.

“What’s going on?”

It meant giving a large sum of money without any bargaining to get the child to do something tough.

“I’m just giving.”

Blinking his eyes like a frightened puppy, he slowly reached out his hand, blackened under the fingernails.

The kindness that he did not expect was rather terrifying.

Swish.

The money was snatched from Sally’s hand. As soon as the child grabbed the money, he ran away without a thank you. He was running away because the stranger might change his mind and ask for the money back or drive him as a thief.

Distrust was not just confined to the child’s mind.

On the other hand, she also had to leave quickly. It was because the child could have a bad heart, drag bad guys in, and rob her instead. She had to be more careful now that she didn’t have a gun.

In the end, she decided to use the department store as a detour.

Ahead of Easter, the department store was decorated in a cute and colorful way, like a fairy tale world.

‘Come to think of it, I have to buy stockings’

The stockings that Winston ripped yesterday because he couldn’t just make a hole in them are useless now.

Sally approached the shelf where the stockings were displayed. The clerk, who was counting on the ledger lifted the corner of her eye, which had been pulled out with black eyeliner, slightly to look at her before glancing down at the book again.

The clerk’s eyes were not wrong. The luxury stockings in the department store were not for her.

Sally pretended she didn’t like the stockings that she had picked up, so she let them go and turned away. On her way back to the mansion, she would need to see if there were rayon stockings on sale at Halewood’s general store.

As soon as she turned the corner, she suddenly stopped.

It was because of the reflection of her humble self in the glass. An old light gray cardigan, a white blouse with an unembroidered round collar, a navy pleated skirt to the knee, and a worn brown leather bag

Standing behind the glass was a mannequin dressed in a gorgeous dress, perhaps ten times her weekly wage, making her look modest and shabby.

“Don’t grow up prettily. Don’t even decorate yourself prettily. Don’t let anyone see you.”

Her mother’s voice resounded in Sally’s head as she had been imagining herself in that gorgeous dress.
‘After all, I’m not the kind of beauty that makes all the men on the street look back at me like my mother.’

It was the Revolutionary Army community that raised Sally, as her mother was away for a long time due to her mission. Occasionally, she came back to the house once in a while, and she pretended to be asleep when she was back.

It was because if she was awake, her mother was always hard on her in front of others. Sitting on her bed, she would stroke her hair when she fell asleep. It was a gentle touch that she would not normally feel.

“Don’t grow up prettily. Don’t even decorate yourself prettily. Don’t let anyone see you.”

Her mother always repeated the same words like a mantra. Those words were not just meaningless monologues of drunkenness, so when someone bought Sally cosmetics or pretty accessories, she hated them and even threw them in the trash.

Even when her father bought her a red lipstick for Sally’s fifteenth birthday, she was so enraged that she even threw the wine glass at him.

When she was young, she was sad, too. Her mother’s dresser drawer was full of colorful cosmetics, and her closet was full of expensive dresses and shoes that she didn’t know where the money came from.

‘Then, why did you do that to me?’

Even though she wanted to ask that, her mother was not of this world.

Whatever the reason, it did not change the fact that her mother was a great Revolutionary Army member.

‘You are a great Revolutionary Army member, too.’

Sally looked down at her reflection in the glass and smiled faintly. Riding her bike, she combed her hands neatly through the tangled hair a little.

This was the path she had chosen.

 


 
A very heavy silence settled in the sedan that had left Winsford’s western headquarters and started running toward Govurn.

A low voice mixed with laughter broke it.

“At this rate, I’ll only have bones.”

Leon turned his gaze outside his car window to his superior, Colonel Humphrey, who sat in the seat next to him. There was no need to ask whom he was talking about. Even in his mind, the Western commander was already screaming at the site of Govurn’s attack with a sullen face.

“Moderate weight loss is good for your health.”

“If only I could live longer.”

The fact that the driver and the mistress turned out to be rebel spies meant that the commander’s future was on a precipice.

Nevertheless, while escorting one of the spies to the camp, they were attacked by the rebels and missed. The convoy also suffered casualties. If the commander was summoned to the royal court, the reprimand he would face was doubled.

The commander had lost his modesty and dignity as a soldier and was left with only greed. Leon was always disgusted, but these days, he seemed pitiful.

“I’d like to see Harris’ face.”

The lieutenant colonel laughed, mentioning the commander of the convoy. The intelligence agency in charge of the lieutenant colonel was not responsible for this incident, so he was laughing like a stranger.

But, could he say it like it was someone else’s business?

Leon stared sharply at the back of Lieutenant Campbell’s head in the passenger seat.

How did he know that the destination was Govurn?

They didn’t dispatch personnel to follow the convoy and hit it. While waiting on the outskirts of Govurn, a convoy was attacked. The raid was organized and meticulous. Consequently, this meant that they knew in advance when the convoy would take place

Information leaked out somewhere.

This may not be the first time.

A few months ago, the person who was discovered as a double agent was eliminated in just two days. In the end, doubts turned into certainty. Of course, the information could have leaked from the convoy or other divisions of the command.

‘Though what if?’

If anyone under his command had informed them, his path would be precipitous.

‘That won’t do.’

He wasn’t naive enough to just hope it wasn’t. He had to find it and bury it before the superiors could find it. It meant that the body of the person who reported it should also be buried somewhere after asking the subordinate to inform him of it.

‘Campbell?’

Leon softened his gaze as he stared at Campbell’s back.

That person couldn’t do that.

After all, the Campbells were vassals of the Winstons for hundreds of years. Now that their vassal status was gone, they were running a military business with the help of the Winstons. Lieutenant Campbell was a dog that Leon handcrafted from the Campbell family that he could play to his heart’s content.

‘I have to give you orders.’

After arriving at Govurn, he was planning to give instructions if the lieutenant colonel was absent. Keep track of the latest trends in the soldiers stationed in the annex and the latest development in the domestic intelligence department Leon is in charge of.

‘And’

Leon’s pupils, who inadvertently turned his head out of the window, widened in an instant.

‘Why is that woman over there?’

Chapter 15
The maid was standing on the crowded sidewalk.

In the midst of a large crowd of people rushing by, the woman was rummaging through her brown handbag, unknown what she was doing. He wouldn’t have recognized her if he hadn’t thought that her back was strangely familiar as she didn’t wear her usual black maid outfit and her hair, which was always pulled up, was also loose.

‘It’s annoying because it’s nice.’

Leon’s brow furrowed. The woman took her bills from the handbag and handed them to the beggar in front of the department store.

‘I heard your mother’s hospital bills aren’t enough?’

She spent money on beggars when she wore holed old stockings.

‘You’re so relaxed?’

What he did at lunchtime today was about to become pathetic.

“A beauty that makes you turn your head.”

The lieutenant colonel suddenly spoke, and Leon straightened his head, which he had turned without realizing it.

“Have you seen a pretty girl?”

“No.”

“You know how to behave well, but are you in your prime? Like a bee in a jar of honey, you will be twisted by a beautiful woman. You better be careful, so you don’t end up like the commander.”

Well Leon was sure he wouldn’t be like the commander because he was not a pathetic bastard who couldn’t recognize a spy and just liked the smell of a female.

“At my time, a naughty blonde fox squirmed around”

The lieutenant colonel bit his mouth all of a sudden. It was only now that he remembered that Leon was the son of the man who had lost his life after being deceived by that blonde fox.

“That woman, she died a few years ago. Did you hear?”

“Yes.”

“I’m sorry. For what she did, she got it too easy.”

The lieutenant colonel rummaged through his jacket pocket and pulled out a cigar case. He muttered, biting off the end of the cigar.

“Leon”

Calling in a friendly way as if Leon was his son, he offered him a cigar. Leon was polite enough to not be offended by the lieutenant colonel. Then, the thick hand holding the cigar tapped his shoulder and backed away.

“Catch that woman’s children and show her example in hell. Even Major Winston in Heaven will be proud of you.”

The woman had two children with the surname Riddle, the ‘royal family’ of the rebels. The eldest son, like ‘Little Jimmy’, was expected to take over his father’s footsteps and lead the leadership, but as soon as both his parents died, he turned his back on the rebels.

He had given up all the power and wealth that was given to the top officials and becomes a farmworker in a rural area. Although he disguised himself, it didn’t take long for Leon to track him down and find him.

The rat must be caught But, what about the apostate rat?

People were only attached to watch him because the leader of the rebels or his younger sister would one day approach him so that the rat released could attract more rats.

“If Little Riddle is caught, it will be worth watching. There are over ten people in the West alone who are grinding their teeth on Riddle’s rats.”

Of the infamous Riddle’s rats, there was now only one left.

Little Riddle.

The real name, appearance, and age have not been revealed.

So far, whenever he questioned the rebels, he had not forgotten and asked about the last Riddle, though none of them said anything. It seemed that the rebel leader, whom he did not know who he was, was more scary than the torture engineer standing in front of them with a blunt-bladed nipper.

What the hell was she like?

So, the military called the mysterious woman Little Riddle, which meant ‘a small mystery.’

If she resembled her mother, was she a beauty with blonde hair and hazel eyes? She was probably just as cunning and vicious as her mother. Perhaps, she must be selling herself to military officers somewhere to get information.

 


 
She slipped out the back door of the department store and walked through a cobweb-tangled alley. The other side of the colorful downtown was gray. It was followed by shabby buildings inhabited mainly by the poor working class. Only the sound of Sally’s shoes echoed through the empty alley.

No one looked at her until she reached the red brick building in the back alley.

For the people here, even being curious about the lives of others was a luxury. They went to work before sunrise and returned only after sunset. That was why they put a safe house in such a backward and underdeveloped place.

If the safe house were in a place where the middle class lives, it would be easily detected.

There would always be people who ran out and looked out the window to find out what gossip was in the neighborhood. It was the worst location in the house where other faces had no choice but to come and go.

Sally stood in front of the black door with the paint peeling off and rang the doorbell.

[ Get away, you motherfucker. ]

Rough words came out of the speaker. Hearing that, she twisted her brow slightly.

“Nancy, it’s me.”

[ Ah ]

The speaker went off with a click, and footsteps were heard running down the stairs from behind the door.

Soon, the door swung open and brown eyes peered into her.

Nancy grabbed Sally inside and dragged her inside after reaffirming that she was her friend.

“I thought they were the neighborhood kids again There are guys these days who have fun ringing the doorbell and running away.”

As Sally followed her up the old stairs, the house overlooking the alley on the right on the third floor was inside.

Even during the brief time she came down to open the door, Nancy kept the door firmly locked. She walked through the small living room and into the kitchen, and before entering, she would put the locks back on one by one.

“What’s going on? Do you have a day off?”

“Yes.”

While Nancy prepared the cake she had brought on the little table, she turned on the radio that was placed on the wall shelf. Immediately, a brilliant trumpet playing came out and covered the sound of the two of them.

Whoever was behind the thin walls would not be able to overhear the conversation.

“Actually, Jimmy decided to call me over here.”

“Why? What’s going on?”

To withdraw.

Then, she would ask why she wanted to withdraw. Sally was worried that the reason might accidentally get into the ears of Fred, Nancy’s younger brother and Winston’s subordinate. She still didn’t know what she was going to do because he was an immature guy.

“It’s no big deal.”

“Hmm. But, what is this?”

Nancy frowned and tapped her fingertips next to her lips. Sally, noticing that she was referring to the scar on her cheek, frowned and turned her back.

“I was scratched at work. Do you have coffee more than that?”

Soon, the two chatted in front of a steaming mug and two pieces of cake. Sally cut the cake with a fork and put it in her mouth.

An almond cake filled with vanilla custard cream between cake sheets topped with caramelized almond slices.. This cake was the culprit that made her salivate even just by the name of Madame Benoa. She admired the taste of the sweet clouds melting in the fragrant sunlight.

“Isn’t it fantastic?”

“Is it a wonder that such a talented person is hiding in such a corner?”

Nancy tasted the other cake topped with raspberry jelly and nodded her head.

“It’s because of the Winston family. Every time they have a party, they put in a lot of orders.”

“Oh, by the way, how is Fred doing?”

“Yes, I don’t think it’s a big deal.”

She didn’t tell her yesterday that he almost got whipped by Winston.

“Ugh, I’m worried about that guy because he’s timid.”

“Though He must have been shocked by Uncle Bobby.”

She remembered Fred running out of the torture chamber a few days ago, where his uncle’s screams echoed. His face was so pale blue. Sally later went so far as to ask how he was holding up with this every time she was alone.

“Still, what about uncle? How is he?”

“How is it? The elite troops went to the rescue.”

Nancy smirked as she waved her hand as if seeing she was worried for nothing.

“Where is he now?”

“Inside Billford’s safe house.”

“Is he okay?”

She suddenly asked as if she remembered.

Her scornful eyes stared at her, asking if he had any leaked information. She felt uncomfortable because it seemed as if she had left a residue of a misunderstanding with a man she had not seen for a long time.

“Oh, no. I’ll have to make a call.”

“The long-distance is expensive, so keep it short.”

“I know.”

Sally went out to the living room and sat down on the sofa.

Then, she rummaged through an old notebook hidden under the sofa cushions, looking for the code of Billford’s safe house. Eventually, she immediately picked up the receiver from the phone placed on the coffee table.

The operator’s voice and mechanical clicking sound were boring. That was not enough, she could only hear Uncle Bobby’s voice only after she heard a bunch of nagging from the aunt who was in charge of the house, that it was no rush.

“Uncle, it’s me. How is your body?”

[ Oh, yes. Now that I’m alive, I must say it’s worth living. ]

Although the voice over the receiver was a little murky, there was a return of vitality that she couldn’t feel in the torture room.

“That’s fortunate.”

[ Thank you for your concern. ]

“Absolutely. You are like my family.”

No matter how accustomed she was to this sort of thing, Sally had a warm heart. She couldn’t be happier that the mission had forced her to face hardships soberly.

“Then, take a good rest, recover your health quickly. And, when you return to the house, say my hello to Aunt Hattie”

Uncle Bobby abruptly interrupted her as she was saying goodbye to hang up the phone.

What was the point of calling her real name rather than her disguised name, even with a very low voice?

“Yes?”

[ Are you playing the role of the devil’s mistress? ]

Chapter 16
“What?”

Sally was momentarily speechless at his astonishing speculation. Perhaps, it was because Winston was friendly with her in the torture chamber, and it got misunderstood?

“Uncle, there’s no way I can do that with that filthy bastard.”

[ Isn’t that the order from above? ]

“You know that such a task cannot be given from the upper level, even my fiancée.”

[ . ]

“Uncle.”

[ Are you in touch with Joe? ]

He asked if she had contact with her brother, who had left the comrade out of nowhere. Even though he was a family to Sally, he was a traitor to his comrades.

While she couldn’t answer and hesitated, the uncle made a request that she couldn’t understand.

[ Go to Joe. Then, don’t come again. ]

Sally didn’t know why he hung up the phone. She put the handset back in place and stared at the stain in the corner of the coffee table.

Maybe, it was because uncle’s mind and body got weak after he was tortured, or did she make the embarrassing mistake of standing shoulder to shoulder with her comrade? To leave them and never come back, she, who only knew revolution and comrades.

She thought about the uncle’s words blankly, then a bang on the wall saying the radio was noisy from next door made her spirit come to life.

Sally and Nancy chatted all afternoon over a cold coffee.

Nonetheless, fragments of the uncle’s words were still floating around in her head. When it was a time when a new topic of discussion fell and traced back to her childhood memories, finally, the phone rang.

“It took a long time.”

[ I’m sorry, but I’ll have to put the withdrawal on hold. ]

“Why? Is it dangerous?”

Sally burst into anger at the unexpected reply. He continued his word in a rather heavy voice without appeasing her.

[ Instead, you’re given a new mission. As always, I believe you will do well. ]

“What?”

[ I want you to listen calmly without getting angry. And, don’t forget that I love you. ]

As she listened to Jimmy’s words, Sally nervously twisted the wire on the handset and wet her dry lips. Was it a mission to die for?

“If it is worthwhile, I am willing to give my life honorably. So tell me.”

[ I want you to approach him. ]

Sally’s head tilted.

Approach him — Was it an illusion that his instructions sound strange?

“I don’t know what you mean. Am I not still doing that?”

Sally’s fiancé let out a long sigh and muffled his voice.

[ Did I say to see you as a woman? ]

At that moment, the pencil in her hand broke in two.

Beauty The revolutionary army does not use such dirty tricks.

“Are you out of your mind?”

As she raised her voice, she could hear the sound of a chair being pulled away from the kitchen. It looked like Nancy was coming this way.

[ You know this is a rare opportunity. It’ll be of great help in stopping him. Important information can also be accessed more easily. Besides, it’ll be easier to deal with when he’s useless someday. ]

“Nonsense.”

[ I don’t mean to sleep with him. ]

Sally smirked as she wiped her face down.

“Then? What do you mean if I don’t go that far?”

The moment she brought the receiver to her lips and scolded him, Nancy walked out of the kitchen. Sally turned her back from her friend, who leaned against the door frame with a worried face and wrapped her hand around the receiver.

[ It’s not like that. Avoid as much as you can and try to persuade him. Hopefully, you can control him. ]

“How am I going to avoid it? He’s not a normal thinker. How do I control him Are you talking about people like us?”

[ I don’t have time to argue. You don’t have to send money from now on. You will need it. ]

It meant buying the necessary cosmetics and clothes to seduce Winston on a weekly basis.

“What? I don’t need it. Why did you change like this? You’ve never used such a dirty trick before.”

[ You are too idealistic. Sometimes, I’m not sure if you really are my lifelong friend. ]

“What do you mean?”

[ I mean, I need confidence that you’ll understand whatever I tell you. Our job is dirtier, more painful, and more disgraceful than you think. Occasionally, it takes a painful dedication. ]

The more her fiancé continued to speak, the more Sally’s face changed from moment to moment.

[ You don’t think this is an excessive sacrifice, do you? Many people lose their lives, although I hope you are not just protecting yourself. ]

“You are my fiancé No, how can you say that when you know how serious I am about this?”

[ Please, understand that this was a difficult decision, too. You did that to me — Like your parents did, you want to become close comrades with me. Don’t forget, I love you. ]

Jimmy knew well what his fiancé was weakest in words.

Sally bit her lip as he drew the decisive card.

“I’ll hang up. I have to go before the train cuts off.”

It was still a bit early for the train to stop. However, as soon as Sally hung up the phone, she ran out of the safe house because she knew Nancy would ask her what was going on.

While walking towards the tram stop, stomping her feet as if to vent her anger on the innocent street, she could see the department store where she gave the boy money. She then stopped her steps.

Sally grabbed her bag and pondered for a moment before she crossed the boulevard and entered the post office.

There were already people lining up in the lobby of the post office, which was incomparably larger than that of Halewood’s, waiting for their turn. As the deadline approached, the post office workers were busy playing with their hands and did not pay attention to the customers who had just arrived.

She took the round sunglasses out of her bag and put them on. The black scarf was also tightly wrapped around her head and chin to cover her wounds before she stood at the end of the line.

After waiting for about thirty minutes, it was her turn. The gilt-rimmed employee glanced up at her and asked rudely.

“How can I help you?”

“I want to send money.”

Sally pulled out the wad of cash from her bag. The employee raised an eyebrow at the amount before giving her a piece of paper and a pen to write the sender and payee information on. While the man was counting the bills, she twisted the pen.

Remittances she sent through someone other than Peter may be tracked. Regardless, it was difficult to find the sender in a post office in such a bustling metropolis.

Filling out the application form, she handed it to the staff.

The long-scrambled addressee’s name was not Jimmy’s, though her brother’s. Meanwhile, Jimmy’s words echoed in her head again as she watched the staff busily moving his fingers over the typewriter.

[ You don’t have to send money from now on. You will need it. ]

Forget it. She didn’t need it.

In the end, the money taken from Winston was not used for the military funds of the headquarters or for Sally’s funds.

Her nephew, who she didn’t even know the face, would be able to spend a happy Easter that was a little comforting.

Even though she still wanted to go around because she still felt like it, now that she didn’t have a gun anymore, it would be dangerous for her to wander the dark night streets alone.

On her way back to the mansion from Halewood, her hair and clothes were wet and droopy from April’s whimsical showers. What could be more suitable for her to feel heavy and droopy?

Sally dragged her bike into the mansion’s employee-only back door. As the sun went down, the lights were dimming in the dark garden. She turned her back to the main building, where the bright lights were pouring out, and she walked towards the ugly annex.

Upon entering through the annex wall, it seemed that Winston’s car was not there.

She put her bike in the backyard shed and looked up, but the lights in the office and bedroom were also off.

He was not back yet?

The revolver, which was still ‘confiscated’ in the office drawer, flashed through her mind for a moment. Despite that, Sally immediately shook her head. He always locked the drawer, but he didn’t lock it today. He couldn’t have forgotten

That was a trap that was deliberately left open to steal.

With that thought, Sally let out a long sigh as she climbed the steps of the annex to the attic. She couldn’t even get a new gun.

Wherever she hides, Winston’s dirty hands will find it.

Tonight, for what reason was he going to call her to do some dirty work?

Rescue operations, bombing, robbing the royal family. She had taken on all kinds of challenging missions, however, this was the first time she felt like escaping.

‘Damn Jimmy Are you still my fiancé?’

Nevertheless, it was she who wanted to live with him as comrades, just like her parents.

‘But, this is not really the case.’

Sally stopped at the door of the maid’s room, pondering the contents of the call. A shopping bag from the department store she went to today was hanging on the doorknob.

No way, was Winston here?

Chapter 17
She glanced around and looked inside the maid’s room, but there was no one.

After Sally entered and locked the door, she glared at the luxurious shopping bag as if it was a ticking time bomb. After she pondered over and over again, she finally opened and squinted her eyes.

‘What kind of whim is this again?’

The first thing she took out was an ointment in a small box.

It was to apply to wounds on the face.

Since when did Winston pay so much attention to the wounds of a maid? Just in the mansion kitchen, there are a lot of maids who cut their hands, and he should send it there. He was not a normal thinker, so it wouldn’t mean an apology. What kind of trick was this?

Putting put the ointment box in the drawer and going through the shopping bag, inside were twelve flat, square boxes.

A vicious sigh escaped Sally’s mouth as she opened a box with a colorful pattern on it.

Silk stockings.

It was three times more expensive than what Sally picked up and placed this afternoon. It also contained three pairs of each color: black, white, brown, and peach.

Jimmy’s absurd command repeated in her mind as she stared at the twelve bomb boxes lying on her bed.

“Please don’t do this.”

 


 
A hum came out of Sally, who was cleaning out Winston’s annex dressing room. Govurn’s rescue operation was going to be an unexpected good fortune.

Winston went to Govurn the day after the operation and did not return until today, three days later.

‘Do not come back forever.’

A ray of scarlet sunset light leaked through the gap in the curtain that covered the long window. It seemed that he would not come back today, considering that even at dusk, Lieutenant Campbell had not made a call to prepare something for Winston’s.

Winston had been sleeping a lot in the annex bedroom rather than the main building in the past few months.

As a result, Sally was really busy as she took care of his personal belongings.mAs she picked up the officer’s uniform from the laundry cart and hung it neatly in the closet, she frowned as she recalled the gossip in the laundry room the other day.

“All the button threads are tattered.”

The maids in charge of the laundry smirked at the fact that Winston’s trousers had to be re-buttoned with strong thread. She was obviously referring to the pants he was wearing the day she attacked Sally.

“What made him so excited that the button broke?”

“Didn’t you hear that he had a date with the Grand Lady that day?”

Crazy bastard

He spent all evening with her fiancee and tried to attack the maid as soon as he returned.

“He’s tall, and his hands are big, so, hmm, would it be big?”

One of the maids whispered, the other clenched her fist and shook her forearm.

“It’s obvious just by looking at the stretched thread. Won’t it be this big? Don’t you think it must have been outstanding there, too?”

At that moment, without realizing it, Sally remembered the large ‘cigar’ and wrinkled her expression as if she had chewed an insect. Why the hell was they curious about the dirty parts of that garbage? Even though she didn’t want to know, it was just a shame she couldn’t undo it anymore.

Her cart was almost empty. All that was left were small items like socks and handkerchiefs.

Sally, who had inadvertently picked up the ironed and neatly folded white silk handkerchief from the basket, frowned again.

‘Is this that damned handkerchief?’

Originally, as soon as she found it, she put it on the stove and held back that she wanted to burn it. She thought of his eccentricity, and it was clear if she had burned what he had left behind on purpose, he was obviously going to investigate.

Sally tucked the handkerchief, all clean, in the middle of the tightly packed handkerchiefs in the drawer.

‘Shall I just get kicked out?’

She brought the laundry cart back to the ground floor and made her way up to the attic to get her share of dinner.

A good idea suddenly came to mind.

His engagement to the Grand Lady has not yet been finalized, although if there are rumors of an affair with an insignificant maid Mrs. Winston would drive her out at once.

So, it meant that she didn’t have to embark on a new mission, did she?

Nonetheless, her terribly terrifying sense of responsibility caught Sally’s ankle. She infiltrated the Winstons with difficulty and successfully. If she left without planting anyone, it would be like building a strong foundation and setting them on fire on the way home.

Even with Fred, frankly, he was untrustworthy. It was because Winston didn’t trust him. She didn’t know when he would act on a whim and send him to another unit or class.

‘Don’t ever come back. Or is he falling in love with another woman in Govurn Oh, why is this happening again?’

After the meal, Sally let out a long sigh as she went to the small bathroom attached to the maid’s room.

She turned on the shower valve, and no matter how long she waited, only ice-cold water poured out. There were times when the boiler in the basement of the annex was old, and the hot water did not come up to the attic.

The reward for hard work was an ice shower. She couldn’t stand it.

Even so, the bathroom under the attic was already as cold as ice.

Shivering in only her underwear, Sally stared at the pouring icy water and stopped the water. Sally put back the clothes she had taken off, grabbed the clothes to change into, and headed downstairs since Winston wasn’t coming anyway.

 


 
As the dancers climbed onto the stage, the whistle of the men drowned out the sound of the music. The only thing the female dancers wore was a short skirt with flamboyant tassels and beads, and a necklace of imitation pearls hung in layers around their neck.

Leon stared blankly at the women dancing with their chest exposed. Why were they so obsessed with just the flesh? It was nothing more than a chunk of meat stuck in a butcher’s shop.

Of the five officers seated at the table, Leon was the only one who felt that this was boring.

Unable to bear the boredom, he glanced lightly at Lieutenant Colonel Humphrey, who was sitting next to him.

The superior was smacking his red lips, not knowing that the cigar was turning to ashes. He had a serious expression like a doberman in Govurn, though the moment he left there, he started to laugh like a monkey.

It was not enough, he led the intelligence service officers to the cabaret for a farewell party for the commander who would soon return to civilian life.

A party without the main character

There was only one thing that was interesting to Leon, the contradiction. As he clenched his chin at an angle and slowly shook his bottomed glass, the lieutenant colonel tilted the whiskey bottle over him.

“Isn’t it fun?”

“It’s just that I’m picky with my taste.”

At his candid answer, the lieutenant colonel shook his head and laughed.

“Then, how about that girl?”

The lieutenant colonel pointed to the dancer standing in the center of the stage with the tip of the cigar. The girl who kissed the audience with her gorgeous smile was the most popular girl in Winsford’s entertainment district. It also meant that her night was the most expensive.

“Kitty Hayes. She is a woman no one can afford.”

The middle-aged man placed his arm around Leon’s shoulder and whispered, giving him valuable information.

“Hey, you are lucky today. This cabaret owner owes me something.”

Didn’t he once him Leon to be careful with women? Leon took a sip of his whiskey and twisted the corners of his lips.

“Thank you, but I don’t like it. I will decline.”

“Look, once you roll around dirty, it’s supposed to get better. That’s how everyone starts, isn’t it, Johnson?”

Major Johnson, who sat across from Leon, shrugged his shoulders.

“You are right, lieutenant colonel. However, it wouldn’t be bad to get married without knowing the fun like this. Won’t it be a problem if he falls into it late and loses his mind?”

The major winked slightly at Leon.

It had always been his job to stop the lieutenant colonel from pushing Leon, who didn’t like it every time he came to the cabaret, into a hotel room. Even though the major had a higher military rank than Leon, he had a lower social rank than the great landowners of Camden, including Winsford.

“Ah right. That noble Grand Lady. How is it? Is she your taste?”

“I don’t like getting married.”

The lieutenant colonel burst into laughter.

“It is.”

The lieutenant colonel, who was stroking Leon’s back with a thick hand as if he had said the right thing, muttered softly.

“But keep this in mind.”

“.”

“A hot night doesn’t always end badly.”

Leon just smiled bitterly.

The lieutenant colonel knew that he was reluctant to meet a stranger for fear that he would face a disastrous end like his father. He continued to point to the dancers on stage one by one, annoying Leon.

A woman approached this way with a luxurious black tray with a string tied around her neck. She was called by Lieutenant Campbell’s hand gesture, who was sitting next to him.

Leon stared quietly at the woman as Campbell paid for a pack of cigarettes and a few gums from her tray. She was a poor woman selling cigarettes.

She was no less than that maid.

Soon, a slanted smile was carved on his face.

Chapter 18
A woman who wouldn’t lose her innocence even when she wore a lewd uniform that exposed her breasts and thighs

Selling a forced smile to men no different from the prostitutes on stage, though with no intention of seducing the men No, she didn’t know how to seduce or anything like that. A peasant fresh from the countryside who didn’t even smell of perfume, let alone makeup.

Like Sally Bristol.

Even the eyes that were tired of the pleasure that displayed in front of her resembled Sally’s eyes looking at him.

Leon approached the woman who was standing against the wall. The woman who noticed his presence looked up at him with her deep blue eyes wide open.

“Wha, what do you need?”

He couldn’t figure out why she was stuttering. Was she depressed, or did she read the impure look from him?

He then picked up a box of candy from the tray, put it in the pocket of his officer’s uniform, and held out a bill. When the woman tried to give him the change, Leon asked, shaking his head.

“Is this your first time?”

“Yes?”

The woman widened her eyes again.

“Whyare you asking such a thing?”

Seeing her acting like a frightened rat, it seemed like she had misunderstood what he meant by her first time.

“Is this your first time doing this?”

The woman’s face turned red as if she had misunderstood. The woman lowered her gaze and smiled sheepishly.

“How did you know?”

“Obvious.”

Closing her arms and glancing down, the woman glanced at him, acting like a frightened rat again.

“Doyou need anything more?”

That was what the maid often says.

This might work

“Do you have a lover?”

The woman raised her eyes and laid them down. She gazed into his eyes and answered in a low voice, like a rat’s squeak.

“Yes.”

At that moment, the smile that appeared on Leon’s straight face was more twisted than ever.

Faith and love couldn’t be firmly established in the swamp of poverty. Because it easily collapsed even in the breeze of a few pennies.

For less than half of what he had given the maid a few days ago, the woman betrayed her fiancé and followed him to the hotel. Leon opened the door and the woman crouched, clutching the hem of her short skirt.

“Are, are you really going to do it with me?”

When she asked with a flushed face, Leon just smirked.

‘Stupid woman What makes you so excited? It’s not going to happen what you expect.’

A young, wealthy, handsome man spent one night with her, a poor and unassuming woman, and fell in love Well, it seemed like she was mistaken that something like a plot in a third-rate romance novel would happen to her.

“Go in.”

When he gave the order, the woman flinched and went inside. She followed straight in, and an insidious aura began to emanate from Leon, who slammed the door roughly.

The woman realized her plight a little as she stood in front of the bed, and she was at a loss for what to do. Leon did not go to the woman but leaned against the wall opposite the bed.

“Take it off.”

He ordered, pulling loosely the tie knot that was holding his neck.

“I don’t have time.”

The woman, frozen in place, took off her old trench coat only after he tapped his wristwatch. Leon’s eyes as he watched the woman undo the ribbons and buttons of the cabaret uniform were the same as when he looked at the naked dancers on the stage.

“Take it all off. Oh, leave the stockings behind.”

Even though she climbed onto the bed with her bra and bloomers all removed and only cheap rayon stockings on, the man did not come.

The woman spying on him with her hands wrapped around her naked body didn’t know what to expect. Meanwhile, in the mind of that young officer who looked like a movie star, another woman was taking her clothes off

Was it because it didn’t smell like blood?

Leon stared at the woman who was sitting on the bed, her skin exposed like a piece of meat, before reaching out to the small table.

“Gasp!”

As the sharp tip of the wine opener mercilessly dug into his thumb, the woman made a harsh sound. Leon, who started bleeding from his thumb, never twisted his eyebrows. He made his way to the bed, licking his tongue out of the blood that was about to run down his palm and wrist.

The woman retreated to the corner of the bed, her deep blue eyes shaking.

Gripping the woman’s chin as she was trying to run away from him, he squashed his thumb against her pale, quivering lips. The woman’s lips were all red with his blood.

‘This might work.’

His taste may not be the maid Only the smell of blood and the contempt in a woman’s eyes could excite him.

‘Yeah, despise me like that. So far, you’re doing very well.’

Leon, who gave a confident smile to the woman who glanced at him like he was a monster, bowed his head. The bloody smell on her lips moved closer at once.

The smell of blood.

And, a woman who despised him.

This would work.

It had to work.

“Oh uh”

It had to work

He stopped unknowingly just before their lips touched. Frozen for quite some time in the pose he was about to kiss, the woman called him in a trembling voice. Eventually, Leon pushed her chin and stood up.

“Get out, now.”

 


 
She was thinking of borrowing only Winston’s shower booth. However, when she came to her senses, Sally was already getting hot water in the bathtub.

That wasn’t enough, she lathered up a lot of fresh lemon-scented soap and took out a candle from the corner of the bathroom closet that Winston had never touched and left it lit. It was a pretty extravagant night for a poor maid and for the spy who was always desperate for money.

But, Sally was also human, so there were times when she was thirsty for this luxury.

‘A glass of champagne is perfect.’

She could go to the parlor and secretly bring a drink, but not when she had already taken off her clothes and was soaking in the bathtub? Next time she ‘borrowed’ the bathroom, she must not forget it.

There was no bathtub in her ‘home.’ In fact, it was not a house, although a room attached to a boarding house.

Originally, a family of four lived in a fairly large house. Nonetheless, after her father passed away, she received glares from those around her that it was big enough for the three of them to live. Then, when her mother died and her brother left, Sally had to give her childhood home to the other family and move to the boarding house.

Even though she was saddened, the house was the property of the community.

“The leadership should set an example.”

The words that Jimmy always chanted like a spell were a little comforting.

“You can use our bathtub anytime. We’re like family.”

Jimmy’s house had a bathtub with hot water. It was quite the offer, but she had never used it before because his smile showed his witty intentions.

‘Before the first night of marriage, it is not too early.’

Sally dipped her body down to her chin and let out a pleasant moan. She felt as if her muscles had been loosened from the hard work.

‘Let’s enjoy a little more and go out.’

As she closed her eyes in the dim bathroom and entered the hot water, she soon felt sleepy. Without realizing it, Sally dozed off and shoved her nose into the foam. Astonished, she lifted her head and blew the bubbles, and small soap bubbles floated up and down.

‘Now, I think I should wash my body before the water cools down.’

She paused as she inadvertently tried to pick up the sponge from the golden tray hung at the end of the bathtub — that was what Winston rubbed on his body.

“Uwak!”

Without realizing it, she imagined that sponge rubbing the cigar. Sally shrieked and dunked her head into the foam.

Please, let the bubble wash away all the dirty memories from her head.

“Foo”

Only when she couldn’t hold her breath did she lift her head out of the water. She took a deep breath as she wiped the water and foam flowing down her face with her hand, and she stiffened the moment she opened her closed eyes.

“Who have we here? Miss Sally Bristol more stuck up than Grand Lady Aldrich and more expensive than Kitty Hayes, in my bathtub, naked.”

Winston was smiling, leaning at the door across from the bathtub. His hands unbuttoned the officer’s jacket one by one.

‘Damn it. No way When did he come in?’

She didn’t wonder ‘how.’ It was because Winston had the master key of the annex. In other words, it meant that there was no locked door in this annex.

“Is it my birthday today? Or, did Christmas come eight months earlier?”

He took off his jacket and took two steps towards her.

“I’m so sorry, Captain.”

Saying so, she quickly wrapped one arm around her chest and leaned her body at the feet of the bathtub. Just as she was about to pick up her clothes from the towel rack, Winston hung his jacket over it and covered her clothes.

Sally raised her eyes and looked up at him. As he approached her nose, the filthy smile on his face became clearer.

“Captain, what are you doing now?”

Knowing it was a stupid question, she couldn’t help but ask. Winston quickly untied his black tie and threw it into the laundry basket, unbuttoning his shirt, and answered indifferently.

“Going into my bathtub.”

“Can you go out for a moment before that?”

“This is my bathroom, shouldn’t you go out?”

“Yes, I will go. Captain, if you could give me my clothes”

For some reason, Winston meekly put his hand under his jacket and pulled out Sally’s clothes.

“Thank y”

Her hand, reaching out to receive her clothes, stopped in mid-air.

Chapter 19
The only thing Winston politely offered Sally was the pair of stockings.

‘Alright, what was this maniac doing?’

“Go on, get dressed.”

Saying so, he grinned as if wishing for a compliment while wiggling the thin stockings playfully in front of Sally’s eyes.

“Or, shall I clothe you, noble Miss Bristol?”

“Captain, please. I’m really sorry.”

As she begged, he grinned and hung the stockings over his jacket. Sally pulled her knees up and wrapped them around herself, curling her body even further.

Even though she was in the hot water, her hands and feet were frozen. It was due to the helplessness. It was the worst situation. She couldn’t run away because she was naked. Besides, it was fatal to have a fight naked. She had to fight while revealing the vital points of her body.

Sally felt like a fish in Winston’s tank. How stupid it was that she jumped into the tank herself? He would take her out in one breath, put her on a chopping board, and greedily devour her

“Captain, please let me go. I will never use the bathroom again.”

“Hmm.”

Winston replied with a smile only on his lips. His eyes were that of a lion with mouth-watering prey in front of him.

“Can you tell me in advance instead? I’ll come in early.”

He unbuttoned his shirt and pulled off the cuffs of his sleeves until the prominent curves of his chest were visible. The sleeves were slowly rolled up below the elbow, revealing the smooth forearm. Dark shadows tinted vertically due to his clearly split muscles.

His muscles were not the only ones solid there. As she glanced at the exposed body, the fear that she might have to fight with a strong man with her bare hands came closer.

Sally recalled in her head the various self-defense techniques she had learned and used.

Let’s just avoid the worst. But, what was worse: being forced to sleep with that person or using her self-defense skills too well to be discovered as a spy?

“I can give you a special wash. That’s doable for Miss Bristol, who is struggling for me.”

‘I am suffering because of you, not for you.’

Sally bit her lip as she wept. It was getting worse and worse.

Normally, Winston would be light-hearted and sarcastic when something offended him, though now, his light actions and words were not sarcastic at all. He was really rejoicing like a child who received his Christmas present eight months early. That meant that no such thing like a desperate apology would work.

Moreover, unlike Winston’s upper body, as he leisurely rolled up his opposite sleeve, his lower body seemed impatient because the front of the pants was already rising like it was about to rip.

‘That bastard rutting all the time’

“Gasp!”

After folding his sleeves, his hand turned to the black leather belt.

“Please, don’t take it off!”

“Do you want me to come in dressed?”

He tilted his head at Sally as if she was saying something bizarre.

“You’re naked, but if I am clothed, it’s a big disrespect.”

His hand unbuckled the belt buckle and unbuttoned his pants at once. That bastard was really thinking of going into the bathtub.

“Kyaaak!”

As he grabbed his pants and underwear and pulled them down, Sally squeezed her eyes shut and screamed.

When the sound of his footsteps drew closer together with the sound of laughter, she crouched closer to her body as she felt a movement right next to the bathtub. There was a dull sound of something heavy falling on the rug next to the bathtub. At the same time, there was a loud jingle of the belt buckle.

He really took his clothes off. What if he got into the bathtub? Even though Sally knew it was not the time to cover her eyes, she didn’t want to open her eyes to see that person’s naked body.

Burying her face between her knees and curled up when the finger touched her earlobe, she shook her head in amazement. And then, another smirk passed through her ears.

“I didn’t take it off. Open your eyes.”

She slowly opened her eyes and glanced over to see that Winston was really dressed. Anger followed immediately after relief. He made fun of people by acting like he was about to attack. It was a really bad joke.

Still, anger soon gave way to embarrassment. Winston sat on the rug on the floor with one elbow resting in the bathtub. Sally’s face turned to contemplation as she belatedly remembered what was on the rug.

‘My underwear!’

Leaning her head out, she looked down at the rug, with her body still curled up.

‘Damn you, kinky bastard.’

Winston had the bloomer she had left on the rug in his opposite hand. He didn’t seem to have any intention of hiding the front of his pants.

“Ack!”

A finger that had been draped over the edge of the bathtub poked Sally’s cheek.

“Did you apply the medicine I gave you?”

Sally asked in a vigilant voice, dodging towards the wall.

“Captain, are you drunk?”

Again, the smell of strong alcohol wafted from him as he grinned.

“Don’t worry. I’m fine enough that I won’t do anything I’ll regret when I wake up tomorrow morning.”

Winston rested his elbows on the edge of the bathtub and pressed his chin on his raised knuckles. The wind blew as he brought his face closer. It felt like he was going to reach out and snatch her body at any moment. Even the blink of his eyes made her anxious.

“I just want to chat. We haven’t seen each other for a few days, haven’t we?”

Did he think that they were lovers who couldn’t live without seeing each other for even a day?

Sally thought she was only going to live without seeing him. And then, to chat with the naked woman stuck in the bathtub

It was a blatant lie.

“If you need a report, nothing happened during those days when you weren’t there.”

Although she suppressed her inner feelings, a cold wind blew from her voice. She must not show her hostility towards him. Sally always had to pretend that she was a compliant and good maid, but he was tenaciously testing her patience.

Sally cleared her throat and added kind words.

“So, don’t worry, Captain.”

“Really? Then, why did you go to Winsford a few days ago?”

“Yes?”

How did he know where she was a few days ago? Did he pass by? Perhaps, it was because of the gun that he had her followed? Still, no one followed her into the back alley on her way home.

“Did you see me?”

“Yes.”

“But, why are you asking that?”

“It was pretty annoying. I can’t concentrate on my work.”

“Why does that interfere with the Captain’s work? If you go to a big city when you feel cramped, it’ll be a change of pace.”

“With your fiancé.”

“Yes?”

“Is that change of pace like hanging out with your fiancé naked like you are now?”

“My fiancé is not in Winsford.”

“So, you’re rolling around outside Winsford?”

“.”

The maid stared straight at the man who insulted her. The woman’s place was as a lady in a rustic country. It got more appetizing when this woman didn’t know her place Like now, she had taken over her master’s bathtub as a maid.

“Then, where is your fiancé?”

Sally stared at Winston calmly.

Winsford and fiancé. Why was he fussing over things that have nothing to do with him?

Jimmy thought Winston saw her as a woman, although Sally thinks differently To that person, he just used his handkerchief to masturbate, that was all.

So, were those leading questions?

“Are you going to call the police for that gun?”

“Then, are you going to do everything to save your fiancé?”

“No.”

Leon couldn’t hold back the laughter when the maid refused words as soon as he finished speaking. He didn’t mean to, but he didn’t think he would be able to threaten her and make her spread her legs.

“You say you’re engaged? It looks like he was going to be punished, so you’re just going to leave it alone?”

“I have to take care of myself.”

Of course, these sarcastic remarks could not have been Sally’s sincerity.

Wasn’t Jimmy her lifelong comrade? Whatever danger he faced, she would not give up until the end and would save him. So, this was just a way to avoid uncomfortable topics.

“Oh, I see.”

Did it work?

Winston laughed to himself, and he reached for his jacket. He was rummaging through his clothes and found a small box in his hand before taking out a red candy from the box and held it to Sally’s lips.

“I bought it with you in mind.”

Surprised, he shoved the candy between her lips, who had unknowingly opened her mouth. Sally wrinkled her brow as she reflexively rolled the lump over her tongue.

‘I think he’s drunk’

To buy a candy thinking of her, which was something lovers would say to each other.

Leon stared intently at the woman who sucked candy while puffing one of her cheeks, not knowing the creepy truth behind those words. If he put his penis in that tiny mouth and pushed, would her cheeks puff out like that?

Chapter 20
Suck.

There was a strange sound as she rolled the candy with her tongue in her mouth and sucked it. At that moment, a moan like a sigh escaped Leon’s mouth. He took his hand, which was holding the woman’s underwear, to his center. It had already swelled up so much that it was aching.

It didn’t stand up to the naked woman selling cigarettes a while ago. This maid made his body aroused like a male in heat by her mundane act of only eating candy.

Leon haphazardly tossed the candy box on the rug and put his arm into the bathtub.

The woman rolled her eyes, puffing her cheeks like a squirrel biting an acorn. He couldn’t even reach her, but she flinched as if she had been electrocuted, evading further into the corner.

“Do you like hot things?”

Was this how hot the woman was inside? He would be happy to soak himself in, even if his skin would be all scorched and peeling off.

“Do you remember what I showed you a few days ago?”

He asked, stirring his hand slowly by the side of the maid’s chest. When the foam burst, the woman who had collected the foam from the other side and covered her exposed skin was startled. She had eyes that were as terrible as that day.

Leon, who had succeeded in embedding his private part into the woman’s head, slowly moved his hand holding her underwear with a bright smile.

“It’s hot, too, aren’t you interested?”

The woman shook her head as she glared at him while crouching down. He then raised the corners of his lips at an angle and pulled the strands of the dark brown hair, which had stuck like water weeds, on the maid’s shoulder.

Her wet hair was clinging to his hand Would her inner flesh stick like this?

He rubbed the spot where her secret place would have touched on the inside of her underwear. A faint moisture was felt from the seam, gently irritating the periphery.

It was obviously moisture that had leaked out of the woman’s body.

He stared straight into her turquoise eyes, which were shrouded in contempt, and quietly swallowed the moan that reached his chin.

When her shoulders shrank a little more as she watched his neck twitch, Leon’s eyes caressed her round shoulders, then scanned her straight and prominent collarbone. As he was about to go further down, a white bubble blocked his gaze.

He swallowed.

Her two knees, which rose in the middle of the whipped cream-like foam, were dyed pink like a delicious peach, perhaps because of the hot water.

Leon drew the naked body submerged in the water by connecting the pieces exposed out of the water as if completing a single painting by connecting numerous dots. The whispers that were heavily engulfed in the stillness that was as tight as a bowstring pulled all the way to the end broke.

“I wonder what it tastes like.”

Sally exhaled the breath she had been holding back.

‘Did he buy it without knowing the taste?’

She answered, swallowing the saliva that had just pooled in her mouth and rolling the candy to the other cheek.

“It tastes like cherry.”

Winston let go of the hair he was holding around his fingers and picked up the box of candy. He wanted to try one, too, though it wasn’t that simple. The box tipped over the bathtub, and red candy spilled all over the water.

What kind of trick was this?

Sally’s eyes widened open, and she opened her mouth like a fool.

“This I wanted to taste it as well, but my hand slipped?”

He poured it out with his own hands in front of her proudly, saying that his hands slipped. This lunatic

“I’m sorry, but we should share it.”

It was a trick to get her to kiss him.

Winston’s broad chest floated above her body, casting a black shadow. It wasn’t enough, so he placed his big hands on the side of the bathtub, locking Sally between his arms. His face tilted to the right.

As his lips got closer, the gap between the man’s lips widened. Sally rubbed her legs against the walls of the tub. With her arms around her knees and covering her chest, she tilted her head to the side just before their lips touched.

“Ah!”

He didn’t stop or change direction. He lightly bit the nape of her defenseless neck, exposing his teeth like a wild beast.

Sally’s hand reflexively pushed Leon’s shoulder, soaking his shirt wet.

He already knew what cherry tasted like. What he was curious about was this woman’s taste. Leon, who had been gnawing the nape of the woman’s neck with his lips, moved his head once more as his mouth watered. He had already tasted the sweet blood, so he wanted to try something else.

He wanted to chew and eat her from the tip of that tiny nose to the little toes What did this woman’s saliva and tears taste like?

His lips crossed the line of her delicate chin. It was the moment when he approached her, biting her soft cheeks and biting her on the lip, the dazzling sweetness of cherry wrapped around Leon’s tongue in an instant.

She smiled low, rolling the small candy under her tongue.

“Captain, eat it all.”

The woman spat the candy into her hand just before their lips touched and put it in his mouth. She even did the daring thing of covering his mouth with that hand.

That meant both of the woman’s hands were holding him now. She was defenseless.

“Ack!”

Winston’s finger rolled a nipple that was submerged under the foam. Sally struggled in surprise, but he held her soft flesh cruelly and relentlessly, not letting it go.

“Ahhk, let it go! Please, let it go!”

After mobilizing her fingernails, he took his hand off her with difficulty.

Sally warned him in an angry voice as if it went all the way to the top of her head, “Don’t touch me. I made the mistake of using the Captain’s bathtub, although that doesn’t mean the Captain has the right to do what he wants.”

Leon laughed.

The woman curled up like a rabbit in his shadow, covering her chest with her arms. No matter how harshly she warned him, it was only naughty.

“Pink.”

He sat down on the rug and let out a single provocation.

“Yes?”

“Your nipples are pink.”

The woman’s face turned white and immediately turned red.

“You haven’t seen it and yet you’re pointing it out.”

The foam was so thick it wouldn’t make sense. Sally hugged her chest tighter and glanced at Winston. His gaze was fixed on her upper chest, which had become more prominent.

“Then, let’s check if I’m right?”

The hand that was on the edge of the bathtub fell into the water at once. Even though she flinched and avoided him, his hand went in the opposite direction.

Pop.

There was the sound of something being pulled from beneath the bubble. The sound of water rushing out of the bathtub instantly followed Sally’s hesitation. At the same time, his hand appeared out of the water and held the stopper of the bathtub.

“Or, will you admit it?”

When the water ran out, her naked body would be completely exposed.

“That’s right! So, please return it.”

Sally reached out for the stopper, but Winston quickly put his hand back and gave a skeptical smile.

“What is right?”

The water was already down to the middle of her chest, so there was no more time to delay.

“It’s pink.”

As she muttered, Winston grinned at her, who was biting her lip in contempt, before holding out the stop.

Tap.

Just as she was about to receive it, the stopper was thrown into the corner of the bathroom.

“I didn’t say I would give it back.”

Sally almost threw a swear word at him. There was no shame in the anger that rose to the top of her head in an instant. Now, she was starting to think it didn’t matter if he saw her naked or not.

“Captain.”

“Yes?”

Winston smiled softly. Anyone who didn’t know that the cat tossed and played with the mouse before catching the mouse would think that his smile was sweet indeed.

“What the hell do you want me to do?”

She asked without hiding her hostility.

“You want me to tell you honestly?”

“Yes.”

He grinned.

Although he had an ominous smile, Sally knew he wouldn’t let the usual words come out of his mouth, anyway.

Leon stretched out his hand towards the maid, who was staring fiercely at him. The curvature of her ribs and the concave waistline were slowly revealed above the surface of the bathtub.

“Soon”

The woman trembled and stared at him even more fiercely as he lightly brushed the back of his hand on the curve of her breast that protruded out of her hand that was holding her chest.

“The bathtub will be empty.”

There were now less than two spans of water left.

“Then, I will go in Will you run to the corner? No, will you get up and leave? Wouldn’t that be the case, because I’ll catch you and throw you on the floor? You’ll have to be careful not to hit your head. I don’t have a hobby with a fainted woman.”

He recited his cruel imagination without hesitation as if waiting for that question. The knuckles protruding from the smooth back of his hands scanned Sally’s naked body exposed out of the water.

Chapter 21.

Contrary to the harsh words, his hands were soft as if he were caressing his lover. The gap was disgusting enough to make her shudder.

“You’ll struggle and struggle, but you won’t get out of under me. It’s slippery because someone throws soap in the bathtub without thinking. Then, if you break your finger, it’d be a big deal… I guess I’ll have to bend your arms behind your back and hold on to it. It’s all for you. You know, right?”



“Then, I’ll grab your waist. I’m going to pull your ass up to me and shove the thing I showed you a few days ago in the tight hole.”

He didn’t smile anymore.

Even though Sally met his serious gaze with contempt, Winston only exhaled harshly, even more excited.

“…Then, you’ll know.”

The back of his hand, which went down the water surface to her side, caressed Sally’s hip.

“Is the inside of your stomach as hot as this water…?”

His hand slipped through the gap in her knee as she raised her knee up.

As he was about to touch her secret place, she kicked his hand with her foot. For some reason, he gently moved his hand away. Closing his eyes, Winston took a deep breath and said in a voice deeply immersed in suppressing his cruel desires.

“But, I’m doing my best to endure what I want to do… You are a good kid.”

Sally suppressed the laugh from bursting out.

This is called enduring…? Does she have to go through the dictionary and teach him the definition of ‘endure’?

“Can I be honest with you, Captain?”

Winston nodded his head, still closing his eyes. Sally bit her dry lip once seeing that before she uttered a few blunt words.

“I’m disappointed in the Captain.”

To be honest, she would not have been disappointed with him since, after all, she had no expectations. The only moment she was disappointed by the enemy was when the enemy did not live up to her expectations.

“I thought the Captain was a man who wouldn’t do such terrible things as attacking me.”

At least, this was true.

“Besides, you’re going to be engaged to the Grand Lady soon.”

The betrothal of Winston to the Grand Lady was now of the utmost importance. So, to tell him to get himself together, she mentioned the Grand Lady. However, he was only breathing heavily, as if he couldn’t hear properly.

“Though why are you doing this to me?”

He slowly lifted his eyelids and stared intently at Sally. The strange words slipped between his lips, parted as slowly as his eyelids.

“Are you curious?”

“Yes.”

“You answer it.”

“Yes…?”

“I’m curious, too.”

Then, Leon spoke of what had happened at the Winsford hotel a few hours earlier. He bought a woman with a similar vibe to her.

The contempt grew stronger in the maid’s eyes when she heard the story of his failure where he couldn’t get excited when he stripped her off and put blood on her lips. It was even harder to contain her raging urge.

“Ha… This shit annoys me as much as you. I wasn’t interested in the promiscuity of having sex, but every time I see you these days, I get interested and it bothers me.”



“So, you answer it.”



“Sally, why’s it standing there only to you alone?”

In Sally’s eyes, as she was about to ask him why he was asking her that, her anger began to boil beyond contempt. It was because Winston raised his hand, which had been outside the bathtub all the time, in front of her.

“Why did I…”

At the tip of his sharp, well-groomed fingers, there was the white bloomer she had taken off.

“…Only cum with you?”

Winston dropped the semen-drenched underwear onto her peach-colored lap. The body fluid that contained his scorching body temperature was sticky on her skin. Even though she was disgusted and wanted to put it away right away, she couldn’t.

Sally couldn’t take her eyes off the man, who stood up slowly.

Contrary to what she expected that she would be attacked by now, he neatly adjusted his outfit and walked towards the door.

“This is my intuition…”

Winston suddenly turned his body and gazed down at Sally as she stared at him with a sharp gaze towards the part of his shirt that was so stiff that it looked like it was about to burst.

“I think you know the answer.”

He was notorious for his animalistic instincts as well as his cruel methods of torture. And, the notoriety wasn’t wrong.

Because Sally knew the answer.

As she held her breath, Winston wrinkled his eyes at her.

“But, why aren’t you wearing the stockings I bought you?”

He ripped her cheap stockings and threw them in the trash before striding out of the door as if nothing had happened. Only when the door slammed shut did Sally eventually let out a paused breath and ruffled her wet hair.

‘I’d rather get fired right away.’

 


 
‘…This is torture.’

Sally sighed as she dusted the book off the bookshelf.

Torture was not just inflicting physical pain, it was also outright mental torture that Winston drove her to every day.

 

“I think you know the answer.”

 

She was going to get caught soon… And, if she got caught, it would be over.

When he found out her true identity, Winston wouldn’t have killed her beautifully because Sally knew the leadership inside well. He would use all kinds of heinous torture to squeeze out key information about the revolutionary army’s stronghold and leadership.

‘Then, I’m not the only one at risk.’

It was not the time to sit still and talked about her responsibility as a spy since Fred would fill her vacancy. Although it was still uncertain, was everyone not bound to grow through a daunting task…?

Then, she could say to the chief maid right now that she would quit and packed her stuff, but it wasn’t that simple. She should be fired, not quit. If she returned as it was, she would then receive criticism from the upper management.

Sally hated hearing Jimmy’s disappointment.

Pretending to be fired wouldn’t work because Fred or Peter might tell it. Consequently, if she pretended that she was trying the new mission to become Winston’s mistress, there would be nothing to say if she got fired.

After much deliberation, Sally’s ‘how to be fired’ was the first strategy that came to mind—

—To get the gossip about Winston and her to reach Madam Winston’s ears.

“Miss Bristol.”

And, it wouldn’t be that difficult.

Winston came up behind her, standing on the low ladder. He was so close that she could feel his breath on the back of her neck.

“It’s good.”

“What?”

Sally clenched her legs as his hand slid between her legs and ran across her calves.

“I bought it for you.”

His fingertips slid over the smooth silk stockings. Usually, it was natural for it to slide down but his hand slipped up instead.

Wearing the stockings he had bought was part of the ‘get fired’ plan. It was already expected that he would get his hands on it, though she couldn’t tolerate him putting his fingers past the band of the stockings and under the laces of her garter belt.

“What are you doing, Captain?”

“Body search for illegal possession of weapons.”

“Didn’t the Captain take the illegal weapon?”

“Really?”

“It’s in the desk drawer.”

“You know…? Though why not take it?”

“You said it was confiscated.”

“You’re smart.”

It was a voice that was deeply regretful to be said as a compliment. His hand, which was groping around her thighs as he was looking for her pistol, which was supposed to be there, soon fell apart.

“I guess your fiancé saved you again?”

“Looks like you were waiting for me to break the law again.”

Since she was trying to get fired anyway, Sally stopped playing the docile maid.

His breath brushed the nape of her neck.

“Sally, as someone who cares about you, I’ll give you one piece of advice. You better not marry such a bad guy.”

For the second most bad guy in the Kingdom, Winston, to say something like this… There was no such contradiction. However, she couldn’t even say it was completely wrong because it was difficult to call a man a good man when he was trying to make his fiancé into the enemy’s mistress.

“Sally.”

If she left here, she would never use the pseudonym ‘Sally’ again. At this point, Winston would call her so often that if she heard the name ‘Sally,’ his smirk would also come to mind and she might have a nervous breakdown.

“Why?”

“One thing…”

The moment he spoke, someone knocked on the office door.

“Come in.”

Winston ordered Sally to stay still. The door opened, but instead of footsteps coming in, only a hoarse voice could be heard.

“Uh… Captain, I will come back later.”

Without looking back, she knew that the owner of the voice was Lieutenant Campbell. He seemed a bit perplexed when he saw his superior having a secret time with the maid.

Sally finally got what she wanted, but unfortunately, the rumors wouldn’t spread to the mansion because the lieutenant was a soldier. She had to be caught by a mansion employee with a light mouth to spread the word.

“Is it urgent?”

“It’s not like that. However, we have new information regarding Jonathan Riddle Jr. and we wanted to report it.”

Chapter 22.

“Come in.”

Even though Winston got off her and headed for his desk, Sally couldn’t relax.

‘Any information about brother…? What happened? No, more than that, has he been keeping an eye on him all this time?’

Even if her brother had turned away, she knew that the military could not just leave him alone, who was once a promising young executive in the revolutionary army. She just didn’t know that Winston was in charge of her brother.

If he was keeping an eye on her brother’s movements, it meant he was tracking her as well. As Sally pretended to do the cleaning, she anxiously listened to Campbell’s report.

“They say he received a large sum of money a few days ago.”

Sally’s mouth got dry.

“Who is the sender?”

“The name is Holly Easter…”

Winston smirked.

Holly Easter… He noticed at once that he had written the greetings to have a happy Easter as a pseudonym.

“What about the remittance?”

“From the post office on Main Street in Winsford…”

“Winsford?”

“Yes.”

“Impression of the sender.”

“All the information is that she had long brown hair, light skin tone, and was wearing round sunglasses.”

“Why is that all?”

His questioning voice was dangerously low.

“I’m sorry, Captain. I tried to interrogate the person in charge of the remittance but to no avail. It was not easy for them to remember. They were distracted because it was just before the store closed, and the person was dressed modestly, so there was nothing that left an impression on her.”

Sally turned her back and smiled at their conversation. This time, she was one step ahead again.

“A young woman in her early to mid-20s.”

“Yes, that’s right.”

“Little Riddle.”

Winston leaned back in his chair and burst out laughing.

“How so daring… How dare that rat come and go through my land like her own house.”

Hearing that, Sally struggled to contain her laughter at Winston’s angry voice. Truly, there was nothing more exhilarating for her to get to the enemy’s stronghold and slip from it.

‘He knows that? I am very bold, but you are pathetic.’

…Camden’s Vampire, what an overly generous nickname.

‘Pathetic son of a bitch.’

A pathetic bastard who didn’t even know that the rat he was chasing was in front of him. A pathetic loser who was at a loss of what to do because her body was too sweet.

“Sally.”

When Leon picked up the empty sparkling water bottle and put it down, the maid came swiftly to him and left with the empty bottle.

As he pulled the tie knot roughly downward, the perfectly symmetrical knot twisted a bit. He took a deep breath and rummaged through the inside of his jacket. Soon, a hazy smoke rose from his fingertips.

“I mean, she probably didn’t stop at Winsford just because she was bored on the way.”

“I think so, too. Maybe she was targeting the Western Command…”

“That would not be right. She will not be sloppy enough to send money in front of a strategic location, knowing she was going to be tracked down.”

So, what about that area…? There were not many places for the rebels to target in the Camden area. It meant that his home, the Winston Mansion, was not likely to be an operational site.

“Do you know the soldiers’ movements?”

“Yes, we have already started. First of all, we are investigating whether there are any suspicious activities or records of contact with each other, mainly before and after the attack.”

“If there is any suspicious person, report it immediately.”

“Yes.”

Leon blew out a long white smoke and lightly brushed the ashes from the end of the cigar. He wished he could shake off his doubts as lightly as this.

…That filthy rat.

Where was she hiding, spatting out suspicions as tough as chewed gum at him?

To prevent the worst, the investigation range may need to expand from his subordinates to the mansion’s employees. The good news was that he only needed to investigate women with brown hair. What he was unhappy about was the fact that brown hair was common.

He stared at the edge of the desk, contemplating, when the maid returned. His gaze turned to the woman who turned over the clean cup on his desk and poured the sparkling water, and Leon sharpened his gaze for an instant.

Brown hair… Winsford a few days ago.

The maid tilted her head as she held out the cup, feeling his gaze.

At that moment, his eyes darkened.

‘…What absurd speculation.’

This woman was not smart enough to do such a thing because she was a woman who worked every day getting played in his hands. As she slowly began to get on his nerves, he had already called the maid chief to inquire about Sally’s identity, but nothing was suspicious.

She also didn’t look like a member of the Riddle family, who was known for their impressive appearance. They were all blonde and had brown or hazel eyes. It was clear that the rat’s hair was a disguise.

“Good work. Get out.”

As Campbell left, Leon stood up, squeezing out the half of the cigar into the ashtray. He walked over to the sofa and turned around to see the maid tidying up the cushions in the corner.

“Ack, Captain!”

Leon sat down on the sofa and pulled the maid by the waist. Placing her on his lap and making her lean back as if he was holding a baby, the woman pushed him on the chest.

“Stay still. I’m not going to do it here.”

Then, that meant he would do it somewhere else.

Sally wrinkled her face to show her displeasure, though Winston didn’t even sneer at her. He reached under the white frilled headband and ruffled her hair. Her annoyance surged as Winston ruffled her neatly braided hair out of the blue.

“What are you doing now…”

“It’s brown.”

“What?”

“It’s real.”

Was he checking it because of the sender’s impression…?

“…So, did you think that I’m old enough to have to dye my hair?”

She deliberately pouted her lips. Sally didn’t consider herself a beauty, but it seemed that at least being beautiful had an effect. She succeeded in clouding Winston’s thinking.

“Don’t.”

Sally covered her lips with her hand as he approached her for a kiss.

“Uhh…”

When his wet tongue licked her palm, she lifted her hand, horrified. Winston asked with a mischievous laugh.

“Why? Have you never kissed?”

“…I did.”

The smile disappeared from his face.

“Haa… But, I don’t like it. Wouldn’t it be an honor for you to kiss a handsome man you’d only see in a movie?”

“It’s a disaster for those who don’t want it.”

Sally met his eyes and answered coldly as she grabbed his thick shoulder. As soon as she got up from her torso that had been half-lying, Winston pressed her shoulder again and laid her down.

“I have to finish the story I was talking about in front of the bookshelf.”

“Is it necessary to tell the story in this position?”

“Should I put you under me, then?”

Sally let out a long sigh.

“What do you want to talk about?”

Leon stroked her cheek with the knuckle of his hand as if caressing a lover before letting out a blunt word.

“You’re annoying me.”

“We already know that, Captain.”

“A few months ago, just looking at you gave me a strange feeling, but these days, it’s even worse. You keep messing me around, and it’s hard to concentrate on work.”

“Then, I’ll hide like someone who doesn’t exist. Or get fired…”

“It doesn’t have to be like that.”

“Well, what do you want?”

“Your body.”

Such blatant and rude words were no longer surprising to her. Sally responded without raising an eyebrow.

“It looks like the beginning and the end doesn’t match.”

“I’m going to try it once and put it away. It will be more boring than you think to roll around promiscuously. If I’m no longer interested in you, you’re comfortable.”

“I don’t want that.”

“Why? Do you want to be a mistress?”

“No.”

Leon couldn’t hold back his dismayed laughter when her decisive rejection fell before he could even finish his words.

“Yes, I don’t want to have such an annoying pet either. Besides, I’m telling you in case you might be mistaken, though I don’t even like you. I’m just doing this because I won’t stand unless it’s you. Do you know how annoying that is?”

“I know that, although I don’t like disgusting things like that.”

“How do you know if you haven’t tried it? Wouldn’t it be nice to actually try it?”

“Isn’t that more difficult then? The Captain got bored after trying it once, but what if I want to do more?”

It would never happen, but if she thought it would work, Sally had to say something.

“And, how do you trust me? If we have an illegitimate child, the Captain will be in trouble.”

“Then, it’s like a jackpot for you.”

“My dream is to live a normal and quiet life.”

“I’m just going to do it once so you can live quietly.”

“What if you don’t get tired of doing it once? You might get even more annoyed.”

A groan escaped from Winston’s twisted lips.

“You’re full of confidence, are you?”

“If you want to get bored with me, I can give you a boring date.”

Chapter 23.
A maid dating her master in front of others — there was no faster way to get herself fired. Besides, since she was in front of others, she wouldn’t have to worry about being accidentally hit by Winston.

“Isn’t that boring just hearing about it?”

“Right?”

As she smiled confidently, curling the corners of her eyebrows, Winston suddenly let out a laugh of absurdity.

“It’s probably going to be insanely boring. How about taking this opportunity to practice patience?”

“Practice… Am I a dog?”

“You are a soldier. Don’t soldiers have patience as their ability?”

For some reason, she decided to put his military qualities in the forefront and scratched his pride. Did it work…?

Winston licked his lower lip, deep in thought.

“If it’s a boring date…. There is one place that is just right.”

Then, he grabbed Sally’s waist and lifted her up without warning. He even pushed her towards the door.

“I’ll give you five minutes. Go change your clothes.”

 


 
As the front door of the mansion opened, the sedan moved slowly. When the car drove through the garden, she stuck close to the window to catch the eye of the employees, but luckily no one ran into them.

Sally stared tenaciously at her last hope, the gatekeeper.

The middle-aged man stared at her in the passenger seat and raised his eyebrows, though immediately turned away. At that, her shoulders slumped down. The gatekeeper was not a talkative person so he wouldn’t go out of his way to say that Winston was going somewhere with a maid.

“You tried hard.”

“What…?”

The maid turned her head and glanced at him. Instead of answering, Leon twisted his lips at an angle and smiled.

…A pale pink blouse with rustic frills, a brown plaid skirt, and a red cardigan with fluff. It was worse than when she was standing in front of the Winsford department store.

She was deliberately trying her best to make the date boring.

‘If that’s the case, take off your stockings.’

It was a sight to behold.

Through the thin black silk, the woman’s well-toned skin shone through. Besides, that rustic blouse didn’t have a tight neckline like a maid’s uniform, so her exposed clavicle and the concave groove beyond it kept attracting his attention.

His attention was focused on the edge of his field of vision even when he was looking ahead.

Leon couldn’t help but remember that woman crouching naked in the dark bathroom last night. No wonder there was another annoying reaction between his legs.

“So, what is the answer?”

“What?”

“You should know the answer.”

He was asking why he only felt lust towards her.

“I don’t know what you mean.”

Sally pulled her chin off her cheeks resolutely, glancing at Winston’s hand as he grabbed the steering wheel. She hadn’t seen him drive on his own in over a year, and she didn’t know what changed it today.

‘…It’s ominous.’

As usual, she thought the attendant and driver would follow. That meant that there would already be two witnesses in the mansion. Although she thought that, her expectations were shattered mercilessly.

‘Is he going to take me to a secluded place like this?’

Sally sat straight like a man wrapped in iron armor all over her body, staring straight ahead.

“Where are we going?”

“Winsford Marina.”

“…Yes?”

The sun was slowly setting. She thought about having dinner in Halewood or downtown Winsford…

‘Why the marina?’

As she turned her head to look at Winston, he was only looking straight ahead. When he wrinkled his eyebrows, she followed his gaze to see Peter’s postal carriage moving slowly in front of them.

“Sally.”

“Yes?”

“You and that guy seemed friendly last time.”

A short scream escaped Sally’s lips, who was about to deny she wasn’t.

It was because Winston suddenly shifted the gear and pressed the accelerator hard. The car sped up to hit the postal carriage. Sally exclaimed sharply as she got close enough to see the dirt on the rear wheel of the carriage.

“What are you doing now?”

At that moment, Winston steered the steering wheel roughly to the left and her body leaned towards the door.

Peter, who was looking at the car threateningly overtaking the carriage, was met with surprised eyes through the window. Her eyes widened even more as he recognized Sally. At least there was at least one witness that she had done her mission.

As soon as the carriage was overtaken, Winston steered the steering wheel to the right.

Her body staggered, this time leaning towards the driver’s seat. Winston laughed mischievously, seeing how fun it was for Sally to hold onto his arms so she wouldn’t fall.

“Wouldn’t it be better to leave the driving to the professional?”

Even though she was being sarcastic, instead of answering, he muttered something else.

“Is that guy your fiancée?”

“What?”

Sally wrinkled her face to the fullest, making it obvious that she was genuinely offended by that teasing. Seeing that, Winston only turned his eyes her way and raised the corners of his lips.

“I like handsome men.”

“Really?”

“Why does the Captain think that?”

“You don’t like me.”

…Superb.

Sally stared at Winston’s face with cold eyes.

Tanned skin just enough to look good, long eyelashes gracefully draped over the sharp eyes, a smooth falling nose, and a strong jawline…

‘Damn it.’

He was the devil she despised, but even Sally was forced to admit the fact that he was good-looking. Why was the inside so ugly, yet he had such a wonderful outer shell…?

“Oh, right.”

“What is it?”

“I can tell by seeing the Captain that I like handsome and kind men.”

Dispute the fact that she thought he would make a mockery out of her again, Winston wrinkled his brow and looked only in front. Was it rude to say that he was not nice? It was not that he got the nickname of vampire for nothing.

“Handsome and kind men…”

Leon bit his lip once, then squeezed out a light laugh.

“Then, it makes sense.”

 


 
‘What kind of trickery is this?’

Standing at the marina, Sally couldn’t keep her mouth shut.

In front of her, a luxury cruise ship with orange lights lit one by one. It was an overly grandiose place for a boring date.

“Go in.”

Winston shoved her back as if anchored to land. As she walked down the ramp leading to the entrance, she felt confined in a lavish prison, caught by Winston.

“Excuse me, Captain.”

“What?”

“When are we coming back?”

“Four hours later.”

Sally stopped in front of the entrance. Even now, she wanted to go out and have dinner in town, though Winston, who was quick-witted, would not let her go. As expected, she was pushed into the cruise ship, and just as she was settling her foot in the boat, he threw her an assignment.

“Try to make four hours feel like eight hours.”

The servant who was standing in the lobby immediately approached the two of them.

“Welcome to the Sunset Cruise that will make for a fantastic night out.”

…Fantastic, what was fantastic?

The moment his gaze met Sally, who was standing next to Winston with a displeased look, the servant raised his eyebrows slightly. He let out a slick welcome and even glanced her up and down. It seemed that he was surprised to see the shabby clothes that did not suit a luxury cruise ship.

‘What are you looking at like that? It’s just a uniform.’

She glanced at him, and the servant turned his gaze away and gave Winston an exaggerated smile, something they’d see on an advertisement poster.

“Where can I guide you?”

“The restaurant.”

When the answer felt like a command, the servant guided the two of them to the elevator. Passing passengers and employees, they all cast strange glances at her once in a while.

Though it was a little awkward because she was not used to receiving attention, it was a good thing. As long as the other people’s gazes kept chasing them, Winston couldn’t do anything nonsense.

As the elevator door opened, he beckoned her to go in first, as if she was his lady. He didn’t seem like a gentleman to push her back with his hand.

“It’s a good night.”

The elevator operator raised his hat slightly to greet him. Sally greeted him and stood on the corner. Then, she was followed by Winston, who was standing in the middle and rummaging through the pockets of his jacket.

The next moment, he took out two stiff bills and handed them to the operator. The operator’s eyes widened, and Winston nodded slightly for him to accept the money.

‘Is he tipping the operator every time he gets on the elevator?’

Frowning at the luxury, which she couldn’t even afford, Winston then grabbed her and pulled her into the middle of the elevator. As she stood next to him, Sally took a step away from him, and he grabbed her again. Finally, Winston cornered her against the wall and smiled.

It soon became clear what all these unconventional actions were actually for.

The door closed, and the elevator, which had been going up smoothly, suddenly stopped and rumbled loudly.

“Agh!”

Since she was holding her arms tightly and was in the middle of the elevator, Sally couldn’t lean against the wall. The moment she collapsed on Winston’s chest, her body staggered.

His thick forearms wrapped around her shoulders.

“Practice your patience, Miss Bristol. Are you trying to attack me in front of people?”

Chapter 24.
“Get away from me.”

She elbowed the man’s stomach to stop him from sticking close to her. Ugh, she thought it might have worked because he bent down with a sound, though Winston pulled Sally with the other arm and locked her in his arms.

“Shall we go straight to the room, honey? How about room service?”

A suppressed laughter erupted from the employees standing behind them as he played with his filthy tricks. Sally couldn’t see anything in her eyes. She poked the nose of Winston’s expensive shoe with her heel.

“Are you saying yes too exaggeratingly?”

When he let go of her with a laugh, Sally immediately got out of Winston and stood at the door.

The servant standing next to them glanced at the two of them and opened the elevator door. As she followed the servant down the hallway, Winston came close to her and whispered softly.

“You won’t break my toes if you step on it lightly like that.”

Although she stomped on him with all her might, it was regarded as light. Sally, whose pride as a soldier had been hurt, shot sharply.

“You know that you are lucky that my heel is dull.”

“My honey doesn’t have high heels? Shall I buy it for you on the way home tomorrow morning…?”

“Don’t call me that.”

“Is it embarrassing, darling?”

Saying so, Winston then grabbed the hand holding the strap of her handbag and dragged her. Sally grabbed her hand and pulled it out, sarcastically.

“You are the best torture expert in the kingdom, Captain.”

“Torture, huh…”

The smile finally disappeared from the man’s lips, who used to tease her with a low-key smile even if he was hit in the stomach or stepped on his foot.

“Sally… Since you don’t know, I’ll give you some advice. It’s polite to put your arms around a man in a place like this.”

He spat out the word ‘advice’ in a command line. The next moment, Winston grabbed her hand, still disobedient, and placed it on his own arm at will.

“For the lady, quiche with truffle and spinach as main…”

Sally, who had been silently watching him place an order for the waiter, interrupted, “No, I have changed my mind. Instead of that, I’ll have the Porterhouse Steak.”

The waiter looked at Sally in surprise. At the same time, Winston was equally astonished.

It was because the Porterhouse Steak with a T-shaped bone in the middle was a menu item that was not often ordered by people who were not big eaters because of its large amount. A woman who was conscious of others’ eyes almost never ordered a menu that was a symbol of gluttony.

Sally tilted her head and smiled. She was going to make his libido cool, even by putting herself to shame in front of others.

Even though he was a rutting dog in front of her, at least in front of others, he was Winston, the embodiment of manners and dignity. Does he have to spend four hours with a mannerless and dignityless woman in front of other people…?

She calculated that he would get tired of her at once and get away.

Winston narrowed his eyes to Sally and corrected the order spell with a small smile.

“Then, for the lady, Porterhouse Steak.”

As the waiter left, she began to brush the cardigan’s fluff. Winston scoffed again as he watched the scene silently.

“Miss Bristol.”

“Yes?”

“If I called you a lady, you should act like a lady.”

“What does it mean to act like a lady…?”

She sometimes had to infiltrate the upper classes, so during her training, she had to learn the manners and etiquettes of the upper class. However, Sally pretended not to know and took off her flair.

“Ladies don’t eat Porterhouse Steaks.”

“Is that so? That’s too much.”

“And, usually before you interrupt, shouldn’t you be sorry?”

“Did I? I’m sorry.”

Winston, unwilling to point out more, let out a short sigh of shock.

“One more. If you are a lady, you should avoid dessert.”

“Then, you should have brought a lady to this place.”

He gazed at Sally with an ambiguous look, not sure if he was smiling or upset, before vagina his mouth again.

“Did you stop pretending to be a good maid in front of me now?”

“The Captain has stopped pretending to be a good master, too.”

Winston bit his lower lip hard. He was holding back laughter.

When the waiter brought wine, he took a large sip as soon as the glass was full. Meanwhile, Sally flipped over the fancy silverware and plates and pretended to check the label in a rustic way. Opposite her, people occasionally raised her eyes.

Crossing his legs, he scoffed again at the dirty nose of his shoe. Winston wiped the dirt off with a napkin and dropped it casually to the floor.

“What do you think? Do you like it?”

He asked, leaning back on his chair and placing his interlaced hands on his knees. Sally rolled her eyes and glanced around the restaurant, then nodded sarcastically.

“I understand why you brought me here.”

Winston tilted his head and raised his eyebrows, then immediately lowered them. He wanted to ask what she meant.

“It’s tacky.”

Leon couldn’t stop the sudden burst of laughter.

She dared to say that it was tacky when the most tacky thing in here was her. An intermittent laugh erupted from his mouth as he leaned his elbow on the armrest and rubbed his forehead with the knuckle of his index finger.

“I am having fun with you.”

If she had lied that she liked it like the Grand Lady, she would have become a boring woman in no time.

“You must make me sick. So far, it’s a failure.”

The woman ate up every piece of steak the size of her face.

Wasn’t it polite to have a conversation while savoring your meal slowly…?

However, the woman did not say a word and only ate the meat at a frightening pace. Halfway through, he pointed his chin out the window and said the sun was going down, and all she did was briefly reply, “Yes, it’s time for it.”

Watching the marvelous scene, Leon’s veal dish had already cooled down. When there was only a large T-bone on Sally’s plate, he put the knife and fork together next to the half-eaten dish.

“…You really ate it all.”

Then, they moved to the cafe. The woman who had been perusing the menu with a serious eye replied sarcastically.

“Did you think I couldn’t eat it?”

While drinks were in the back, the woman was looking at the front of the menu filled with cakes.

“You’ll eat… the cake too?”

Instead of answering, the woman asked Leon to order two cakes that she wanted to eat. Bewildered, he ordered the cake and coffee and stared at the woman who only glanced out of the dark window.

This date was going completely differently than he expected.

He naturally took the lead in any group from an early age. All situations were under his control. He expected it to be the case today, yet he had a strange feeling as if he was being swayed by that clumsy fox.

When the cake was served, the woman continued to eat without saying a word. Leon wanted to see how far she could fit into that tiny body, so he ordered another cake and asked.

“Don’t you go to Madame Benoa’s cafe every now and then?”

The woman then stopped the fork and raised her eyes to him.

“Yes.”

In the brief silence before answering, Leon sensed that she was confused to know that he had been watching her for quite some time.

“You eat everything well.”

The woman didn’t even do the courtesy to ask why he didn’t eat and took turns putting three cakes into her mouth, one at a time.

When the tip of her pink lips got the white cream, she poked out the tip of her tongue and even licked it. A mass of flesh a little darker than her lips glided over the dense folds. As her tongue vanished into her mouth, her lips wet with clear saliva opened again, and she snapped the bright red cherries.

…What a vulgar thing to do.

Leon crossed his legs towards the window and took a deep breath. Still, he couldn’t contain his urge.

“But, you won’t eat mine?”

The woman no longer showed any signs of displeasure. She even did the rude thing of shaking her head without even looking at the person speaking.

“Aren’t you afraid of getting fired now?”

Even that wasn’t enough, she ignored him.

“Miss Bristol, why don’t you try acting when you are cut off?”

“Hmm, me…?”

“You cried well in the office last time? Now that I see, I must have been fooled.”

The woman frowned as she poked her fork into the cake.

“It wasn’t acting. I was afraid of getting fired back then.”

The woman’s face soon returned expressionless. She didn’t show enough signals from her body to tell whether she was lying or not.

“But, now?”

“Right now, I feel like I have to make money with these insults.”

Leon’s face hardened coldly.

Insult. Him.

A promising military officer as a landowner… It was an insult to say that he, who lacked nothing from his lineage to his abilities, had no choice but to beg for something from a lowly maid. Leon wrinkled his brow as he thought so and put his hand inside his jacket.

He took out a cigar case and opened it roughly, chewing his words.

Chapter 25.
“Is it an insult to make a lady full?”

“You’re trying to make another stomach full.”

This woman, more and more…

Leon burst out laughing and closed the cigar case before putting it back inside his jacket.

She was a woman who smiled and asked, ‘When will we do the cleaning?’ even after witnessing the terrible torture and traces. He already knew that she had a bold personality. However, now, she had boldly put lewd remarks in her mouth.

“If a man falls for you, do you treat the poor person you fished as a disgrace?”

“I never tried to fish, so the poor person is me.”

She said she never tried to fish, and after eating the cake, the woman left immediately. She must have decided to drink up the most expensive champagne this time.

Getting drunk was usually a technique used by proud women to seduce a man and drag him to bed. Leon thought he would allow her to fish generously and ordered a bottle after the third cup, though the woman did not show any signs of intoxication.

“Aren’t you dizzy? How about lying down and resting?”

When he asked to go to the room, the woman did not respond and tilted the glass of champagne. Behind the woman’s head, outside the window, the marina, lit like broad daylight, was approaching.

It was already this late.

Leon sighed and rubbed his temples.

“Sally, I heard you said you’re going to make it boring?”

“Yes. You’ve been watching me eat for four hours.”

The woman wrinkled the back of her nose as if she felt sorry and added sarcastically.

“Silly.”

Leon smirked as he alternately cast his gaze between her close-knit legs and the face of the woman who was getting drunk and reddish.

“No, you know what I like too well for that. Are you born with it?”

The woman stared at him from the tip of the champagne glass on her lips. The eyes were saying, ‘why do you like me like this?’ Reading a bit of embarrassment, he smirked at an angle. Was this an opportunity to regain control?

“The clothes, I know that you purposely dressed in a rustic way… Though you made a mistake.”



“Light pink, red, brown. They are all my crazy favorite colors.”

The cold, pale pink that glints in the bathtub with her head buried in it. A fresh red color flowing through the split in the flesh, sticking onto brown dry, rough ropes…

All were the color of blood—The color of blood that excited him.

“You failed.”

&nbsp


 
The sedan passed the mansion’s front door and crossed the garden. The main building of the mansion, which was gradually approaching, was lit up brightly as if on a party day, even though it was not far past midnight.

“I’ve never had a date like this in my life.”

Winston rested his elbow on the side of the car window and rubbed his grinning lips. Meanwhile, Sally turned his eyes away and glanced at him sharply.

“Failed student, do it right.”

Even though she was called a failed student, she had nothing to say. It was because her plan to spread rumors failed miserably.

…No, was it too early to judge?

She had to pass the main building to get to the annex. As the car got close enough to clearly see the main gate, Sally exclaimed inside.

A luxury sedan stood on the stone road between the front door and the fountain. And beside it, Mrs. Winston was seeing off Grand Lady Aldrich… To run into two people at once who would be more wary of a woman who clung to Winston, the operation’s completion was right in front of her.

As the lights of the headlights and the sound of the engine drew closer, both women turned their heads in this direction. Sally made eye contact with them for a moment, then she lowered her head slightly and glanced at Winston like a sinner.

She had been found out, so she gave him a troubled look like what to do.

“Ah, the Grand Lady was supposed to come today. I forgot.”

Winston sighed briefly and parked his car behind the Grand Lady’s. She thought he was going to turn her car, though Sally followed Winston out of the car in astonishment.

As Mrs. Winstron’s eyes met hers, her face was also thickly covered with astonishment. There was also anger in her glaring eyes. At the same time, the Grand Lady never turned her eyes this way after the first eye contact. An awkward smile loomed on her calm face.

‘This should be enough.’

Sally, sorry that the innocent Grand Lady was in trouble, quietly opened the door of the car and came out. Without making a sound, she turned behind the car and tried to run away from the annex.

“Hey, what are you doing now?”

“Going in.”

Winston, who was greeting the two women, chased her and stopped her. He spoke calmly to his mother and his prospective fiancée before shoving Sally back into the car. That wasn’t enough, he leaned against the passenger seat door and locked her in.

Winston had done Sally’s plan himself, and that was too much.

He returned to the driver’s seat only after the Grand Lady’s car had left. Even though Mrs. Winston raised her voice in an angry voice, he didn’t say much and drove straight to the annex.

Sally glanced at Winston with a tired look.

She really wanted to open this person’s head. How the hell did his brain come to be? How could he be so proud even when his affair was found out…?

“Captain, I had a great time thanks to you, ack!”

As soon as they reached the annex, Winston grabbed Sally’s arm and dragged her as she was about to run into the maid’s room.

“Failed student, we should take time to discuss today’s failure.”

He grabbed her as if taking a criminal away and opened the door of the study on the first floor. The soldiers who were playing billiards inside froze as soon as they turned their heads in this direction.

“Everyone, get out.”

Although they all looked puzzled, they didn’t ask anything. Six soldiers rushed out at once and tried to close the door of the study.

Taking off her cardigan, she darted out of Winston’s hand. However, just before she escaped through the crack of the door, he slammed the door in front of her. A large hand gripped her hand as she grabbed the doorknob.

Sally raised her eyes and met Winston’s twisted smile.

“It is too late to discuss the failure.”

“The person who has failed her mission has no right to say that.”

His right hand opened up, and the red cardigan fell to the floor. His long fingers flicked up the convex buttons of her blouse one by one. The tip of his index finger began to roll the high peaks.

As she was staring at his hand movements, the nipples he rolled yesterday tingled uncontrollably.

Slap.

As soon as she slapped his hand, Winston leaned his head towards Sally. His arms were wrapped around her waist, and her body rose upward in an instant.

Instead of making a meaningless struggle on his shoulder, she checked the location of the military dagger and pistol tied around his waist. There was no point in resisting now. She had to use the right weapon at the right opportunity.

Sally’s turquoise eyes flashed as she glanced at the pool table passed in front of her. It was as if she had a blunt weapon spread out on the dark green cloth.

Winston walked to the other side of the door and laid her on the pool table. While Sally immediately got her body up and sat down, it was impossible for her to escape. It was because her lower body that hung over the ends was tucked in between his wide-open knees.

Sally calmed her pounding chest and stared at the strong man in front of her eyes.

…She could fight him today.

After all, Mrs. Winston would be kicking her out soon, so she shouldn’t worry about ruining her mission. All she had to do was fight, making sure it looked a little sloppy so it wouldn’t look like professionally trained in combat…

As long as she doesn’t kill him, that’s enough.

While Sally prepared to fight his vitals in her head, Winston only thought of smashing right into her.

“As you can see, you have completely failed.”

As he unbuckled the belt on his officer’s jacket and took off his clothes, it became clear what she was looking at. One button thread came loose because the front of the trousers, which had been hidden at the end of the jacket, could not come out as if it was about to burst.

Winston neatly folded the jacket in half, laid it neatly on the pool table, and started rolling up his sleeves. It was no different from the preparations he made whenever he personally went to torture.

“Your method failed, so now, I have to try mine.”

Meanwhile, Sally squinted at the holster over his jacket, estimating the distance. She might as well shoot him in the shoulder. Then, she wouldn’t be touched by Winston again until she was safely expelled.

He rolled up his opposite sleeve and scolded her for her failure.

“Even if you cry today, I won’t let you go.”

Winston leaned over towards Sally and placed his hands on her sides.

The space between their slightly gaped lips was mixed with breaths. The heat made both of them shiver like people on fire, but the meaning was different.

From a close distance where the tip of their noses almost touched, Winston spoke softly as if he was whispering while making eye contact.

Chapter 26.

“You have only two options today.”

Sally swallowed a gulp and stared straight into his eerie hot eyes. Winston’s chin also shook as she gulped before he whispered in a deep, submerged voice.

“First. To have a gentle sex with me and walk out of here in good shape.”

He slowly blinked his eyes and sighed. It was a method he liked to use when he put the torture target into a psychological corner.

“Second. Have a forced sex with me, come out a little…”

His left hand suddenly came to her face. As Sally twisted her head slightly sideways to avoid it, his fingertips slipped through her tangled hair and grabbed the back of her head lightly.

“…Broken.”

She trembled as if she had been bitten by a sharp tooth when his lips pressed against her cheek and gently brushed against her skin.

“Which one will you choose?”

He stepped back and stared intently into Sally’s eyes.

“Either way, I’ll do whatever you want.”

Faced with blue eyes with contempt that reminded him of a young girl at the beach, Leon smiled crookedly and put his finger in the knot of the tie. He pulled the knot and untied it in one breath, and as he held up her little hand that was clasping the billiard table, the woman grabbed her hand roughly and pulled it out.

“You don’t need to tie me up.”

“So, what is your choice?”

“The first.”

A satisfied smile spread across Leon’s lips. As he grabbed the tip of her tiny chin and was about to swallow her lips, the woman stopped him with her hand.

“Just promise me one thing.”

He raised his eyebrows with a generous smile as though he would listen to anything.

“Promise me I won’t bleed.”

Leon frowned and answered.

“I can’t promise you here.”

His eyes pointed between the woman’s legs.

“I promise anywhere else.”

The woman gazed at him with an earnest look with determination, and then pulled her hand over her lips.

Leon, who had been trying to bite her thick lips, which he had craved for the rest of the evening, hardened the moment the woman did something unexpected.

The woman’s left hand covered his cheek. The milky eyelids slid down and covered half of their turquoise eyes as the pale pink lips with a slight tinge of blood approached Leon. At that moment, there was a ringing in his ear as if a bomb had exploded from a distance.

He watched the woman kiss him in a hazy fever.

The moment the woman’s soft flesh touched the tip of his dry lips, the dizzying shiver that had been buried in his memory ran through his body. Finally, the woman’s lips completely overlapped him. Leon’s chest rose and fell noticeably, and his breathing became harsh.

The flesh was warm to the touch. It was even sweet because she ate a lot of sweets all night.

The woman’s lips slowly opened his lips and gently crushed his flesh. Then, it opened up a little bit more and sucked on his lips before pulling back with a squeaky sound. The sound of their lips clashing was similar to the sound of a slap on the cheek.

In fact, it was much more secretive and a little more quaint.

The woman’s lips came over again. He wanted to squish and embrace her right now and devour her lips, sucking and chewing.

Leon suppressed his impulse by drawing in the few remaining reasons. He had only thought of doing it forcibly, though it was surprisingly exciting to see the woman actively initiating it.

He slowly moved his lips together.

Occasionally he closed his eyes and opened them without realizing it. Then, he stared at the woman’s reaction unconsciously. His eyes, which had always been bright, were blurred. His chest was pounding as he was short of breath.

It wasn’t bad because he felt relieved that he wasn’t fretting alone. Leon patted the woman’s neck and back as if to soothe her, letting a small sigh flow into her mouth.

…Can it end once?

He was sure it would be boring once he tried it, but with just one kiss, he already had doubts.

Did she ever do it with someone called her fiancé…?

A sudden thought spread through his hands as his hand holding the woman grew stronger.

In the end, Leon lost his temper and shoved his tongue deep into the gap between her gaping lips. At that moment, the woman’s eyes fluttered wildly. His hazy eyes also became apparent. He thought she was going to refuse his rough kiss, but she was quite active and tangled her tongue.

Did they have to wait countless times by grabbing and rubbing each other’s soft, moist flesh? The woman turned her head to the right, so he tilted his head a little more to the left and sucked her tongue hard.

“Darling, do I look so lame?”

Leon’s left hand gripped the woman’s wrist. Her fingertips touched the cover of his holster. The man’s lips went back. However, the hand that was holding her as if it was going to break her wrist remained the same.

Winston burst out laughing and bit his lips that were wet with Sally’s saliva. She was staring at him with eyes burning with cold anger, then he suddenly grabbed her neck and knocked her down.

“Ugh.”

“You broke the promise, Sally Bristol.”

Her body thumped down on the pool table. The billiard balls scattered in the corner shook, and the cue stick that had been hanging over the corner fell onto the carpet, making a dull noise.

He squeezed her neck forcefully and ripped her blouse apart.

“Gasp, Captain, I can’t breathe…”

She scratched his forearm and pretended to be suffocated. Once her neck and spine were suppressed, Sally would have a hard time getting out of it, so she had to use some tricks.

Winston, who was going to bite the flesh out of her bra, lifted his eyes and glanced up at her. As if he had deliberately held her breath and made her face red, he released her neck and squeezed Sally’s wrists together, pressing them over her head.

The other hand rolled up the skirt and pulled them into her back.

Just as he was about to pull the bloomer down, Sally curled her legs up and crouched them over Winston’s thighs. The recoil caused by hastily raising her legs and putting weight on her heels made her able to slam Winston’s chin hard.



The man frowned and lowered his upper body.

At that moment, Sally turned her body over, not missing the moment his hand loosened from her wrist. She quickly crawled over the pool table and headed to the other side, moving her ankle.

Winston mumbled a curse and grabbed her and pulled her as if he was about to break her ankle. The moment she was dragged away, unable to withstand the formidable force of a military officer, she grabbed a ball that had been rolling around on the billiard table.

Sally, who was pretending to be dragged along, turned her body and struck him in the head with the billiard ball as he pulled her buttock into his groin.

“Ugh!”

The hard ball hit his forehead in a flash. He closed his eyes tightly in the sudden shock and squeezed her arm.

“Ah!”

Her arms were bent wildly behind her back as if they were about to pop off from her shoulders. As he pressed his thumb hard on her wrist, her hand opened on its own, and the billiard ball slammed onto the billiard table.

“Haa…”

A sigh, a mixture of frustration and anger, escaped Winston briefly.

Sally took a deep breath and turned her head behind her shoulder. The disorganized platinum blonde was stained with blood. She stared silently as Winston wiped his hand at the blood that started running to his forehead.

His eyes slowly faded out of focus.

“Sally…”

His dangerously low voice was seething with excitement, “You are too dangerous for me. You know very well what I like.”

He suddenly rubbed his blood-soaked finger on her lips.

“Heup!”

Sally turned her head to avoid it, and her cheeks were stained with his blood. Winston grabbed her chin and pressed their lips together.

A lump of hot flesh ran wildly over her lips.

Winston let go of her chin, though she couldn’t take her lips off him. It was because the mean bastard bit her lower lip with his tooth. When she turned her head, it felt as if her flesh would fall apart. Meanwhile, his hand, which released her chin, turned downward.

Sally groped her uncaught hand around her waist as he draped her waist over the pool table and lifted her skirt. The moment the dropped billiard ball touched her fingertips, there was a roar and the book on the other side of the bookcase collapsed.

Winston caught the ball and threw it.

“Ah!”

Her arm was bent behind her back. He eventually took all means of resistance from Sally.

Eventually, Sally’s bloomer was dragged down the middle of her thigh. The sound of hastily unbuttoning his belt and buttons behind her exposed butt was horrifying.

“I will kill you.”

“Haa… Before that, you will die.”

Winston exhaled a rough breath and leaned his body against her. As the hot lump of flesh touched her secret place, Sally twisted her waist and struggled, but to no avail.

“It will hurt a lot. I’m so angry right now, it’s hard to be considerate.”

Chapter 27.

It was the moment he bit Sally’s ear, gently whispering an evil warning.

The library door swung open. Sally raised her head, and her eyes met the woman who was about to enter the study. The woman screamed as she witnessed her son trying to bed the maid on the billiard table.

Thud.

Mrs. Winston immediately passed out and fell to the floor.

“Damn it…”

A low swear word fell from the back of Sally’s head.

 


 
Leon frowned as a sharp needle pierced his scalp. He was hit by the billiard ball by the maid, and it tore a spot. Even though he was just about to wipe the blood off, his mother, fussing over it, called the doctor around midnight.

Still, he didn’t think he was the one who needed a doctor.

His mother, who sat across from Leon and the coffee table, was draped on the wing chair like a corpse. It was ridiculous to see her being served by three maids and an ice bag on her head.

“That’s enough. Go.”

When Leon sent out the annoying doctor who was fussing about concussion risk and fracture potential, his mother sent the maids out, too. As she gazed straight at him, she looked like she was going to be hysterical soon.

“Oh, dear… Oh, God…”

Just as expected. His mother started looking for God, and it triggered her hysteria.

“Leon, are you out of your mind?”

Leon sat cross-legged on the wing chair, tapping his fingers on his lap.

“Haven’t you been acting quietly so far…? But why are you doing this with the engagement in front of you? Are you driving me to the brink of death with a nervous breakdown?”

The woman who was egocentric in everything… She insisted that his grown-up son’s lust for women was also a rebellion to win his mother’s attention and affection.

Sadly, Leon didn’t want affection from his mother.

As a sneer leaked from her son’s lips, Elizabeth picked up the ice pack from the table again and placed it on her forehead.

“Are you going to smile like that at my funeral?”

“You have nothing to worry about with the engagement.”

“The Grand Lady saw you meeting another woman, there’s nothing to worry about?!”

“It’s not like love, it’s a deal, isn’t it? No matter what I do with other women—whether it be the Grand Lady or the Grand Duke—they have nothing to lose.”

At his words, Elizabeth let out a long sigh and closed her eyes.

“Yes, you’re always right.”

Stubborn son.

Still, he has never been wrong, so she let it go as he should.

The vicious stigma as the monstrous vampire from Camden. She had been proud of his son’s loyalty to the Royal Family, a medal he had no choice but to get. She tolerated the torture chamber in the mansion and the constant passing of soldiers in ghastly uniforms.

However, to fall for a woman, even a lowly maid… She couldn’t stand this at all.

“Leon, I’ve been telling you since you were little. Don’t forget your father. How hard has our family been since then? I don’t want to lose you either.”

You don’t want to lose your chance to get a title.

Leon twisted his lips and squinted his eyes. This was due to the sharp pain as his wound pulled.

“…I’ll be honest. Whether it was my fault or your father’s fault, I was worried because you looked at women like worms. After marriage, it will be difficult.”

Thinking that the words ‘to see the second generation’ between ‘after marriage’ and ‘it will be difficult’ were omitted, he then scraped the blood from under his fingernails with a military dagger.

“But then, you suddenly became a different person and then with a woman, and even so, a maid! I’d rather you’ll be looking at them like worms again, please…!”

Leon, who was appreciating the wound the woman had inflicted on the back of his hand, smiled a little.

“What the hell did that maid do to you?”

At that, he raised his head. While he was gazing at his mother, his focus was actually on the air behind her.

‘I really want to know. What the hell did that maid do to me?’

Unknowingly, his hand went inside the officer’s jacket. Leon took out a cigar, lit it, and took a deep breath, deep in thought.

He had never been bothered by lust. Since he had lived with little to no feeling, he couldn’t be bothered to feel.

Still, he’d been annoyed since over a month ago when the maid took over the torture chamber on her own. The smell of blood began to get stronger from the smell of her flesh, and the smell of her body permeated his mind and couldn’t be erased.

It was as if the woman, with her cunning tactics, had mastered his thoughts and manipulated his body.

From the day he first recognized the color of the woman’s eyes, it got worse. He felt as if a ship that had been sinking slowly split in two in an instant and plunged into the deep sea. He didn’t even know the ship was sinking, and for him, he had no choice but to drown in a sea of ??impulses, unprepared.

Even looking back on himself, for the past month, he was unhinged.

He was so obsessed with sex that he often forgot what he was doing… He did just that today.

Even though he remembered the Grand Lady coming in the evening, he completely forgot it the moment the maid offered him a date. He couldn’t help but be shocked as he had not forgotten things.

Besides, for the past month, he had forgotten his noble dignity and flirted with the woman like a back alley gangster. He promised himself that he should be patient, and the moment they met, he lost his reason.

Leon was displeased with the fact that he had lost control of his body and reason.

“That maid needs to be fired right now.”

Elizabeth stared at her son with an unconvinced face. It was because she expected that Leon would object.

However, he fell deep in thought with his arms crossed and muttered something unexpected.

“If it bothers you, you should fire her.”

“What?”

Leon, leaving his bewildered mother, stood up and headed for the door.

“Leon!”

“Didn’t you tell me to fire her right away?”

“What?”

…Was he really going to fire the woman who got really close with him at once?

Elisabeth lost her speech at that behavior that was beyond her expectations. Even though he was the son of her own flesh and blood, sometimes, his cold-blooded side was eerie.

She stared with tired eyes at the door where her son had disappeared.

 


 
Sally wandered around the maid’s room.

‘The maid chief will come and fire me soon.’

She was going to pack her things in advance so that she could leave tomorrow morning, but for some reason, she was so dizzy that she couldn’t even change my clothes. She still had a burning pain in her shoulder.

The back of her head, which had been pushed and hit by the pool table, was also tingling.

If Mrs. Winston hadn’t arrived in time, she would have been bedded by him. Although she was a woman who was the epitome of the snobbish noble, only for that moment, Elizabeth Winston was an angel.

“Ack!”

Sally let out a short scream unknowingly the moment she brushed her face with her hands and touched her lips. Gazing in the mirror, she saw that her lower lip, which had been bitten by Winston, was swollen.

‘Damn bastard.’

But soon, the accusation changed.

‘Damn me.’

She should have pulled out the pistol sooner. For quite some time before that, his mind had been sold to her kiss. The problem was that Sally’s mind was also sold… She fell in love with the kiss she tried to distract him from…

Crazy, really.

 

“This is a kiss. My first kiss…”

“So, you don’t like it…?”

“…Good.”

“Shall I… do it again?”

 

As she buried her face in her hands, two young voices exchanged faded conversations in her head.

‘Crazy, really.’

Her mother in heaven would click her tongue as she looked down at her pathetic daughter. The moment Sally rubbed her face violently, the door rang.

Has the maid chief finally arrived…?

Sally, who was vagina the door, shut it directly with a bang when Winston and her eyes met through the narrow gap. She pressed her shoulder on it to prevent him from forcing the door to open and locked it inside her with the key before clasping the latch when the bastard called her.

“Sally.”

“Did you come to do something that will make Mrs. Winston passed out again?”

Laughter flowed from outside.

“That’s not it. Yes, this would be better.”

Then, Winston made her unexpected offer.

“I’ll find you a better job because it will be good for you as well. Any letter of recommendation with my signature would be easy to get into. Mrs. Belmore said she’ll find someone else soon, so you just have to wait until then. Then, I’ll see you.”

Winston just said what he had to say in an instant—like a student reciting without even breathing, fearing that he would forget the poem he had memorized hard—and went away.

Because she didn’t expect to be told to leave by him, Sally stood stunned. The hand, which had been tightly clenched in a fist, released its power in a sudden release of strength, and she could feel herself stumble.

“Haa, maniac.”

It was crazy, but things were going as planned. Sally shook off the unknown discomfort and buried her exhausted body in bed.

Chapter 28.

Campbell sat at his desk, occasionally squinting at his boss by the window.

It was already a week. Captain Winston was working in the Western Command’s Domestic Intelligence Office, not in the outbuilding.

Even though it was normal for him to work in the office instead of his home, it was unusual for Captain Winston. The upper management had so far turned a blind eye to the way he worked, that could be a security breach because of his position and performance.

But, why was he suddenly working in the office these days? Perhaps, it had something to do with the annex maid leaving soon…?

Campbell laughed at himself at the end of his absurd imagination. There was no way a man who was fearless enough not to be afraid to break the rules without hesitation would be afraid of a maid who was not half his size and would avoid the annex.

“Campbell.”

Campbell, who had smirked again and flinched.

“Yes, Captain.”

He straightened his back and looked at the captain, who was only looking at the papers on the desk. His eyes were sharply fixed.

Goosebumps grew on the back of Campbell’s back because he didn’t feel good. As soon as the captain lifted his index finger, he sprinted from his seat as if there were a spring attached to his hip, and walked up to the desk.

“What’s the matter?”

On the desk lay a pile of reports Campbell had submitted this morning. It was the result of investigating the domestic intelligence department and the personnel in charge of Winston’s annex.

While he didn’t notice anything that stood out, so he thought it was just a matter of unnecessary suspicion, the captain collected three files from them and pressed them with his index finger.

Immediately he lowered his voice and added,

“Under headquarters’ knowledge, covertly.”

 


 
After today, this mission is over.

 

“Come back safely.”

 

As she vacuumed the floor of the building’s hallway, Sally remembered Jimmy’s voice again from a few days ago and smiled. He seemed to regret that she was fired while trying to do her mission but didn’t say a word to her.

It seemed that he added that he wanted to see her soon. At that moment, the sad feelings melted away.

‘…Tomorrow I will see Jimmy after a long time.’

It’d been over a year already. She hadn’t returned to her hometown since she infiltrated the Winstons.

Sally sighed as she pushed the vacuum toward the entrance to the annex. It was because the nose of a pair of black shoes came into the edge of her view while looking down at the floor. She had just finished cleaning the carpet, and the shoes were about to get dirty again.

“Hey. Please, go out again…”

Sally, who was about to scold them to brush their feet on the rug on the stairway and come back in, hardened her face the moment she lifted her head.

Winston walked in with Campbell and several of the annex’s soldiers.

“Hello.”

Sally leaned her body against the wall of the hallway, avoiding him and only nodded her head.

When Winston stopped her in front of Sally, those who followed him stopped as well. Fred’s eyes met hers. He smiled faintly at Sally, and a look of sadness emanated from the drooping eyebrows. When she said she was leaving, he was very sad.

 

“Now, I don’t know who to turn to.”

“There is Peter, and there is Nancy. You will do well.”

 

Fred rubbed his lips and kicked the lawn in the garden with the toe of his shoe.

 

“Are you going to marry the commander-in-chief when you return?”

 

He was talking about Jimmy.

Sally shrugged her shoulders with an ambiguous smile.

 

“I do not know either. I don’t think it’s time yet.”

“If it weren’t for that dirty monarchy pig, you would have been able to work here with me for a long time.”

 

Rumors that Winston had tried to assault the maid had already spread widely among the soldiers in charge of the annex. Hearing the rumor, Fred gritted his teeth. He didn’t know that part of the reason Sally almost suffered was because of the orders from Jimmy.

 

“…I will definitely avenge you.”

 

Sally placed her hand on his fist, clenched so tightly that his veins swelled.

 

“Don’t do that. Just do the tasks assigned to you. Don’t stand out in front of Winston. I failed brilliantly.”

 

Saying that, a bitter smile spread across her face.

 

“And, it would be nice to have you running Winston aground as a wedding present someday.”

 

Recalling the conversation from a few days earlier, Sally took her eyes off Fred and glanced at Winston. He was still standing in the middle of the hallway beckoning to the men behind him.

“Go to the office first.”

As soon as he gave the instructions, the soldiers passed the two of them and climbed the stairs.

Fred kept looking at Sally with concern.

“What’s the matter?”

She asked Winston with a cold tone. However, he didn’t answer and just took off his black coat. Then, he winced as he swept up his cold blonde hair with one hand.

“Sally, I will never forget you. You’re the first woman who almost smashed my head. Isn’t it romantic?”

He had deliberately touched his wounds to make her feel guilty.

Hearing that, Sally asked back as she imitated the twisted smile on his lips, “Can I smash the right side, too?”

Winston laughed to himself before showing his true face and clasped his arms tightly.

“You don’t have to be so sharp. There’s only one thing I need you to do as a maid.”

“What is going on?”

“The torture room. I think there will be something to clean, so stop cleaning here and prepare for it.”

“Yes.”

Sally snapped back and swallowed a gulp.

…Who else was caught? Apparently, a new ‘guest’ was coming the day before her withdrawal. Because of that, she was even more worried if Fred would do well on his own.

Winston immediately turned his back and headed for the stairs. Sighed as he unplugged the vacuum cleaner, he climbed the stairs and turned around abruptly.

“It’s too bad. To be honest, none of the guys under me did what I did to my liking as well as you do.”

“I know. How did this happen?”

After an exaggerated sarcasm, Winston raised a side of his lips in a smile. It was a smile that looked bittersweet. Sally stared at him for a moment as he turned his back without saying anything and headed towards the office, then headed to the basement.

 


 
The atmosphere was unusual.

Fred sat upright on a chair in the hallway in front of the office and glanced around. At each end of the hallway stood a soldier. It seemed to keep him from escaping. Two hours ago, Lieutenant Campbell had a job and called out to three of the soldiers, so he followed without a second thought.

In front of the annex, the lieutenant brought four more soldiers.

‘Until then, I thought I had to move heavy furniture…’

But, Campbell took two of them to the office and placed the other two in the hallway. The three of them, including Fred, were seated in a row on a chair in the hallway.

After Winston entered the office, he called in one by one. And now, Fred was the only one left.

‘…What did I do wrong? Did they find out? I didn’t do anything.’

Cold sweat filled his fists on his lap. His hands were slippery and as he was about to wipe his pants, the office door swung open.

It was the second corporal, who entered, came out. However, his face was pale blue.

…What the hell happened inside?

“Private Fred Smith.”

As he watched the Corporal’s back dash away, Campbell stood over the door and called him.

“Yes, yes…!”

Fred gasped for breath and dragged his shaky legs into the office.

Nevertheless, the tension in the office was absurdly harmonious. On the chess table in front of the bookshelf, as light jazz was playing on the radio, the two soldiers Campbell had brought inside were playing chess.

Campbell shut the door behind his back and went straight to the couch before sitting down next to Captain Winston. The captain was in a comfortable position with his legs crossed and his back reclined at an angle. He held a half-burned cigar in one hand and a crystal glass about a finger full of whiskey in the other.

“Ah, Private Smith.”

Winston smiled, curling the corners of his eyes at Fred, who stood at the doorstep. It seemed that the person who exuded dangerous energy that could explode if touched mistakenly these days was drunk.

“Yes, Captain.”

“Sit down.”

He pointed to the chair facing the sofa with the tip of his cigar. Fred still couldn’t relax, so he moved his stiff legs towards it. As he sat down and swallowed a gulp, Winston and Campbell filled each other’s whiskey glasses and chatted.

Finally, Winston turned his gaze to Fred and stared at him without saying a word. The corners of his eyes were still softly curved though his eyes were sharp for some reason.

Was it because of that terrifying blue light…?

“Excuse me… Captain.”

Instead of answering, Winston raised his eyebrows and urged him. The smile on his lips seemed quite generous, but Fred couldn’t help but ask.

“Did I do something wrong?”

Winston smirked as he tilted the crystal glass to his mouth.

The unpredictable reaction made Fred even more nervous, while Winston put his glass down and shook his head slowly.

“No such thing.”

“Ah…”

“Why? Is there anything that bothers you?”

“No, nothing.”

Winston raised an eyebrow and tilted the whiskey bottle into the empty glass in front of Fred.

Chapter 29.

“Private Smith.”

“Yes.”

“Relax.”

His voice was very soft. As the tall captain held out the cup, Fred leaned forward and received it politely.

“…Thank you.”

It was disrespectful to give back the alcohol that was given. However, Fred was afraid that he would make a mistake by getting drunk. Because of that, he drank only enough to wet his lips and slowly set the glass down on the table.

Winston, watching him, removed the cigar from his lips and spat out long white smoke.

“I’m calling you here today because I have a mission to entrust you secretly without the superiors knowing. I picked the right person to do it, and you’re one of those candidates.”

Stunned by the unexpected situation, Fred blinked. He only thought that Winston was displeased with him because of the last time he vomited in the torture chamber.

‘…It wasn’t that?’

This was perhaps a golden opportunity to infiltrate the intelligence department as a key personnel and make a contribution. Then, he might one day win the trust of Little Jimmy and become an officer in the Revolutionary Army.

Fred didn’t hide his joy as he greeted Winston.

“It is an honor.”

Winston smiled as he tapped the ashes into the ashtray and curled the corners of his eyes.

“The two kids in front of you were eliminated. So, I have high expectations for you.”

“Do not disappoint the Captain.”

As Campbell assisted by his side, Fred exclaimed with a determined expression.

“Yes, I will do anything if you leave it to me.”

“He’s already reliable.”

As Winston smiled at Campbell, Fred smiled along with him.

“Private Fred Smith.”

“Yes, Captain!”

“I heard you’re from Fairhill in Leven, right?”

The moment the question was asked, Fred’s smile went into incontinence.

“Yes, yes. You’re right.”

No, it was false. It was just fake information in Fred Smith’s personal statement that was fabricated by the upper management. Fred swallowed a gulp, trying to remember information about Fairhill Village he had heard in the pre-infiltration training.

“I have work to do there.”

“…Yes. If you leave it to me, I will work hard.”

“It’s not a big deal, the town council has been informed that Blanchard’s bastards are mixed in. I want you to go and do some research. It’s the town you’re from, so even if you go around a bit, no one will doubt you.”

Fred was relieved. It was because the revolutionary army would not send spies to a small mountain village with a population of less than five hundred. It seemed that Winston was wasting his time on misinformation.

“Ah, the name of the village chief of Fairhill…”

Winston looked at Fred, rubbing his forehead with the hand holding the cigar as if in trouble because he couldn’t remember.

“…It’s Mr. Mason.”

Fred only hoped that the answer he remembered with difficulty was the correct answer.

“Oh, right.”

At the reply, he let out a breath he had been holding back.

“It’s famous for skiing in winter.”

“Yes, that’s right.”

“I also went on a family trip when I was fifteen. Private Smith was born and raised there, so maybe you ran into him.”

Fred only smiled awkwardly instead of answering.

How did a wealthy man like Winston end up in the countryside where there were no luxury hotels…?

“Oh, come to think of it, something really funny happened.”

As Winston turned his head to Campbell, he began to quibble about his memories of Fairhill, “There was a tavern under the ski resort.”

‘…Is this person really drunk?’

Fred, relaxed a little, took the whiskey glass in front of him and moistened his dry mouth.

“There, they sell warm vin chaud, and the owner thought I was an adult just by looking at my size. That day, Jerome and I both had a drink and fell in the snow on the way out of the tavern.”

“Oh, my.”

“If the tavern diners hadn’t found us, we would have frozen to death. It is a pleasant memory.”

“It must be a terrible memory for Mrs. Winston.”

As the two burst into laughter, Fred laughed and put down the glass. As soon as alcohol was added, his stiff body loosened.

“Fred, you know Mr. Albert? The pot-bellied tavern owner.”

“Ah, yes, yes.”

Even though he didn’t know, it did not make sense to say he didn’t know. Winston grinned at Campbell as Fred gave him a quick chuckle.

“He was a delightful guy.”

“Yes, it is. Haha…”

“Oh, and there was a festival held every winter…. Ah! Feast of St. Maurice.”

“Yes, that’s right.”

“It’s a bizarre tradition. Oh, you should hear this from a native. Fred, tell Campbell.”

Winston leaned deep on the sofa, biting his cigar. Fred’s heart beat faster in his anticipating gaze.

‘…Have I ever heard of such a holiday?’

He quickly went through his memory. Just as his hands were about to start to sweat again, he remembered the symbol of the town.

A man holding his severed neck with both hands.

“That is… St. Maurice, from our village, was decapitated and killed…”

“Right.”

As Winston nodded his head, Fred moistened his dry lips and raised the corners of his lips slightly.

‘Good job, Fred.’

Now, even his older sisters, who usually treated him as a child and ignored him, would have no choice but to acknowledge him.

“The villagers baked and ate gingerbread in the shape of a human that day. Right?”

“Yes.”

“Before you eat, you rip off the neck like this.”

Winston grabbed the middle of the cigar and broke it in half. Even though it looked bloody, as the people around him started laughing, Fred laughed along with him. Then, he tossed the cigar in two into the ashtray and blew out a hazy smoke.

At one point, he didn’t even know if it was Fred’s misunderstanding that sparks splattered from his ice-cold eyes.

“Fred, can I tell you another interesting story?”

As Winston leaned close to him, Fred leaned over and listened to him as he whispered slowly.

“I’ve never been to Fairhill.”

Fred couldn’t hide his confusion at the sudden confession. Winston stared at him, who must have been shaking his eyes, and smiled softly.

“I’ve never been there, but I know this. The name of the feast is not St. Maurice, but St. Nicholas.”

Saying so, he suddenly stood up. Fred stood stiff in the same position he had faced Winston. The clenched fist on his lap suddenly became cold, and he trembled. The sound of the chess game played stopped behind him.

“Oh, and it’s rye bread, not gingerbread.”

After the laughter, a ferocious voice murmured.

“To fall into such a trivial trap.”

Although he had to run from here, his body did not listen.

All Fred could do was glance down at his trembling limbs and turn his eyes to Winston, who was leaning against the window and staring out.

“Fred Smith. Why did you write your hometown falsely on your enlistment application?”

Leon pulled back the thin lace curtain and followed something outside the window with his eyes, muttering to himself.

“My conclusion is…”

He slowly opened and closed his eyes.

“That means you are a terrible spy.”

In conclusion, the first two interrogated were not spies. After pushing it a little, it seemed that they embezzled public money and squandered what they had spent on entertainment. It was a real waste of time.

“Campbell.”

As soon as he gave the instructions to Campbell, he pulled out a yellow file folder from under the sofa and opened it. Shortly thereafter, a reading of Fred Smith’s enlistment application was held against the background of a funny jazz melody playing on the radio.

“Name, Fred John Smith. Father, Robert John Smith. Occupation, butcher.”

“A son who grew up with a father who works at a butcher’s shop, paled when seeing blood and vomits. Campbell, does this make sense?”

“No.”

“Did you hear it? This is your mistake, greenhorn.”

Campbell was tongue-tied again at his superior’s sharpness. It was a contradiction that no one else would notice.

However, it was so trivial that it would be over if the other party insisted that it was a conjecture. His superior, who knew this, revealed more contradictions and lies with suggestive questions without touching the contradiction.

Without realizing it, the spy made countless mistakes, and he was trembling without saying a word to refute them.

It was as if the rat had ripped open its own stomach and taken its own breath.

“Arrest him.”

Behind Leon’s back, the sound of pulling chairs resounded all at once. The waiting soldiers stood up from the chess table. There was a loud scream from behind him, perhaps the rat that had fallen tried to run away belatedly.

“No! Not me…!”

It was also unsightly to deny it too late.

His scream echoed in the hallway. Only when the echo faded did Leon turn his bitter gaze away and turn his back. Outside the window he had been staring at, the maid with brown hair was dragging the laundry cart towards the main building.

Chapter 30.
“No… It’s not me…”

The figure of the young man sitting across the iron table in the torture chamber was difficult to look at. He cried like a baby, and his hands and feet, handcuffed to the iron chair, trembled. The interrogation hadn’t even started yet, and he was only tied up.

If he got scared a little bit more, he looked like he was ready to pee.

“AAHKK!”

All Leon did was pick up the nipper on the table. How weak the rat that Little Jimmy had sent, just that alone made his chair shake and he let out a deafening scream.

Leon’s mouth, staring at the spy in front of him, got bitter.

This was an insult.

The rebel leaders saw him so mercifully that they let an untrained kid infiltrate under him? If they were going to send someone, send a matching opponent. It was a humiliation to play around with such low-level insults.

Still, it was true that he got infiltrated by a greenhorn.

But, who would have imagined…?

To the Domestic Intelligence Office’s torture chamber, they would send a weak and sloppy person to spy on this key military facility. He couldn’t even remember his own fake identity. He must have been an idiot who graduated at the bottom of the rebels’ ‘brainwashing school.’

“Hey, you know what?”

Leon gave instructions in words that the lacking child, who would soon become blood and flesh, in front of him could understand.

“After the so-called ‘revolutionary government’ took office, the unemployment rate soared and the country became poorer than before.”

He then leaned back in his chair and tapped the edge of the table with his nipper blade.

“Crying for equality… Do you think that being poor together is the equality that your people have drawn?”

Fred didn’t seem to be listening to his kind instruction. His pale blue eyes flickered following the nipper.

“Revolution.”

Leon gazed at him with a smirk.

“You are just a bunch of gangsters.”

The self-proclaimed Revolutionary Army was pathetic. Even now, the young man named ‘Fred Smith’ did not show any resentment even when he insulted the Revolutionary Army.

“The driver.”



“I wondered why you were so white and agitated, it was someone you knew.”



“I wondered why that old rat didn’t give out the right information until the end… Now, is it your fault?”

“That, that—”

“Did he believe they would save him? Was he afraid that if he blew it all off, he would get killed?”

How scared was this beaming chick? He was afraid to finish his words, Leon exchanged ridicule with Campbell. However, the ridicule was quickly erased from his face.

“Four people were killed in the last raid. They were both crippled.”



“Because of the information you stole.”

“N, no. I-I never did that. As the captain said, I’m just a novice… I-I was stupid, so I couldn’t do anything.”

The young man who had been keeping his mouth shut when Winston insulted his group and ideology, suddenly poured out his words. That too, as Winston said, he must be truly stupid or something that he meekly admitted himself that he was a spy.

“The crime is very bad.”

The young man didn’t know how to use his head. He was also a coward who vomited when he saw blood. Even with a little intimidation, he would spit out the information he knew. Because of that, Leon decided to use the easy method instead of the complicated ones.

“It’s enough to go to the prison camp, and within a day or two…”

Leon lengthened his words and glanced at Campbell, who was sitting next to him.

“Get shot.”

Leon nodded at Campbell’s resolute answer, and the spy’s face grew even more blue.

“I, I didn’t…”

The young man cried like a child, opened and closed his mouth to see if he had anything to say before he started begging for his life.

“Please, please save… Please, save me.”

“Well. I do not know such a thing as mercy.”

Despair appeared on Fred’s face after hearing Leon’s words.

“But, you know what a deal is.”

Despair gave way to hope in an instant.

Leon stared at the young man who begged him as if he would do anything with disgusting eyes… Is this young man a key figure in the rebels? Does he know where his base is? How much could he fill in the gaps in the information of the upper management?

While it seemed unlikely, there was no harm in trying.

“So, Fred… Oh, is Fred your real name?”

The young man nodded his head. It was funny how quickly he turned into a dog that listened when he had been a dog that came to bite Winston.

“The longer you drag on, the more expensive your life will be.”

So, don’t rebel, and be honest with your answers.

“First of all, I want to get rid of some old grievances with Little Jimmy, man-to-man. Where can I meet him ?”

The young man’s eyes fluttered slightly.

“…That is, I don’t know.”

At that moment, Leon’s gloomy face changed.

Winston couldn’t believe he knew the location of the base. What he thought was a small fish, turned out to be a big fish with key information.

“I am not very patient.”

Leon tapped the desk again with the tip of the nipper. Fred was nauseous watching Winston pluck the driver’s nails with this nipper, so this alone should work.

“Please, please, do something else…”

Something else… There were many other things. Let’s put off Little Jimmy’s information and start small. What should he dig first?

Leon glanced at Campbell and asked.

“Little Riddle came to Winsford recently.”

“Right.”

However, the spy only blinked stupidly when he heard the name ‘Little Riddle.’ Come to think of it, this was the nickname given to her by the military, so he might not have known about it.

“The younger sibling of Jonathan Riddle Jr. Riddle’s last rat.”

The blood disappeared from the young man’s face again after hearing his explication. It was apparent when seeing him bowing his head and avoiding Winston’s eyes.

…He knows.

Leon did not hide his satisfied smile.

“I have as many things to say with Riddle as I do with Jimmy. I wanted to ask her why she roamed my land like a rat.”

At that moment, his chest went up and down even more.

Seeing that he twisted his body tied to the chair, revealing his discomfort even more, Leon twisted a corner of his mouth. He also knew that the woman was here on a mission.

Although he thought it was an insult to send a kid, it was a favor. They sent the entire filing cabinet filled with valuable information from the top leaders without locking it with a key. Did Jimmy Blanchard Jr. want to quit leading the rebels…?

Like Jonathan Riddle Jr, he may have wanted to become a country farmer and betray all his parents’ expectations.

“If you pass me Riddle, I will save your life. You know that lying doesn’t work.”

“That… never…”

“The deal is broken.”

With a loud bang, the chair Leon was sitting on fell backwards. The moment he got up from his seat, Fred flinched.

Leon put the nipper roughly on the table and took off his officer jacket.

As Campbell stood up, he took the jacket and hung it on the wall before undoing his cuffs and rolled up his sleeves. There was no way that a young man who had been watching from the side was unaware of what Winston would be doing when he tortures.

The man who foresaw his fate shook his head and cried out.

“Pl, please—”

“Now then, I’ll do the training that your commander-in-chief didn’t do.”

When he picked up the nipper that had been thrown on the table, the young man curled in his hand and hid his fingernails.

“Training to become numb to pain. When the day comes when you will be pierced by dozens of bullets, you will thank me.”

“Please…! I did nothing!”

He was still stubborn and uttered only words of no value.

“It is someone else who leaks the information…”

At that, he stopped talking for a moment and dropped his head as he shook his shoulder.

“Then, who did it? Ghosts in the annex?”

A short burst of laughter escaped Leon’s twisted lips.

“Remember the driver? I tied him to the chair you’re sitting in and pulled out his nails one by one.”

As he pictured what was about to happen to him, the spy trembled violently as if the blood had all completely drained away. Leon wrinkled his eyes as the young man began to look like he was about to vomit.

“Uhhup—Heuk, hu-huuk…”

“You remember, right? That day, you vomited in that corner. The maid had a hard time cleaning it up. I warn you, don’t vomit this time. I don’t want her to clean up your filth until the last day.”

Winston spoke as he tapped the nipper in one hand and turned around the corner of the table to approach him. With each slow step he took, Fred writhed and twisted in his chair.

Useless.

“UWAACK!”

With just one step, the man began to scream. He would probably blow Riddle’s position before the nipper blade took his first nail.

“No! I didn’t do it! I didn’t do it…!”

“Hold him.”

Finally, As soon as the soldiers standing behind grabbed the back of his hand and pressed it, the young man finally opened his mouth.

“Sally…! Sally Bristol!”

The moment the name that should not have come out, came out with a scream, the hand that was knocking on the nipper suddenly stopped.

“…What?”

From that day on, Leon Winston became a pathetic bastard in heat for a maid… no, a spy.
Chapter 31 .
When Sally returned to the annex with a cart full of clean laundry, the sky was tinged with sunset. The reason why it looked particularly bloody today may be because another ‘guest’ came to the torture chamber.

“Phew…”

Even so, it was the last day, and the maids in the laundry didn’t let her go.

They started chatting with each other, saying goodbye, and towards the end, they tried to investigate the rumors about Winston. She was exhausted from playing the innocent and pitiful maid who had been played by a nobleman for an hour.

Sally pushed the cart up the ramp at the entrance to the annex, figuring out what to do.

She would just organize the laundry and go downstairs. All she had to do was figure out who the ’guest’ was and tell Jimmy directly. Then, she would have to call Fred and give him a warning secretly as well.

After dinner, she went up to the maid’s room, checked her belongings one last time, and went to sleep.

Then, she would get up tomorrow morning before sunrise and go through the back door of the mansion. She decided to get a wagon to deliver milk to the mansion and ride it out to Halewood. Taking the tram to Winsford, she would catch the train.

She had planned to stop by Sally Bristol’s hometown for a day or so without going home right away.

‘Can I think of it as a short vacation?’

It was probably a rural village with fewer sights than here, but at least it would be easier to breathe than here.

‘…Then, I will finally be able to see Jimmy in two or three days.’

She could finally abandon the name she was reluctant with, Sally Bristol. Forever.

“Oh!”

Suddenly, the cart swung forward.

As she fell, someone jumped out from behind the cart and propped his arm in front of Sally. In an instant, her waist was caught, and she was trapped in the man’s arms. Without even looking up, she could tell who the owner of this pungent cigar scent was.

“Captain, please stop.”

The more she struggled, the tighter he hugged Sally’s waist tightly.

She thought he was going to let her go easily somehow. She bent her right leg behind and was about to kick his left shin when Winston let her go.

“Wherever you got your training, you’re fighting really well.”

She glanced at him with a smirk and reached for her cart. However, her hand couldn’t reach the cart. It was because Winston grabbed Sally’s hand, pretending to be her lover, and gave a chin gesture to the soldiers standing behind the cart.

“Let me go.”

Sally twisted her hand as the soldiers dragged the cart. Instead, Winston forced her fingers apart, interlocked them with his, and smirked.

“We kissed each other, but the hands are not okay?”

Sally paused when Winston recalled the moment she was trying to erase from her mind.

“…I have a lot of work to do.”

“Don’t mind it. You have somewhere to go with me.”

She questioned as she was dragged into the annex.

“Where? It’s probably not the Captain’s bed, is it?”

Hearing her question, Winston rolled his eyes down to her before snorting, “My bed is not good enough for you.”

She was truly offended by his blatant demeanor.

When he stopped, Winston tenderly corrected his sly smirk and gazed down at Sally.

“I’m going to the office. I prepared a farewell gift for Miss Sally Bristol, who has done hard work on her duties.”

‘…What kind of trick is this again?’

It had been a long tradition for the Winston family to give a small farewell gift to a departing employee. However, it was also a tradition not to give gifts to employees who had created a scandal and had been fired.

‘So, is Winston providing it himself? Could it be that this person really likes me? No way… Who would be so rude to a woman he likes?’

Sally’s head was clamorous as she climbed the stairs led by him.

‘I hope it was money. It will be used for military funds.’

However, when she thought of said person’s eccentricity, Sally also thought that there would be no such thing as a normal object.

When she went to the office, soldiers were standing in front of the door.

Even though it happened all the time, it was uncomfortable today. It seemed like everyone was staring at her intently. Sally thought they were having a strange imagination again because of what happened in the study, so she cast a pointed gaze.

“Go in.”

One of the soldiers immediately opened the door to the office, and Winston stepped aside like a gentleman and beckoned in. Sally stood on the spot. If she went like this, she would be left alone with Winston.

“The gift, I’ll pick it up in the hallway.”

She stood with her hands clasped and looked up at Winston. He scoffed when she asked if they were going to bed, and then he stared briefly at soldiers in the hallway.

“You’re difficult because you are a precious person.”

Winston let out a light laugh, and the soldiers raised and lowered the corners of their mouths erratically. He placed his hand on Sally’s shoulder, who puffed up her cheeks sullenly and stared at him.

“I will leave the door open. Is that okay?”

After the stinging words, he went inside alone. It wasn’t until Winston stood by the desk far away from the door that Sally lifted her foot from the hallway.

She went inside and was astonished.

‘…What party has he been having since broad daylight?’

The inside was a mess. A bottle of whiskey and several crystal glasses were scattered on the coffee table. The ashtray that was emptied in the morning was already full of ashes.

Hopefully, this mess wasn’t the gift.

“Where is the gift?”

She was just going to accept it, say thank you, and leave.

Standing in the middle of the office, Winston glanced at the wide, flat box on the desk. The box was tied with a black ribbon.

“I don’t need any more stockings.”

“What do you mean, stockings?”

Winston snorted, leaning against the fireplace with his arms crossed.

“It will be an incomparable, unforgettable gift for the rest of your life.”

Sally frowned as she approached and picked up the box. What bad taste…? What she thought was a black ribbon was actually a very thin black rope. It seemed that he tied the farewell gift with a rope from the torture chamber cabinet.

Displeased, Sally picked up the box and turned right away.

“Thank you for the meaningful gift.”

Winston’s arm stopped in front of her as she was about to bow with a slight bend on her knees like a lady to the maniac in a gentleman’s mask.

“Not like that.”

Sally gazed up at him and stopped her steps just before his arms touched her chest. Meanwhile, Winston was smiling broadly that it made her wonder what made him so happy.

“Shouldn’t you be thinking about the joy of the gift giver? I can’t wait to see your expression, who finally figured out what the gift I prepared for you is.”

The smile looked insidious.

Was there a day when he didn’t smile like this these days? It looked like he had something pretty naughty in the box.

‘I’ll let him one last time, okay.’

In the end, Sally sighed and untied the black rope on the spot.

He said he wanted to see her expression, so she stayed facing Winston. Her hand, as she opened the box, stopped. What was inside was something she could never have imagined.

…A yellow file folder.

There was no name written on the outside, so she couldn’t tell what was in it.

Sally looked up at Winston with puzzled eyes.

“Come on, open it.”

He gently wrinkled the corners of his eyebrows and urged her. Somehow, her stomach churned.

“Is this a letter of recommendation…?”

It suddenly dawned on her that he had promised a letter of recommendation that would give her a job anywhere.

“Well, that’s not wrong.”

The corners of Winston’s lips twisted for an instant.

“Because I wrote it by hand to send you to a place that suits you.”

‘I don’t need a new job.’

Sally placed the lid of the box underneath it and lifted the edge of the file with her fingernails. Three short words caught her gaze the moment she pulled back the thick paper.

 

[ Alias: Little Riddle ]
 
She stopped breathing.

‘Why is he doing this to me?’

The reason and intuition in Sally’s head immediately sounded a red alarm and shouted.

‘Dangerous… Run away—No, it’s already too late.’

The moment she took her feet off here, it would be over. Running away would be admitting it.

‘Maybe, there is still room to get out. It must be Winston’s own guided scenarios.’

Perhaps, he was passing it on without certainty yet… To survive here, she had to find a gap in information and fill that loophole.

“What is this?”

She pretended not to know anything. She pretended to be offended because he gave her something weird as a gift. Although she asked sharply, the man facing him was surrounded by black, like an abyss from his neck to his toes, exuding only an insidious atmosphere.

She barely lifted her gaze and couldn’t make eye contact with him. Sally calmly read the papers.

 

[ Note: The last rebel of the Riddle family ]

[ Crime: Infiltrating major military facilities, leaking secret military information, leading a surprise attack on Govurn… ]

 

‘Govurn. Please…’

 

[ Skin color: Unknown Bright ]

[ Hair Color: Unknown Dark brown ]

[ Eye color: Unknown Turquoise ]

[ Age: Unknown 26 ]

[ Last name: Riddle ]

 

The color of the fingertips holding the paper faded as she went back to the white paper on which the black letters were sparsely written.

‘No…’

All information listed as unknown has been corrected.

…Besides, everything was correct.

 

[ Known pseudonym: Sally Bristol ]

[ Name: Unknown Grace ]

 

She checked the last information that was written down with anger about Sally—No, Grace’s heart sank.

‘Why is my name…’

There was no gap. There were no loopholes to get out of.

…This person knew everything.

How. Where. Who the hell…!

The moment Grace’s thought stopped, Winston’s body moved swiftly. She tried to move her body back. Her heart pounded so hard that it seemed to crush her body. The moment the large hand reached in front of her and gripped her neck, Grace closed her eyes tightly.

With the sound of the holster being released, a hard muzzle pressed against her back. His lips, dry with anger, licked Grace’s ears.

“Goodbye, Sally Bristol.”

A cold kiss fell down, and a sweet whisper pierced her ear.

“…Nice to meet you, Grace Riddle.”
Chapter 32.
“Let’s greet each other formally. I’m Leon Winston. The Captain of the Domestic Intelligence Division of the Western Command, and the son of a man who was brutally tortured and killed by the devil called your mother.”



“Oh, do you already know this story?”

Leon gazed down at the woman’s shaking chest and shed a sneer.

“Miss Riddle, I’ve always wanted to meet you.”

The gentle voice that seemed to be talking with a benefactor, yet the gaze staring at the enemy seemed eerily different. Her breath tightened even more as his anger-soaked breath warmed her ears.

“But, like this…”

Winston came close with his lower body. At the same time, something thicker than a muzzle pressed against Grace’s back.

“I didn’t expect to be somewhere within easy reach.”

Uttering so, he swept the buttocks of the trusted maid, or a cunning spy with his gun.

“…You know that? When I saw you, I always wanted to shove my pistol into your cramped area and stir it up.”

The woman trembled as the gun stroked her skin as if to caress her skirt.

“Still, I couldn’t bully a good child, so I endured it. I no longer have to put up with it… Thank you, Sally.”

What he thought was a cute fox was actually…

“No, Grace.”

…It was a cunning rat.

Leon gripped the woman’s neck tighter as she began to twist her body and clenched her teeth.

“Don’t even think about saying no.”

“Huht…”

“Fred Smith. No, Fred Wilkins.”

As the prediction came true, Grace closed her eyes tightly.

“That bastard called out your name before I even touched him.”

…Just one day.

Just one more day, and it would have been over.

A cold laugh poured into Grace’s ears as she sighed.

“I feel sorry for Miss Riddle, who has a coward who has neither loyalty nor guts as a comrade.”

“Ugh…”

Winston suddenly turned Grace’s chin. In her vision, shaken by the twisting impact of her neck, she saw the coldest flame blazing.

“He said Miss Riddle was working to get Blanchard’s rats away from me. Am I right?”

Leon smiled coldly as he stared down at her turquoise eyes wet with tears and fear.

“I will give you a chance to complete your last mission.”

 


 
As soon as the creak of the heavy iron gate stopped, a faint sobbing was heard. When the lights came on, the sobbing person was clearly visible.

“Hello, Fred.”

Winston shoved Grace roughly inside after giving him a light greeting, with his limbs tied to one of the walls. Fred was just tied up though he was fine. It was true what Winston said that he had blown up her identity without even touching him.

Along with relief, anger swelled.

“Sniff… Please, help, help me…”

As soon as the lights came on, Fred raised his head in a gasp and began to beg Winston in fear. Then, the moment he looked at Grace, he burst into tears.

“Huuh… Grace…”

“Don’t call my name.”

Malice leaked out from Grace’s gnashed teeth.

“You don’t deserve it.”

“I’m, I’m sorry. Huhuu…”

“Grace.”

Winston, who watched the two happily, copied Fred and called her. His taunts were overflowing in it as his wide arms were tangled around Grace’s waist as she faced Fred. He then asked affectionately as he hugged her forcibly from behind.

“Do I deserve it?”

The pounding on her back was violent. Contrary to the outside, his inside was completely not serene at all.

“No, I don’t think so.”

Goosebumps rose as their bodies became closer together. However, Grace couldn’t resist, chained to Winston’s wall-like body, like Fred’s limbs tied to the wall.

“I used to think that when I saw the maid named Sally Bristol… Why is it that every time I define her one by one, I feel like I’m forcing a puzzle that doesn’t fit?”

Grace’s heart sank when he said that he had already felt uncomfortable with her. His animalistic sense was already infamous. So, although Winston opposed the infiltration operation, he was only accused of being a coward.

“If it were normal, my intuition would have told me. This woman…”

“Huht…”

“Is a spy.”

Suddenly biting her earlobe, Grace was startled.

“Though why was my intuition clouded in front of Miss Riddle?”

It was because he was blinded by lust. Even now, enraged by the spy, his body was still raging in a different way.

“…Am I a fool, or are you a genius?”

Kiik.

The laugh was followed by the sound of sharp metal rubbing against the soft leather. Soon, before her eyes, Winston’s military dagger flashed.

“Thanks to you, I’m a laughing stock in the whole kingdom. My job was to catch and interrogate the spy, but there was a spy down there… Truly an idiot.”

The sharpened tip of the dagger pointed to Fred, who was trembling, tied to the wall…

“A woman.”

He stabbed Grace in the neck. A stinging pain engulfed her as the pointed tip dug shallowly into her tender flesh.

“Uht, stop…”

Trying to escape, she twisted her body in Winston’s arms.

As Grace’s buttocks unknowingly rubbed his bulging lower body, Winston pulled out the dagger and let out a languid sigh.

“Miss Riddle, isn’t this an insult to you, too, not just me?”

Grace neither affirmed nor denied as she watched with trembling eyes as the dagger cut through the air like a bomb that didn’t know where to fall between Fred or her.

“You’re the last heir to a famous rebel family even within the group… It is a great insult to put such a rookie for you.”

“I’m, I’m sorry…”

Fred, who had sobbed vaguely the entire time Winston threatened her, again apologized for no reason.

Seeing that, Grace did all she could to resist the urge to slap him in the face right away.

‘I was against it from the beginning.’

Fred lowered his head helplessly, noticing what her eyes were saying. He was not fit for a job as a spy. Jimmy knew that, too. However, the pressure of Fred’s father, who wanted his only son to make a big contribution, whether weak or not, was formidable.

Shortly after taking over the post of commander-in-chief in place of his deceased father, Jimmy had no choice but to keep an eye on the elders.

“Don’t worry, he will fall.”

Jimmy, ironically, hoped that the enemy army would overcome this difficult situation instead. In other words, he expected Fred not to pass boot camp.

…But, how flustered he was when Fred passed the boot camp.

In addition, how absurd he was when Fred was assigned to the torture chamber because of Fred’s father’s scheme, who wrote ‘Fred Smith’s’ father’s job as a butcher on his enlistment application.

Of course, he didn’t fit. They told him to quit even now, but Fred was as tough as his father in this matter. He insisted that he could do it while vomiting. Still, Fred seemed to be adapting slowly, so she believed…

Leon glanced down at her small, trembling fist and whispered cruel words in Grace’s ear.

“Miss Riddle, don’t tell me you forget your duty and left your comrade in the mansion in the torture chamber? I said many times. I do my job, you do yours.”

Winston’s job was to torture the spy, and Grace’s job was to interrupt him.

“…Do you want me to do my job here now?”

When she asked in a trembling voice, Winston nodded her head from behind.

“That’s right, Miss Riddle. Your final task is to get Fred away from me.”

As Leon uttered an absurd word, hope flashed in Fred’s eyes, and doubt flashed in Grace’s eyes.

“Why? Do you want to kill that child?”

Well, I think… He murmured and laughed.

“If I want to kill him, you would reject your mission. Oh, of course, I don’t know what kind of punishment your commander-in-chief will give you for disobeying your orders, but I don’t know. For now, I’m going to make a very clear engraving on Fred’s body to make it easy to verify the facts.”

In front of Fred, who was getting pale blue again, Winston wrote with the tip of his sword.

“Die at the behest of Miss Grace Riddle.”

In other words, they threatened to turn Grace into a murderer if she refused this ‘last mission’ that Winston imposed.

‘…As expected, this is the intention.’

It was obvious why he had forced Fred to live by making low-key threats. Grace didn’t want to let Fred live, but as a condition of keeping him alive, she wanted to ask for what he wanted.

“So, where should I send his corpse and condolence money?”

It meant to blow the location of the base. From rage to rut—although he was in a very private and emotional state, he did not forget his private and public affairs. This kind of enemy was more terrifying.

The location of the stronghold could never be disclosed. Knowing that she was playing according to his intentions, Grace couldn’t help but ask.

“In return, are you going to set me free?”

“You’re pretty smart. Though why are you asking for an answer you know? That is stupid.”

In the end, Grace’s only option was death or a disgusting deal.

Closing her eyes tightly, Leon read the meaning of her resignation and buried his lips in the pure white neck that had a stream of red blood flowing.
Chapter 33.
His nickname of Camden vampire was no exaggeration. Even though he wanted to cover his ears as the sound of him sucking blood continued in bare, Fred, with his limbs tied, couldn’t. At the same time, Grace’s eyelids, which were tightly closed in pain, trembled.

Fred trembled at the scene that reminded him of a vampire movie he had seen once.

“Ah!”

“Haa…”

The moment her tightly pressed lips parted with a loud burst, painful moans and exhaled breath intersect.

“Uhmm…”

From between his lips, wet with blood and saliva, a moan filled with lust flowed vociferously to anyone who heard it.

Winston hugged Grace tightly as if she was his. His arms wrapped around her waist, bent and climbed up, crushing her plump breasts. Under the maid’s robe, he could clearly see the round flesh wrinkling mercilessly.

“Huht, don’t do this here…”

Camden’s vampire ignored Grace’s pleas and buried his head in the nape of her neck again, raising his eyes and glaring at Fred. As his eyes that lit with wrath were no longer there, a vulgar rapture flashed in the unfocused eyes.

It was only then that Fred realized belatedly what Winston asked of Grace in return.

“Do, don’t.”

…The devil wanted to defile his saint.

Fred, who struggled with courage, poured out pleading with his clenched teeth. However, when Winston never stopped harassing Grace, the begging soon became a threat.

“I, I told you to stop!”

Feeling guilty now? Bluffing in front of the woman…?

For some reason, the coward began to belatedly show courage because of the shameless bastard who held this woman in his hands. Leon pushed his tongue out and licked up the blood stains from her thin neck.

The man huffed even more.

“Don’t touch Grace!”

“You act like that, so you must be this woman’s fiancée.”

The woman who had accepted him until now shook her head for the first time. Leon raised an eyebrow after she indicated that he wasn’t her fiancée.

“You’ve deceived me pretty well so far. I frankly appreciated that ability, so I would have been disappointed if you had been promised to marry that idiot, Miss Riddle.”

As he pressed his lips against her neck again, Fred spat another pitiful threat.

“Commander, Commander-in-Chief won’t let you go…”

“Stop it, Fred.”

“He doesn’t know that we’re even dating, doesn’t he?”

He continued his sarcasm disguised as pride.

“A date with the last princess of the great Riddle family. I even got a deep kiss, so it’s an honor that will remain in the family.”

Fred’s eyes fluttered, and the woman shook her head again. This time, it was a gesture directed at that lowly child, not Leon.

Leon laughed when he read that it wasn’t what he thought it was.

“Ugh…”

He quickly turned Grace around and grabbed her by the neck, “For the sake of the Duke, you were a whore who would kiss anyone.”

“No, no.”

“Be honest. Did you get orders to seduce me to get information?”

The woman shook her head, but, realizing that it was a lie, Leon tightened the grip even more.

“Gasp, my breath…”

“You said that on the pool table that day, too. Do you think I’m naive enough to be fooled twice?”

Her face turned bright red in an instant, and the woman raised her fingers and scratched the back of his hand.

However, the added anger caused Leon to feel no pain. The fact that she was constantly flirting in front of him, that she liked him, and that she was occupying his bathtub naked in the middle of the night were all just beautiful things in the world.

“How ridiculous you must have been seeing me as, huh? A stupid bastard who doesn’t even know it’s an enemy.”

It was humiliating to be deceived by the spy’s cunning tricks. In addition, everything he did to this woman made him feel even more miserable.

“But, did you try to run away without properly completing the mission to spread your legs? You pathetic spy.”

The moment his vision flickered and became dark, his hand that had gripped Grace’s neck suddenly fell. She staggered and slumped down. Gasping for her breath, she did not even have time to feel the pain of falling to the hard floor.

“Haa, haa…”

“Fortunately for you, I’m still just a stupid bastard who doesn’t even know it’s an enemy.”

Grace raised her head.

The black devil, with his back to the light, stood tall in front of her. Even in her suffocation and blurred vision, she could clearly see the horn-like center in him.

“Miss Grace Riddle, you must complete your mission.”

Seeing the creepy madness in his smile, Grace shuddered and squeezed her eyes shut. Amid the noise of rustling and undressing, Winston asked in a mocking voice.

“I heard that you teach girls to use worldly beauty?”

Don’t try to stir up reckless conspiracy. We’re not as ugly as you royal pigs.

Considering the lives of the two, it was impossible to say. Grace swallowed the words that welled up to the tip of her chin.

“So, when Blanchard’s girl is caught, everyone in the top drools. Besides, you are the daughter of a whore who has possessed many military officers with your lower mouth, so there will be more than ten salivating people here in the West alone waiting for you to be caught.”

How dare you call my mother a whore.

Grace opened her eyes and glared at Winston.

That sex maniac just smiled brightly. He folded the officer’s uniform jacket flat and hung it on the table, then neatly folded the sleeves without the cuffs before raising it over his elbow.

It was his act before torture.

“The last whore of the venerable prostitute family fell into my hands. I have high expectations.”

Winston leaned over and held out a hand to her. That gentleman-like hand would soon mock her body like a gangster.

Grace glanced at his disgusting hand and glanced at the wall.

“Send him somewhere else.”

At her words, he glanced at Fred, who muttered incomprehensible words like a maniac, then shook his head.

“You know that? In the old days, there was a witness in the newlyweds’ room on the first night.”

She shouldn’t expect common sense from people who don’t have common sense. Grace leaned over to the dagger in his other hand.

“You should rather kill me.”

Winston chuckled as if Grace had been a cute lamb and stood up.

“I’ll cover his eyes.”

Fred whispered as he went to the closet opposite him to get the eye covering.

“Please…. Grace, don’t do that.”

Grace clenched her teeth.

It’s all because of you… It’s something I have to do because of you. Don’t act as if I’m voluntarily selling my body.

“If I don’t do it, will you do it?”

There was a sense of betrayal that could not be filtered out in her voice.

“Huh… I’m really, really sorry.”

“If you’re sorry for me, don’t tell anyone about this.”

Please, Fred, shut up… so no one would know of this shameful thing.

At least, she didn’t want Jimmy to know. He would blame himself for putting her in the lion’s den. On the other hand, she was also afraid. If Jimmy thought she was dirty because of another man, even for sleeping with the enemy… If he left her…

‘No, he is not that person. He loves me. Jimmy loves me. I love him though now with this dirty sex maniac…’

With a sad heart, Grace repeated the same words like a spell as Winston, who had covered Fred’s eyes with an eye covering, approached. As he leaned over, she bit her teeth.

“Darling, why are you shaking like this?”

She trembled even more at the friendly hug.

“Are you cold? I didn’t even take off your clothes… not yet.”

There was a sly laugh at the end of the worried remarks.

As he lifted Grace up, Winston sat her down on an iron chair for the newspaper. The inside of her shoes, sitting on the edge of the chair, was touching him due to her crooked posture, and his head tilted obliquely.

Winston gazed at Grace with the tip of his index finger on his temple, and there was no request or order.

“Please… Sniff, don’t…”

An uncomfortable silence continued, with only Fred’s sobs.

He scoured Grace’s body, silently and tenaciously, like a beast before it leaped to its prey.

The moment his gaze reached the ankle wrapped in cheap stockings, he moved. He crossed his long legs and lifted the shiny tips of his shoes. The wind lifted her skirt, but Grace did not avoid this outright harassment.

‘…It doesn’t mean anything anymore.’

The rigid shoe nose came in between the neatly gathered knees. He stopped tapping the inside of her knee only after Grace had spread her legs shoulder-width apart.
Chapter 34.
“It would be nice if you had opened up like this earlier.”

At that, the look of tension grew from the sound of Grace’s breathing. Fred grunted loudly whenever he heard something soft rubbing and whenever Winston made a significant noise.

“Skirt, roll it up.”

Leon urged her by slowly scanning the inside of her thigh with the tip of his shoe. The feeling on the hard end was soft.

“Huht…”

Grace grimaced as he plucked the laces on the garter that secured the stockings.

“Body search for illegal possession of weapons.”

He chuckled and added, “…Ah, I don’t need any more excuses now.”

“Ahh!”

When he suddenly kicked his leg up, the pointy nose of his shoe hit the middle of the bloomer and pressed the tender flesh inside.

Even though it couldn’t be called pain, an unbearably painful feeling rose to the tip of her head and subsided over and over again. Winston looked at Grace with a calm expression that didn’t look like a vulgar person at all.

“Heuk…”

Biting her lips, she did all she could to hold back her promiscuous moans and her mind abruptly went blank.

“Ah…”

As the strength of her legs loosened and she staggered, Grace reflexively stretched out her hand and closed her eyes tightly. However, the place where she fell was not on the cold floor though a hot body instead.

“Did you cum?”

“N, no.”

“My darling, you’re easy.”

Grace, who forgot the situation for a moment due to the heat that clouded her reason, pushed against his chest. Nonetheless, to Leon, it was just a cute whining.

“Ah, uht—It hurts.”

He hugged the woman who had slumped on his lap with her legs wide apart. When he felt the soft touch of her body vividly even with several layers of fabric in between, he shuddered in uncontrollable ecstasy.

‘…What the hell is she?’

It was still a mystery.

A cunning spy who deceived him, and the daughter of the enemy who killed his father… that couldn’t explain why he was only affected by this woman.

Leon grabbed the woman’s buttocks over her clothes. The tight-knit, thin bloomer veiled secret place rubbed against his center.

A rough friction began as his hands rubbed her hips promiscuously.

“Huht…”

There was no direct contact between their genitals. However, every time his cock that had been trapped in his clothes rubbed against them, it felt like he was already being stripped naked. The clitoris shuddered from the aftermath of the climax.

Grace’s body trembled all over.

“Ha… I felt it well.”

Leon rubbed his body against her body and let out a hot breath.

Every time a force was applied below, the woman could not withstand the stimulation and twisted her body. He couldn’t believe she was rubbing herself against a man’s body. It seemed that she was nothing more than a bitch who couldn’t control her heat.

“You were properly trained.”

The woman’s eyes turned rebellious. Although she wanted to refute that she wasn’t, she looked resentful.

“Please, ahh… just do it.”

The woman begged in his ear. Leon shook his head and raised his back hard.

“That’s up to me.”

“Heup…”

Her waist was bent back greatly.

When she couldn’t cover her mouth, Grace bit her lip and began to hold back her moans. It looked like it was going to tear. Leon let out a painful moan as he gazed at the soft flesh that was crushed by her hard teeth, possessed.

‘Bleed, hurry.’

At the end of the moment when drops of crimson blood began to form on the tip of the white teeth, he couldn’t stand it. Grabbing the back of her head, he touched her lips. The blood, which contained the woman’s body temperature, splattered between the skin that touched each other.

He stole her lips once and licked her lips.

Leon licked the tip of his tongue thoroughly for the blood that had formed between the folds of her lips.

This exhilarating taste. This delicious smell… From the bottom of his heart, this feeling was as if it was about to burst. The next moment, he bit the woman’s lips again, drunk with a strong sense of paralysis.

“Uht, no…”

“Ha… I said that was up to me.”

“…Stop, huh—”

The chair began to creak loudly as he struggled with the woman who was trying to avoid him. Soon after, the muffled noise of wet flesh rubbing against the walls of the torture chamber echoed. Fred’s feeble sobbing was completely forgotten.

The kiss was violent.

As he licked the wound with his tongue and sucked her blood, Grace groaned in excruciating pain.

‘…It wasn’t like this back then.’

That kiss when they were young was not painful. It was only thrilling.

Grace, who was in a similar but completely different situation, despaired. Did she meet a monster as a child, or did she create a monster…?

“Uhp…”

If blood doesn’t come out of this, he might try to rip her lips even more. Just as Winston was about to lick her swollen lower lip once and then bite back, Grace daringly shoved her tongue between his gaping lips.

Soon, the kissing became quite normal—holding each other’s backs and cheeks, and acting as if they were going to eat the other’s tongues, was no different from any other lover’s lustful kiss—had it not been for the dagger in the man’s right hand.

Grace slowly sucked out Winston’s long tongue. The tongue finally came off from the tip of the shrunken lips, and a long thread of saliva hung between the two of them.

“Haa, first…”

Winston pointed to her chest with pretty thirsty eyes.

“I’ll have to check if it’s right.”

He wanted to make sure to see if her nipples were pink. Still, he didn’t touch her clothes. He just gestured his chin at an angle and waited.

It meant for her to take it off herself.

Grace looked at him before lowering the shoulder straps of her apron. Though she tried to pretend to be brave, her hand trembled as she unbuttoned her black maid’s robe from the neck down to the waist.

Each time an arm came out from the shirt, the man’s eyes staring at her became perilous. Looking at the corners of his lips that became more and more slanted, this man seemed happy that she was a spy.

“Ack, don’t!”

It was when she was about to unbutton the first button on her blouse that Winston grabbed the collar of her blouse with both hands and spread it apart. The fabric ripped with a rumble, and white buttons popped out in all directions.

Leon snorted, putting her blouse and the maid’s robe down her shoulders at the same time.

A white bra that doesn’t have any color. Come to think of it, the bra that was removed from the pool table was also white.

“Even your underwear is plain. I wish there were a little more blood behind this one.”

Then, he grabbed the middle of the bra with both hands. The moment the tendon swelled on the back of his dry hand, the tough fabric tore like a piece of paper.

“I was right.”

The apex in the middle of the fluttering milky flesh was pink.

As soon as he let go of her torn bra, Grace tried to cover herself. Leon removed her hands, covering her chest one by one.

“Sorry. I can’t afford to take care of your hands because I’m going to be busy from now on.”

The action of tying the woman’s hands one by one with the handcuffs on the armrests of the chair was elegant. He was even sweet, as if he were tying an expensive bracelet to his lover’s wrist.

Her pale hand trembled even more than before.

In fact, the woman’s body was trembling. It was nice to see the breasts swaying altogether, and the tips of her breasts twitching, resembling peach buds. It was different from the chunks of meat that the dancers vulgarly shook at the cabaret.

Contrary to the things that didn’t impress him, the mere sight of this woman’s body made his mouth water. Leon raised his gaze slowly from her lustrous flesh, with a face stained with shame, and asked politely.

“Can I suck it, Miss Riddle?”

He even asked for her permission by using honorifics. It was a cruel act, knowing that it was only him who made the decisions about this woman’s body. Besides, he knew that the woman, with only her blood-stained lips tingling, could not resist.



He really liked the eyes of the woman who was staring at him as if to kill him. There was a deep sense of fear and contempt in her turquoise eyes, which had always shone with contempt. The urge struck him to want to see it one day turn bloody.

“I think my request was unclear.”

He did not stop being cruel.

“To dare with my tongue, suck Miss Riddle’s…”

“Do it… Do whatever you feel like. Please, don’t ask.”

As she hastened her answer with more shameful words, the woman bit her teeth as she whispered unneeded permission with her trembling teeth.

“Do whatever I want? That’s a very dangerous thing to say.”

Do you know what I will do? He added so, and wet his twisted lips with the tip of his tongue. Grace caught her breath and turned her head to the side.

“Look carefully.”

Saying so, Leon grabbed the woman’s chin and turned it in front. Slowly lowering his head as he met her eyes, which were growing in contempt and shame, he opened his lips just before they touched her bulging nipples.

The corners of her eyes were dyed a pretty pink.

…It was the same color as her nipples.
Chapter 35.

“Huht…”

The moment the woman closed her eyes tightly, Leon grabbed the pale pink flesh that shivered.

The soft texture was similar to her lips… If he had to compare which one he liked more, he would choose the flesh that he was now taunting with the tip of his tongue. It was satisfying to see her respond honestly to the lewd tongue teases.

Her nipples did not lie, unlike its master. The flesh, which had only been soft, rose up in an instant, and then it came together hard.

It looked good to devour.

When Leon took a deep breath and swallowed even the reddish areola, the woman struggled and moaned.

“Ahh…”

As he licked up the round bumps with his wet tongue, it felt like rolling a plump, ripe raspberry in his mouth.

…If he bit it, would juice come out?

“Ah!”

Rattle.

The moment the soft flesh was pressed against his teeth, the handcuffs slammed against the armrests. The woman’s limbs trembled. One of her breasts, which he had not yet touched, swayed wildly up and down.

“It hurts. Don’t bite.”

The moment the woman whispered in his ear, Leon couldn’t hold back his moan. The pleas from Blanchard’s rats were always sweet. But, one of the most difficult rats to catch—Little Riddle—naked and tied up, making a strange plea to him, it was insanely sweet.

“Ahhkk!”

It was a mistake to expect the devil to do a favor.

Winston rushed in even more excitedly. He grabbed her breast with his large hand. It wasn’t enough, so he slapped it harshly and squeezed it hard to crush it.

The reddish flesh swelled and protruded from between his long fingers.

His tongue was also teasing violently, and he raised his eyes. The devil’s mouth, observing Grace’s reaction, rose at an angle.

“Huht… please!”

Even though she didn’t want to show any reaction, she failed miserably.

Each time the hot hand gripped the sensitive flesh or the cold blade touched her bare back, Grace trembled. When his tongue brushed her nipples, an indescribable strange feeling surged sharply, and she unknowingly let out a strange sound.

At the same time, it was also a job to hold back her tears because of the humiliation that came upon her.

Her torn lips hurt, and she couldn’t even bite her teeth.

“You filthy pig! What are you doing to Grace! Stop it now…!”

Fred’s scream echoed through the torture chamber amidst the frenzy. After the sound of undressing, the sound of promiscuous sucking and moaning followed, and he was infuriated.

“AAHH!”

He couldn’t stand the reality that the woman, who had always been pure to him, was making lewd sounds, so he tried to cover it up with screams. Winston clicked his tongue, letting go of the nipple he was biting abruptly.

Fred screamed, unaware that Winston’s bloody gaze was directed at him.

“Is that the command he received? Annoying me whenever I have fun with my comrades?”

“How could you do such a dirty thing—huuhh… I will kill you!”

Leon snorted at the threat that was neither scary nor cute.

“I do this with the permission of the body’s owner, but does the fiancé have the right to argue with someone who is nothing? What do you think, darling?”

As he asked that, his hand gripped her chest and ran up her collarbone before up to the nape of her neck before stroking her face in a creepy, tender way. Grace shuddered at the way he spoke and acted as if he was treating a lover.

“Hm? Miss Riddle, do you think you deserve to blame me rather than the traitor who willingly sold you to me?”

Grace shook her head briefly as Winston rushed for an answer by stroking her earlobe.

“Then, tell that guy clearly.”

Grace closed her eyes once tightly and uttered to Fred.

“Fred, please shut up.”

However, Fred, whose reason was already paralyzed, did not listen.

“Don’t do that. Please, let her go…”

He shook his head at Grace’s request. As she stared at Fred, who was constantly screaming, she thought he wanted to threaten him or gag his mouth though Winston wasn’t that commonsense person.

“Have you ever let him suck you?”

Grace gave a disgusted look and shook her head. At that, a crooked smile appeared on Winston’s face.

“Oh, dear… I’m doing pretty brutal things right now.”

The next moment, he grabbed the heavy chunk of flesh one by one and licked her chest bone. Soon, the flesh began to rub against each other and make a sticky, strange sound.

“What, what are you doing now?”

“Torture.”

It was to make a louder stranger noise so Fred could hear it. Grace shuddered in contempt, trying to get out of her grasp.

“Huhk… Please, stop.”

Nonetheless, with her hands tied, it was impossible. She had to endure Winston’s vulgarity. His lips bit the tip of the trembling chest. The sensitive sensory points were quickly swept away, and they were constantly slapped with his soft flesh.

“Huht…”

Grace, finding an erogenous feeling she had never known before, made sparks run sharply through the secret place between her legs. Each time his relentless mouth mocked her, sparks flashed in front of her eyes and her breath snapped.

Slurp.

“Ahhk!”

He sucked on her nipples long as if for it to be heard, making the noise louder.

“Ah, aht—stop…”

This cruel man couldn’t listen to her plea.

“Keep your voice down, honey. There is someone else.”

“Huhp. Huhk, please… Ha-uhk…”

When she clenched her teeth in an attempt not to moan, Winston grabbed Grace’s cheek and forced her mouth to open. An unrefined, sultry sound was constantly flowing out of her mouth, matching his tongue.

The creaking and groaning of the iron chair was mixed with the woman’s voice and the squeaky friction.

Fred’s screams continued as if competing with the vulgar noise.

“AAHH! You dirty bastard!”

Fred, who had been swearing as if he was the one being assaulted, ended up saying something he shouldn’t have said.

“You dare to rape the commander-in-chief’s woman?”

At that moment, Winston’s eyes looking up at Grace, suddenly changed.

“The Commander-in-chief will tear you to shreds and kill you.”

“Please shut up, Fre—ugh!”

She couldn’t finish her cry. It was because the large hand grabbed her slender neck tightly. The tips of his thick thumb and forefinger dug under her chin and lifted her body. Grace struggled to get his hand off, but it was in vain. Only the rings of the handcuffs dig further into her wrists.

“Kugh…”

The eyes that gleamed with dazzling madness gradually faded.

“Was your fiancé that bastard?”

His hand on her neck trembled noticeably. Even the trembling of his voice, which he uttered with malicious words, made goosebumps rise all over her body.

“Ugh… Help…me.”

Grace felt her bones tingle, knowing that the anger he had shown thus far had been nothing compared to this.

“Send a woman he was about to marry… Did he underestimate me as a man who can’t even act as a man?”

Everyone knew that such a rumor was circulating about him, who had mysophobia because his relationship with women was poor. Winston himself, and also the head of the Revolutionary Army. It wasn’t entirely wrong to say that Jimmy had looked down on Winston and sent his fiancé away since he believed the rumors and had Grace infiltrate.

“Right, but it must have been a bit embarrassing for me to stand up and jump on it.”

It wasn’t wrong either.

“So, what did you do with that bastard?”

“Kugh…”

“I asked if you had sex with that bastard?!”

The ferocious cry echoed in the torture chamber. There was no trace of reason in his eyes that were cold to the bone.

“Ah, ah…”

No voice came out. Grace hurriedly shook her head with a red-hot face.

“What about me?”

Do whatever you want. Do whatever you feel like.

It really felt like she was going to die. Now, if only her life could be saved, spreading her legs would feel like nothing.

“Gasp—Haak…haa.”

As soon as she nodded, Winston loosened his grip.

Without the strength to control her body, Grace collapsed into the arms of the man who was trying to kill her and took a quick breath.

“Hey, Fred. Your noble Blanchard’s finest prostitute won’t let your commander-in-chief, but I can.”

Then, he took the key out of his pocket and unshackled her.

There were red marks on her wrists. Grace had to kneel between his legs without a chance to rub her sore wrist. The hand, holding the dagger that lit up blue, soon gently caressed her white lips. Grace didn’t know the meaning of that hand.

Please, don’t kill me.

He didn’t seem to listen to what she added with difficulty as she was holding her breath.

“Tell Little Jimmy wisely. His fiancé gladly agreed to Captain Winston.”

At those words, not only Fred but also Grace trembled in white. No. There was no way Fred would break his orders and do what that person said.

Fred, please don’t tell him.

“And, how gladly the Princess of the revolution sucked the dick of the monarchy pig.”


Chapter 36.

“…What?”

The sound of the chair being pushed back was followed by the sound of the belt buckle being loosened. As soon as she lifted her head hard at the unbelievably terrible sound, Grace’s face turned blue.

‘…Don’t. No.’

In front of her, Winston stood tall with eerie energy exuding from his body. Was it because she was confused? In the midst of the man’s body, a cock, raising its head fiercely and throbbing, looked like a copper-colored viper trying to bite her to death.

Her eyes flickered.

“Winston, please…”

“Open your mouth.”

“Ah!”

As he grabbed her hair, he shoved his penis into her open mouth, giving her no time to end this anguished sigh.

“Uugh!”

The cock was thrust down to the throat in an instant. The moment the blunt, heavy piece of flesh pricked the end of her airway, Grace gasped in vain.

“Uht…”

When her throat tightened, Winston let out a muffled moan as she grabbed his shaft. The flesh that had been blocking the way for her breath to pass and crushing her delicate skin eventually withdrew.

“Haa, uhp—”

However, Winston gave her no room for breathing. The cock wet with Grace’s saliva slid back into her throat.

Tears flowed down from her eyes.

“Uhuhp, uhp…”

It was disgusting.

It was suffocating, and it felt like she was going to vomit.

Winston gripped the back of her head viciously and moved his waist roughly. The squelching noise of the flesh rubbing against the wet tongue was unfathomable. Grace shuddered with contempt as she could clearly see the snake-like mass of flesh moving in and out of her mouth.

Even the waist that was attacking her was like a torture engine. When it came in, it scratched itself slowly from the root of her tongue to the end, and when it went out, it came in a snap. None of the movements were not painful.

There was no end to the length she felt by her mouth.

Winston was holding the roots in his hand, so he didn’t even get to the end. Even so, her eyes went dark at the thought that his object was threatening enough to get lodged in her stomach to the end.

“Huuhp…”

Grace resisted as much as she could and begged.

Winston’s legs, standing like columns, did not budge no matter how much she pushed and hit him. Even when she grabbed his belt and gazed up at him with begging eyes, he was only looking down with eyes still brimming with cold fury and hot lust.

“Uhp, huuhp—”

She tried to stop him from entering his mouth by holding the base of his flesh, which she never wanted to touch…

“Ha… Don’t be annoying.”

Winston took her hand away.

“Don’t use your teeth.”

Then, he grabbed her chin with one hand and pressed her cheek. Following the man’s grip, Grace’s mouth opened helplessly. His waist, which was going through a push and pull movement, changed. The cock pierced the inside of her wide mouth at random.

“Ah-huhp…. Huk, uhhp…”

Every time Leon pushed in, the woman’s cheeks bulged out.

It was more than he had ever imagined.

“Dear Miss Riddle, it’s truly dazzlingly beautiful to see a lady exposing her breasts and sucking the most savage parts of a man’s body.”

“Huht…”

“It suits you very well.”

The moment he stroked the cheeks that had changed to the shape of his flesh while pouring out ridicule, the exhilarating joy doubled. While the woman tried to push it down with her tongue, it didn’t help.

Leon shuddered at the pleasure that ran down his spine as her slender flesh wrapped around his tip.

“Ha… Now, you are paying for it.”

His eyes, enjoying the woman’s unintentional tongue tease, slowly softened.

Schloop.

The cock came out suddenly. The saliva that was pushed out along the elongated cock flowed down to the corners of Grace’s lips.

“Ha…”

Was he giving her time to catch her breath? Or is this disgusting thing finally over?

Winston pulled the chair back and sat down in front of Grace.

“Ha, uhp…

It was foolish to expect any mercy from this man. He again grabbed her back and buried her face in Winston’s groin.

“Now, you suck it.”

Winston forcefully angled the tip of his penis, dripping clear fluid into Grace’s mouth as if putting a pacifier on a baby.

As soon as the hot, soft flesh entered her mouth, shame and anger came again. Still, she could not overcome the weight of resignation and despair. Enveloping the hot flesh, she rolled her tongue as he did to her chest.

The bitter taste of heat spread over her tongue.

“A little deeper.”

When the big hand pressed the back of her head, half of the flesh popped inside. Grace squeezed her eyes shut and moved her tongue. The skin felt on her tongue was smooth and soft, but the inside was heavy and stiff as if made of iron. It was a feeling she never wanted to know.

Winston, who was clasping his chin and staring at her with bored eyes, let out a long sigh of displeasure.

“You’re not a kitten sipping milk from the plate. Did your fiancé teach you to suck this way? That bastard, what a teriible instructor.”

Winston pushed Grace’s forehead, and the cock of wet flesh bounced out of her mouth.

“Are you trained to suck his stuff like this? You must have tried sucking it.”

“Haa. I’ve never done anything like this. And, what training nonsense, hup—”

Leon, who had the information he wanted, did not need to listen to the woman any further. He put his penis back into the woman’s mouth.

“So, his bride wasn’t trained to be a prostitute. Disappointing. I have a lot to teach you.”

The next moment, he grabbed Grace’s hair, that was loose and flowing, with his meticulous hand.

“Miss Riddle, this is how you do it.”

Don’t use your teeth, wrap it around your lips and bite it down. Have you ever sucked on a stick of ice cream? Suck until your cheeks go thin. Also, put your hands together as well. It feels even better if you pull the foreskin with your lips or your hands.

Winston acted like an instructor teaching the new recruits how to shoot. He even shook Grace’s head and taught her his favorite rhythm. It was utterly disgusting.

“Ha. You’re doing pretty well now. You learn fast.”

She had never heard such a humiliating compliment in her life. It felt as though like tears were about to fall. If she could do it her way, she wanted to bite off this dirty thing and tear it apart. How long did she have to do this filthy thing?

Grace glanced up, but he wasn’t looking at her. Meanwhile, Fred was turning his head to the wall he was bound to.

Winston suddenly laughed.

“Does it look like Fred wants it, too?”

Grace followed Winston’s cold gaze and closed her eyes tightly in disillusionment.

“You see? That guy has an erection.”

“No, no! It’s not like that… Grace, this is really, huk…”

“It would be fun to have him rape you. After all, he was the one who called out your name as soon as he heard the nipper. In addition, hearing what you’re going through right now, he brazenly stood up? If he could do you, he would probably jump on you.”

As Winston smiled lowly, Grace didn’t say anything.

Now, she knew. It was no use begging this man if he made up his mind. She had already prepared herself for the worst. Would this man do enough to summon all the soldiers guarding the annex, not just Fred, to have them all do her?

When she didn’t respond, Winston asked, putting his fingers between her hair and caressing it.

“Hmm? Should I strip that guy and put him here?”

“As you like.”

The moment she let out her resignation, the playfulness disappeared from his pale blue eyes.

Swish.

Winston threw the dagger in his hand.

“UWAAK!”

Fred let out a sharp scream.

“Oh? I don’t think that guy could do it?”

Grace’s face turned pale blue as she turned her head. The dagger was lodged deep in the middle of Fred’s groin.

“What are you doing, you madman—Ah!”

Winston viciously gripped Grace, who uttered harsh words in shock. It wasn’t until she faced his eyes flashing with madness, as when Jimmy’s story had come out, that Grace realized…

…If she was to name that madness, would it be better to call it twisted possessiveness?

This man… He wasn’t harassing her simply because of humiliation and vengeance. He asked if she had ever done it with Jimmy. Why was his expression cold when he saw Fred reacting to her? Things were so confusing that she missed it.

…This man wanted to possess her.

“Why? Why don’t you pick up something that’s cut in half and stuff it in?”

“Oh, I don’t need it. I never wanted to be with him.”

“Then, what will you do?”

“I will do whatever you ask me to.”

As he said so, Winston’s expression softened slightly.

“Then, save him. He will die of bleeding.”

“The only man’s thing you have to take care of is mine.”

Then, he pushed the erect penis with his fingertips. He wanted her to suck it again.
Chapter 37.

“Please.”

“When you beg, make sure you know what you want me to do.”

“Please, let Fred go and continue what you were doing.”

“I’m not going to listen to everything.”

“…It’s my first time.”

“So, what should you say to me?”

Even though his words were muffled, his eyes made a different sound as he continued, “If you want to send that guy to the medic before he dies of excessive bleeding…”

Pulling his cock further down, Winston placed the tip on Grace’s lips before finishing his remark.

“You must finish your work quickly.”

Yes. It was no use begging.

In the end, it meant that she would be held responsible for Fred’s life until the end. Because of that, Grace opened her mouth reluctantly. The saliva had already dried up due to the heat, and the rough flesh came back into her mouth again.

“Haa… yes. Good job, Sally.”

He called Grace Sally and made a scornful remark.

“As expected, none of the guys under me can do what they’ve been asked to do to my liking as much as you.”

Still, he, on the one hand, didn’t like the fact that the reason this woman suddenly became so active was another man.

“Do you know what the definition of a whore is?”

Instead of answering, there was only the sound of passionately sucking on the cock.

“A woman who sells her body for a price. So you are a whore.”

“Hup…”

Faint sobs leaked out through the interlocking flesh. Leon sighed contentedly and gently stroked the woman’s hair.

“Keep your voice down, honey. There is someone else.”

Fred’s screams had long since ceased.

…Finish quickly. Please finish quickly. Finish it quickly for him and for me.

Putting shame aside for a moment, how many times did she move her head quickly, swirling her tongue and hands just as the devil had taught her? The already hard penis became even harder and started to twitch.

Grace didn’t know what that meant.

Winston, who didn’t say anything as she had been half-biting and sucking, suddenly pressed the back of her head hard. In the gap of carelessness, the flesh came in.

He pulled Grace’s hand away from the base and tried to push his cock all the way through. When her throat blocked him from entering, he got up from the chair and pressed the tip of his cock to the root of her tongue to make room for it.

Nausea occurred.

“Uhp, uhhppp!”

Eventually, her lips touched his lower stomach. As she swallowed up his ridiculous size to its roots, she was punching Winston’s thigh with her fists, feeling a sore throat and nausea. Then, thick liquid gushed out from the tip embedded in her throat.

It was his climax.

“</>Ughh…”

“Swallow. Swallow if you don’t want to choke to death.”

Every time the woman swallowed his semen, the flesh tightened on him. When the moist hole sucked his penis, which had become sensitive to the climax, his mind was confused.

“Heup…”

After a while, Leon released his strength from the hand holding the woman’s head. When the rod, which did not lose strength even after spitting itself, was pulled out of the hole, the cloudy liquid, mixed with saliva, stretched out.

Thinking that the thing hanging from the tip of his genitals was leading into the woman’s stomach, a shiver rose from the depths of his belly again.

When the woman, horrified at seeing the vulgarity, turned her head, the thick thread was cut off.

Leon glanced down at the woman with cold eyes, lifted the apron that wrapped around her thigh, and wiped his sticky body.

“Huk…”

While he was tidying up his clothes, the woman sat on the floor and groaned.

On his way to pick up the jacket, passing the woman, he put his hand on her trembling shoulder. When he lightly tapped her to praise her hard work, she let out a sob as she took a deep breath.

Leon, who repaid some of the disgraces he had suffered, had a fresh smile on his lips. It was the first time since the establishment of this torture chamber that he felt such intense ecstasy, even though he had never seen her blood properly yet.

As he approached with his jacket on his arm, the woman muttered as she wiped the corners of her mouth with her sleeve, her face covered in tears, saliva, and semen.

“Dirty pig…”

The man who violated Grace gazed down at her with an impeccable figure. There was no guilt in his eyes after he had trampled on the weak. It contains only interest and contempt. It was the attitude of the greedy royal nobles towards those who had nothing.

As expected, Winston paused for a moment, then mocked her.

“How does the semen of a dirty pig taste?”

“Huh…”

Her eyes went dark. It was because Winston covered Grace’s naked body with an officer’s jacket.

“Huuhk…”

After quite some time, the glossy shoe nose that made her sick to my stomach moved away. In the midst of unconsciousness, the sound of shackles being lifted was heard.

Soon, the heavy iron door opened with a creaking sound.

“Don’t kill him.”

Winston ordered someone outside to get Fred out. At that moment, Grace felt a twisted euphoria rather than a relief that the demon had kept his promise.

Don’t kill him.

‘Don’t kill him,’ that meant Fred would be tortured. Only a cry came out of her mouth, who had told him not to do that.

‘Right. I suffered because of you, so you must suffer too.’

She, too, had selfishness no different from Fred’s. Now, everything, including herself, was about to become disgusting.

Bang.

The door was eventually closed. Then, there was a click, which was the sound of the door locking. She hoped to be left alone, but such luck did not happen.

The sound of dull shoes drew closer.

“The deal is not over yet.”

Instead of answering, Grace gently closed her eyes. His hand slipped under her body as she was lying on the cold floor.

Winston sneered at her for turning her back on him.

“Pretending to faint like a mouse…”

She really wanted to faint like this. However, her consciousness did not let her go easily.

“A normal bed would be nice for the first time.”

Her body rose up in an instant.

Winston grabbed Grace and headed for the single bed in the corner, just as a groom would hold the bride over the threshold of the newlywed’s room on the first night. He laid the woman down on the white sheet and got on it.

Creak.

The bed creaked as if it was going to break.

It seemed that the bed wasn’t strong enough to support his weight. Meantime, she was still acting as if she had fainted. Each time she breathed in weeping breaths, her breasts, which protruded through the sloppy maid’s robes, shook violently.

It was a masterpiece.

The woman flinched as his fingertips traced the dented teeth marks on the pink areola. The things trapped in Leon’s pants also trembled. Even after this annoying sexual desire was relieved once, instead of bowing its head, his penis lifted its head even harder.

Again it was a craving to be shoved into this woman’s moist hole.

Leon took the shoes one by one from her feet and threw them across the room. Her toes, trapped in the white stockings, curled up. Seeing the cheap stockings, incomprehensible displeasure arose.

“Spread your legs.”

As he rolled up her skirt and commanded, the woman meekly spread her legs apart. The bloomers covering her pubic hair were white like a white flag—meaning surrender. His lower body ached from the joy of having the woman who had never known submissiveness surrender.

Grabbing the middle of the bloomers with both hands, he spread them apart. As the dense seams were torn apart, revealing the pink flesh, his neck shook greatly.

“Huhk…”

At that, the woman was embarrassed and tried to close her legs.

Leon grabbed the inside of her thigh and pushed it up. Because of that, her knees were folded up and her secret place was exposed wide. The white flesh split, revealing the shiny pink flesh. His mouth was watering.

His stomach trembled with hunger.

Sexual desire was like appetite. Both were animalistic desires that he considered uncivilized.

“Ah! Ahk, stop!”

As he gazed at the thin flesh that was layered on top of each other, he rubbed the bumps he had rubbed with the nose of his shoe until his fingertips became hot. The woman screamed and trembled.

“It’s really easy.”

“Heuk…”

The woman, whose whole body was shaking, dropped her lower body on the mattress. The ends of her weakly spread legs drooped and dangled out of bed.

“Looks like you touched it quite often.”

The woman sobbed at the words and shook her head. Perhaps, she never touched it with her hand, so maybe that was why she was more sensitive.

Leon opened with his index and middle fingers under the protrusion, beating like a heart. In the center of the petal-thin, pink flesh, there was a narrow hole that could only be pierced by a needle. He tried putting his little finger into the vagina that twitched.

“Huht!”

“Don’t move. It’ll tear.”

He then gently pressed the woman’s belly, which was shaking. Pushing his finger a little further into her tight stomach, the woman gasped for breath as she struggled to accept half a notch of his little finger.
Chapter 38.
“He sent his fiancée without tasting.”

Leon pulled out his finger and clicked his tongue.

“I didn’t expect Jimmy Blanchard Jr. to give me so much? I am thrilled.”

He mentioned Jimmy’s name in his mouth again. Grace bit her lip as the guilt and fear she had been trying to forget came over. The torn part opened again, and a sharp pain arose. Still, nothing compared to the pain in her heart.

He groaned as he tasted the liquid on the tip of his little finger. In the eyes of those who did not know, it was as if the face of a noble who savored the finest wine.

“To send a present that suits my picky taste… I mean, he knows my tastes that I don’t know quite well.”

Saying so, he took a deep breath. He was like a bull on the verge of rushing in excitement when he saw the color red.

“He’s an enemy, but I want to commend him for his ability.”

Winston took his hand to the knot in his tie.

The black silk tie slid off and hung straight on the iron railing at the foot of the bed. Next was the pin that fixed his shirt collar. As he pulled out the golden pin, he then placed it neatly on the table at the foot of the bed.

Grace watched helplessly as he undressed, while she was revealing her secret place as if putting it on display.

His face was solemn, like a priest performing a reverent ceremony before an important event, but only his eyes looking down at the sacrifice were very vulgar. Long fingers unbuttoned his shirt one by one and went down.

As the hem of his shirt opened, the firm chest inside the shirt was visible.

The shirt, folded in half without a single crease, hung next to the tie. The black belt soon hung next to it, and as Winston opened the front of his pants, the cock of copper-colored flesh bounced out. The flesh was erect, pulsating blood vessels viciously as if nothing had happened a while ago.

Seeing the venomous serpent twitching as though wanting to enter her body again, the depths of her throat ached in bitterness. The two people’s breathing became rough for completely different reasons.

Winston, who looked down at Grace with eyes full of desire, pointed his eyes between her legs.

“Open it with your hands.”

The woman glared at him and slowly stretched her hand between her legs. As the slender fingers pulled the folds of the flesh, the pink target with a red hole in the center unfolded at a good angle to be pierced.

“How do you feel when you claim to be the revolutionary army and beg the enemy while vagina yourself with your own hands?”

Leon gently pressed the woman’s belly, who was staring at him, with his palm. He placed his lower body close between her legs, which had been unable to crawl with only one hand.

The woman stiffened her body as the hot flesh brushed against the wet flesh.

“It will hurt.”

He gave a warning as he gripped the base of his penis and pressed the tip against Grace’s vagina. Should she even offer a kiss to thank him for warning her like a gentleman? She squeezed her eyes shut and shook her head.

She was already suffocating from the pressure that was subtly squeezing her entrance.

Just one finger was enough to make her sore, as if her bottom was being torn, how painful it would be if that thick lump of flesh came in. It didn’t seem like it could come in at first glance.

This was torture

Grace remembered how to endure torture. She was taking a deep breath and repeated the same words over and over as if hypnotizing herself in the head.

“Try begging.”

She came to her senses at his sudden words. Winston was looking down at her with her eyes ready to swallow her in a mouthful at any moment.

“Why should I? You will do it anyway.”

“If you beg, I might listen.”

“You said you won’t listen to everything just because I begged?”

“You are smart.”

The corners of his lips curled at an angle. Even though it was clear ridicule in Grace’s eyes, it was actually a sad smile.

Something was missing.

Come to think of it, the imaginary ‘Sally’ cried out when he committed the crime. This woman was overly docile as she had already lost her will.

“Then, say something like this… You know what Sally, whom I loved so much, said every time she brought me meals.”

Enjoy your meal, Captain.

“Every time you said that, I wanted to throw you to the table and devour you.”

How far did he want to ridicule her? Grace exclaimed with a groan.

“Enjoy your meal and go to hell—Ahhh!”

Leon moved his back heavily. The blunt end slammed into the vagina, and the flesh that had pushed him tight was torn.

Both of their backs were bent backwards at the same time. The two lower bodies trembled greatly as they were connected as one. A man and a woman standing at the extremes of pain and pleasure contorted her face and groaned together.

“It-it hurts, huhk…”

“Ugh, too—Haa, tight…”

Even if he didn’t, her body was too narrow to accept him though her insides began to shrink as they tried to push down what he had put in.

“Relax.”

“It hurts! Please stop…!”

“Stay still.”

Winston grabbed Grace’s waist as she struggled in pain and thrust his penis into her.

Her legs, spread to the limit, were pounding to get away from him. There was no end. It was all inside now. It was really all over now… Each time she believed that, the man stabbed his waist down as if mocking her and the burning pain became longer.

Grace begged as she pushed the man’s chest, who drove a stake between her legs.

“Please, ahk, stop putting it in.”

However, she stopped begging when she saw his face filled with joy.

Right. It was no use begging.

The more she begged, the more she enjoyed it, and he would insert that terrible weapon to the end. Grace covered her mouth as a groan of pain escaped her. He was a man who took pleasure in the suffering of others, so she didn’t want to show that she was in pain.

Nevertheless, that, too, was futile.

Leon moved whenever the crushing screams in the woman’s mouth subsided. The inner wall, which had been stubbornly resisting like its master, eventually opened itself wide and accepted the intruder. Tightly biting the thick cock, he groped the secret place.

Its edges were torn and blood was oozing out, resembling the lips that sucked him.

Suddenly, he paused for a moment.

It seemed that he could reach the climax just by watching the woman trembling with his penis seated to the root. However, when he stopped moving, the woman moved. The inner wall pushed and pulled on him as if they had no idea what to do with this intruder they had never felt before.

He might really come like this.

It was beyond imagination. He had no idea that a woman’s stomach could be this hot. In addition, as the moist skin kept sucking on sensitive areas, he even had the illusion that his body was melting.

“Heup…”

He patted her lower abdomen where he was embedded and pressed it gently. The woman tremble convulsively. When he swung his penis buried in her flesh to find his shape, she exploded as if she had been electrocuted.

“Heuk, stop…”

Waving chest, wheezing breath, left hand gripping the sheet, trembling right hand pushing his stomach, and even the inner wall tightening.

The woman’s every reaction to the swing of his waist was lewd.

Leon began to pull out the penis that had been buried down to the root. Although he was quick to bury it in, he was slow to take it out. He wanted to let the copper-colored skin be completely dyed with the woman’s blood.

The outer layer of her walls that had stuck to his cock snapped and fell with a sound. The woman’s body rocked up and down.

As soon as he pulled it to the end, he felt empty—even the woman seemed to push in the emptiness. The hole the size of a needle opened itself as wide as him. The red, bloodshot flesh was twitching at a glance.

“Haa…”

The moment his eyes touched the drops of blood on the tip, his heart raced. He was always agitated by blood, but the bliss of blood that could only be shed once in a lifetime was overwhelming.

Leon hugged the crying woman. Holding the tears from the corners of her eyes on his lips, he sighed with excitement. The tears filled with the pain of being conquered by him were so sweet that it was dizzying.

“Damn it…”

It was a crazy idea for the spy and enemy’s daughter who insulted him, but he even found the woman quite lovable.

…So much so that he wanted to tame her and want her to stay by his side.

This time, he whispered softly as he kissed the corner of her lips that had ripped after sucking on his heavy cock.

“Grace Riddle, you are mine now.”

At that moment, the woman turned her head and refused to kiss him. The woman was still deluded. She had not been conquered. There was a long way to go before she was tamed… Regardless, Leon was willing to go down that road, very gladly.

“Ah-heuk!”

The cock that had been out of her was pierced to her walls at once.

“Ms. Riddle, how does it feel to have your first time lost to the dirty monarchy pig?”

Leon Winston was a master of torture. He knew too well how to offend Grace’s soul as well as her body.

“You probably didn’t mean to give it to me. Well… Forgive me.”

He mocked her with dignified remarks and only vulgar meaning, and in the midst of doing so, he moved his waist like a dog in heat and attacked her roughly.

Chapter 39.

Fortunately, the physical pain soon subsided, but the emotional pain did not end there.

“Take care of your body.”

Her mother’s plea echoed in her head, swaying wildly along Winston’s movement. She was a conservative mother. Since she was a child, she had preached to Grace to spare her first time until her first night and only to sleep with her husband for the rest of her life.

Grace wanted to be the daughter her mother loved, so she lived up to her mother’s teachings, even being called old-fashioned.

“Don’t give it to those filthy bastards.”

…She didn’t want to do this either.

Anger surged towards Fred and Jimmy, who had pushed her to this point. Why does she hate those two more than Winston, who was doing her now?

‘No. Please don’t think like that. This doesn’t mean anything. It means nothing.’

She repeated it as if to brainwash herself, but to no avail before the devil’s presence. As Winston lifted Grace’s lower body, her waist was naturally folded under the force that was pushing her down like driving a stake in, revealing their joined part in front of her.

As soon as she saw his blood-soaked cock of coppery flesh moving in and out of her pink flesh, she closed her eyes in horror.

“Open your eyes.”

Even though she used her arms to cover her eyes, Winston was the devil who knew no mercy. This bastard tormented her until she opened her eyes and accepted this shameful copulation with her five senses.

“Then, should I bring a camera, huh? Let this historic scene remain forever as a photograph.”

Unable to overcome the threat, she opened her eyes.

With a disgustingly elegant smile, he vulgarly shoved his penis into her entrance. Every time the genitals with protruding veins and tendons that were about to burst, the vagina, which seemed to be torn apart, made a loud, vulgar sound.

The love liquid overflowed and wet the man’s groin and her thighs.

Tears overflowed from the corners of Grace’s eyes as she watched the lewd scene. She couldn’t believe it when she saw that it was her body that was connected to Winston.

As if reading her feelings, the man raised his voice and shouted.

“Look carefully. Now, you are eating the greedy monarchy pig’s thing.”

“Hahk!”

Slam.

The cock which had gone out, leaving only the tip draped over the vagina, was pierced all the way to the root.

Grace twisted her body and groaned.

“Haa… Miss Riddle.”

“Ah, aht… Ha, stop, uht, please, ahk!”

“Blanchard’s prostitute, and I am the first man of the prostitute whom the leader loved the most. It is an infinite honor for me.”

He tied her hands with his tie as Grace covered her ears.

“I heard you can’t forget your first experience. Even if you want to forget tonight, I will do my best to make it an unforgettable memory for the rest of your life.”

“Stop!”

She already wanted to forget.

“Winston, please stop, huhk…”

“Oh no…. If Miss Riddle is lucky enough to have her first night with her fiancé, be careful not to call my name. It will be insulting.”

When he mentioned Jimmy in his mouth again, Grace was enraged.

“I will kill you, you devil! If one day the revolution succeeds, I’ll be the one to drop the guillotine blade around your neck.”

“Then, can I ask for the last meal of the death row inmate to be Grace Riddle, which he enjoyed in the past?”

“Crazy bastard…. Huh-huhk, I’ll kill you…”

Curses and howls intermingled.

The imaginary Sally Bristol was in front of him, Leon exhaled a breath of joy. Every time he swayed his waist flexibly, her chest waved, with her nipples lustfully protruding. At the same time, her slender legs draped over his broad shoulders, dangling helplessly.

He was soaked wet even to the gaps in his clearly divided abs. She wanted to believe it was sweat, but who could be deceived? It was her love liquid that soaked the man’s body.

Watching all this, Grace’s eyes were empty.

Squeak, squeak.

The bed continued to creak loudly.

It was a cramped and small bed for two people. Every time Winston thrusted his back, it felt like it was going to break.

Grace was also breaking little by little.

“I will kill you…”

“Haa, yes.”

The woman’s repertoire of muttering the same words to herself like a broken phonograph increased by one more sentence.

“Please, don’t do it inside…”

He was amazed when he heard it.

“Hey, even if I call you Miss Riddle, I think you’d been mistaken for thinking that you’re a lady. Why do you think I would sow the seeds of the noble nobility in the body of a prostitute like you?”

“Haa…”

The moment Grace was relieved, his eyes became sharp.

“Ha-uhk!”

Her body turned with the cock stuck all the way in. As the bumps that protruded roughly scratched her vagina, a sharp sensation soared to the tip of her head.

“Gasp!”

Grace was leaning down like a dog and lifted her head.

“It’s strange! Please, ha-uhk, don’t do it.”
Winston shoved his hand between Grace’s legs. Because of the tremendous thickness of his penis, the labia opened up, and he easily found and rolled the clitoris, which had already been exposed. Then, he gently spread her love liquid on the red, swollen nub with his thick fingertips.

It was slow friction, but her walls twitched quickly.

“Swallow me gently. You don’t want to get pregnant? You were very determined to drain me out.”

“Uhng…”

His ridicule was lost in Grace’s ears.

She buried her face between her tied arms and struggled with a sensation she had never felt before. An intense urge to squirt something from the secret parts as Winston’s genitals and fingers mercilessly crushed her.

…No. No.

Not knowing what it was, Grace trembled in fear and tried to hold back. However, the opponent didn’t allow her to endure it. He also added his other hand. His large hand was caught between Grace’s body and greedily grabbed and teased the breasts.

The sound of the soft flesh rubbing was deafening. Each time she was pushed from the back, she was swept on the thick sheets, her protruding nipples pushed into his hand. He even smashed it with his fingertips.

“Ah-uuhk!”

“Right. It feels good, isn’t it?”

The wet lips sucked at her earlobe and spat out cruel whispers in a hissing voice like a snake.

“Baby, cum. It’s okay. Your fiancé will forgive you.”

He provoked both the erogenous zone and guilt, pushing Grace to the brink. She struggled to get his hand off. Walking forward on her knees and elbows, Winston violently dragged her buttocks and shoved his penis even harder.

Deep in her stomach, his penis squirmed like a living snake.

Pound, pound.

The thick glans pounded her soft flesh loudly.

Every time that happened, an indescribable sense of heat rose in her shaking body. It was strange to feel something in a place she had never felt anything before. The arrogant intruder poked at the virgin land as if it were his own when the owner itself was unfamiliar with it.

“Don’t…”

It didn’t hurt, so she was even more afraid.

“Ahk, don’t…”

Winston scoffed at her behind her back. Half-knowing it was a lie. The man hated it terribly though he didn’t hate the pleasure of intercourse.

She had been trained to endure torture, but she had never been trained to endure pleasure. She didn’t know how to overcome this disgustingly sweet pleasure, which was filled with greed. Her vagina began to contract to the ragged rhythm of the man driving in and out of her walls. She felt betrayed by her body.

But, her spirit soon betrayed her as well.

How many times did the blunt flesh hit her stomach in contact with her clitoris?

“Gasp, n—”

Grace couldn’t finish saying ‘no,’ and exclaimed a loud moan.

It was her climax.

Her whole body stiffened. Even with her mouth open, she couldn’t breathe. It felt like her heart would burst. The climax felt only through her toes and fingertips was nothing compared to the climax felt through insertion.

Like a blind person that opened their eyes, her eyes were bright white. After that, she felt nothing but ecstasy, and it seemed as if time had stopped.

“Ahhuu… Unng…”

The thick flesh began to subtly scratch her sensitive points again. The body that betrayed Grace was feeling good, it shook its rear shallowly, not knowing what to do.

She felt like her drowsy body belonged to someone else. As her toes twitched intermittently, scratching the sheets, she couldn’t stop the inner wall from freely rubbing his genitals and giving Winston pleasure.

She even got the illusion that this wasn’t real.

Amazingly, she felt like she was in heaven. As he kissed her bare shoulder, the devil’s face, staring at her, looked like an angel.

…Crazy.

The moment the devil smiled happily, her mind flashed.

Chapter 40.

“Hu-uhk…”

“I can’t believe you came after being attacked by the enemy. You are a pathetic soldier.”

The woman who was an elite soldier was not here anymore.

Not only that she felt pleasure in being sexually assaulted by the man she hated, but she even moved her waist herself. She really felt like a whore. The shame of being stripped not only of her body but also of her mind was unbearable. Grace couldn’t stand it any longer.

…I don’t know. Now, I don’t know either.

As Winston let go of her droopy body, she collapsed onto the mattress. Her body twitched once again despite the stimulation as the cock went out in a long move. His cock bounced off, spraying love liquid all over her.

Drops of it dripped onto the maid’s robe and bed linen, leaving a stain.

“Uht…”

As soon as it escaped from the woman’s body, the tip of the genitals spewed out a thick liquid.

Leon’s hip, which had been tense to contain his climax, loosened.

“Ha…”

The dizzying climax swept through his body.

His mind, which had been clouded by lust, gradually cleared. It was then that the messy surroundings caught his eye.

Every time he thrusted into the woman lying like dead, her hips lost their immaculate shine and made her ass pink as her flesh twitched and jerked. The semen he spewed was clumped and stuck to the torn bloomer and the buttocks between them.

Seeing that vulgar form, his lower body felt stiff again and his animal instincts made it lifted its head.

‘Damn it…’

This vexing sex drive. It was a complete misunderstanding to expect that he would find it dirty after being frivolous for once.

It was also an instant that his mind got clouded.

Grace, who had been careless, thinking that it was finally over, trembled in surprise as Winston put a belt around her neck. He pulled it up like a dog’s leash and got her up before ordering.

“Suck it.”

In front of her, the penis was standing with its head raised.

Why don’t you die?

Seeing her disgusting eyes, Winston wiped away the semen and love liquid from his penis with her apron.

“Suck everything that is inside, with your mouth. If I put it back in like this, you’ll have my baby in the camp in nine months. I wonder if Little Jimmy would be willing to raise it.”

A child? Crazy.

Even if all the angels in the world fall, they would be better than this person.

At the moment when she felt her climax, Grace sucked him as if choking her own neck. As she pressed her lips to the hole through which the turbid liquid was dripping out, she just sucked it like a straw and licked the crevices with his tongue, thinking that she wouldn’t want this devil’s baby.

However, seeing that he was closing his eyes and letting out a painful groan, Grace wanted to bite off his hand that was stroking her face in praise.

“Swallow.”

He didn’t allow her to spit it.

“Get down.”

As soon as she did what she was told, the column of hot flesh rushed in through her vagina that was still not closed. Winston tugged the end of the belt around her neck like a dog’s leash and hit her on the buttocks hard, making a harsh slapping sound.

“Ah!”

“Move. Like a bitch in heat.”

He was the one who actually got into heat.

As soon as he came again and again, he got an erection again. The love affair, which was nothing like the mating of an animal, continued without a break.

She didn’t know how many times she had to suck the rest of the semen out with her mouth. By then, she wasn’t even bothered. She gave up counting from the eleventh time on how many times she felt the shameful climax.

As Grace was lying under the beast being shaken, she remembered a strange article in a tabloid that she saw on the train on the way to Winston about a year ago. It was said that lions mate a hundred times a day during their heat.

Suddenly, she remembered that the man’s name meant ‘lion’ and laughed. She was getting assaulted, and now she was laughing… She must really be out of her mind.

Winston also seemed out of his mind. Looking at his unfocused eyes, he looked like he was drugged.
The man who always seemed to be measured with a ruler was disorganized. He had the face of a refined and dignified noble, yet he threw at Grace the vulgarity of backstreet thugs.

Even though the content was vulgar, it was Winston who never used vulgar expressions, so Grace was quite surprised.

That wasn’t the end of the Leon Winston demeanor she knew. The most trusted spearhead of the Revolutionary Army, the archetypal of the arrogant noble, and the cruel Camden’s vampire devoured a woman’s breasts, making promiscuous sounds.

There, he put his ugly thing between her breasts and moved it, and then came on her face…

“It’s pretty.”

He whispered softly as if he was treating a lover, and placed the tip of his penis in her mouth.

How did the man who never hid an indecent picture under the bed suddenly turn into an erotomaniac? Grace asked herself again.

‘Did I meet a monster, or have I created it?’

The beast’s movement continued even if the female lost consciousness. When she woke up from a nightmare, she realized that she was in a more terrible nightmare. How many times did she sob?

“Hu-uhk…”

As Grace’s moaning became more and more hoarse, he continued thrusting into her while feeding water through his mouth.

She dropped her weary gaze on Winston’s left hand, which had gripped her right chest. Was it her or his wristwatch that was shaking? Seeing her sight that had difficulty focusing, Grace let out a groan of pain.

“Winston, please…”

The hour hand of his watch was at number six when he laid her down on the bed. However, now the distance between the hour hand and the number six was as wide as Grace’s legs. It was just too much to just accept it quietly.

She couldn’t stand it anymore and begged helplessly.

“Stop… You’ve done enough…”

“Enough? Is there anything like that?”

Winston muttered, biting her swollen nipples.

Grace squeezed her missing energy and tightened her belly. It was tragic to voluntarily give pleasure to a man who was attacking her, but she wanted to get out of it anyway.

“Haa, have you remembered your mission now?”

He spurred his body, letting out a wild moan, showing he liked that she was squeezing on his penis.

Grace didn’t know the body of a man well until this afternoon. But sadly, in just a few hours, she got a good idea of what kind of face the man named Leon Winston had just before he climaxed.

‘A little bit more…’

When she tightened and loosened her inner flesh more quickly and moved her waist two or three times, Winston hugged her in a crush and let out choking moans in her ear.

“Haa, ugh…”

The firm body that embraced Grace shuddered. At this moment, Leon Winston was so defenseless that he could easily be killed. If only she wasn’t so helpless that she couldn’t move under him.

He suddenly released his arm and went away.

As his penis slid out, Winston grabbed Grace’s ankle and spread it wide to her left and right.

The flesh that had been caught in the vagina was pulled out with a loud noise and sprung up. Leon took hold of the wet manhood and aligned the woman’s clitoris in the gap between the tip of his the penis before releasing the force on his lower abdomen.

“Huht…”

“Huuu…”

A sticky lump, like candle wax, glided through the cracks of the red, bloodshot flesh. Even though it was outside, he felt quite refreshed as he spewed his semen in the woman’s swampy hole. How many times did he feel like he was in extreme pain?

The pleasure he had known was not pleasure.

At the same time, he felt a sense of liberation as if the shackles that held his ankles all his life were loosened. And at the same time, Leon felt reluctant as though he had put new shackles in its place.

The more he did, the more his reason eroded away. A little while ago, he was about to come in her cervix, unable to resist the urge that had been tormenting him all night, and he only came to his senses at the last minute.

Still, he did something quite dangerous.

Now, the white lump fell into the vagina that was wide open and couldn’t close. He scraped it off with his hand and clicked his tongue.

‘What breeding. You’re not even a beast.’

Was it because of the woman’s body scent that made him lose his mind? Leon collapsed over the woman who smelled bloody, sweaty, and of his semen.

“Haa, Grace Riddle. You smell good.”

Because he didn’t get up for quite some time, Grace had to lay under the body of the well-trained soldier and receive him as it was. After enduring a few head-twisting kisses, and a few hand-pullings that made her choke with a parched neck, Winston got up.

“Stay there.”

He tethered her to the railing of the bed and headed for the bathroom attached to the torture chamber.

There was the sound of running water as if he was taking a shower.

Chapter 41.

Left on the bed like a piece of rag, all Grace could do was close her legs, which had been spread for hours.

The ripped bra was useless. She wanted to cover her breasts with a blouse and a maid outfit, but she didn’t want to touch her clothes. semen was splattered countless times all over her body, making her skin sticky, and the maid’s clothes were wet all over.



She thought she might cry when it was over. Turned out that was a very optimistic expectation because she didn’t even have the strength to cry.

Ironically, now she felt more relief and happiness than sadness or anger.

‘It’s finally over…’

The sound of water stopped. Soon, the man came out with a towel on, and he started putting on the clothes he had hung on the bed one by one.

The vulgar beast was clothed in the skin of an ascetic and elegant noble.

With the tie in perfect shape at once, Winston stood by the bed and gazed down at Grace. There was a smell of soap. Unlike her, who was still heaving, he had calm breathing.

Looking at that neat figure, it seemed that he wasn’t the same man who had been panting for hours on top of the woman a while ago. He untied the ropes from her wrists and moved his hand to Grace’s thigh.

‘What is he doing now?’

Winston suddenly began to remove the clips from the garter belt from the stocking band one by one.

As he took off her bloomers, Grace’s eyes widened. Was he picking up the spoils? Still, even this perverted act was too common in the face of Winston’s cruelty that exceeded expectations.

“I have to say thank you for the meal.”

He was going to send Jimmy her underwear stained with Grace’s blood and his semen.

“Because I know manners.”

The immaculately clean hands folded the dirty cloth flat and tucked it inside his jacket. Grace contemplated and clung to Winston.

“Please, don’t. I will do anything.”

He shook off Grace’s clinging hand, stood up, and asked in a cold voice.

“Do you still want to marry that bastard? Would your great commander-in-chief want a woman willing to spread her legs to the enemy?”

This man, why was he talking about marriage that she hadn’t even mentioned before?

“It doesn’t matter. Please, I did everything you wanted. What do you want to gain by trampling on me like that? Let’s make a deal again, huh? You want something else from me, right?”

Leon clenched his teeth. After saying that it didn’t matter, the rest of the sentence did not enter his ears.

“Miss Riddle, don’t wear a white wedding dress, even if the guy will marry you generously.”



“Because you are no longer innocent.”

He reached out to stare at Grace. The tip of his soft thumb gently stroked her rough cheeks of dried tears and semen. Ugly words flowed from between his lips, which had a graceful smile.

“Then, I will go and paint it bright red. Okay?”

Grace was confused. What in the world did this man want?

He acted as if he only wanted her body though he was not satisfied with the body. He wanted to humiliate her to his heart’s content, so even if she was willing to do so, he often acted like the person who had been humiliated by her.

She was well aware that for him, this was a private retaliation, not a public arrest. Still, she couldn’t shake his intuition that there was something more than revenge in his extremely private feelings.

‘Did he really like me?’

It was an absurd notion. She didn’t think he had noticed her other identity yet at that time.

“This is the only white that suits you.”

Winston lifted one side of Grace’s chest, wanting to take a good look. His semen, which had not yet dried, was condensed on the nipples that had turned red with teeth and lip marks.

“It suits you very well.”

He chuckled and turned his back.

“Please, Winston! Captain, please!”

She knew it was no use to begging, but her head went blank, and she followed him to the door and hung. She even called him Captain in humiliation.

However, he shunned her lightly.

Her legs, which were still shaky from having been spread out for a long time, crumbled helplessly, and Grace collapsed to the floor. Winston, who was about to open the door, turned his head and looked down at her.

It was Grace who was insulted, but this time, his eyes looked like he was the one who had suffered.

“Blanchard’s whore. As the rumors spread, I was looking forward to it…”

He clicked his tongue briefly.

“It’s not even great.”

He left behind only a chilling sneer.

When he disappeared, the smell of soap, which was not suitable for the torture chamber, also disappeared in an instant.

…The smell of sweat, the smell of semen, the smell of blood.

Grace repeated the same words as she lay on the cold floor, her body reeking of torture.

Someday, I will torture you, too. I will torture you cruelly. I will make you miserable.

So, try begging.

All you would get was regret.

 


 
Why did they bring him here?

Fred couldn’t take his trembling gaze from the soldiers lined up in front of him. Were they going to execute him?

There was nowhere to hide in the open field. He could see a tram station and a small town behind his back though it was too far to run away. In the first place, due to the torture he had been subjected to all night, it was difficult to even walk because there was no place all over his body that was not sore.

Before long, a black sedan glided and stopped behind the soldiers. The passenger door opened, and Campbell stepped out and opened the back door.

Winston walked out from the back seat.

Fred held his breath, feeling like an elegant but deadly black panther was approaching. The glossy black shoes came to a halt two steps ahead of him, muffling the grass damp from the morning dew.

Winston leaned his hand back and stared at Fred. The light-colored eyes were dyed with the red light of dawn. At that moment, Fred thought. Actually, those red eyes must be the real face of that devil. The devil didn’t say anything.

As the silence grew longer, Fred’s imagination grew worse.

Did he bring Fred here so he could spit out the location of their base? And, threaten to kill him if he doesn’t rat it out. Or perhaps he was brought to the field to hunt humans. Or, maybe if the base’s location is not leaked until the very end. His older sisters might suffer what Grace did yesterday.

‘But what if he says he’s going to kill me here?’

It was a moment full of conflict, and he was trembling with fear.

“I will let you go alive.”

Leon’s lips rose at an angle, although his eyes didn’t smile.

The rat, trembling in fear, was noticeably relieved as soon as Winston offered to spare his life. He immediately got down on his knees and licked his shoes. He didn’t even ask what happened to Grace, even when he cowardly saved his life by selling the woman.

Incompetent, dependent, and selfish. He was the most repugnant kind of human.

He wanted to change his mind.

“But, there are conditions.”

Nonetheless, the rat was useful.

“If you promise to do well in the tasks entrusted to you.”

“Yes, yes. If you leave anything to me…”

Leon held out a small package to the sly coward. The light brown wrapper had Leon Winston as the sender’s name and James “Little Jimmy” Blanchard Jr. as the recipient’s name.

“Tell this to your commander-in-chief.”

This will make him realize that it was a fatal mistake for him to look down on Winston.

Fred’s hands, bloodied with all the nails plucked out, trembled as he picked up the package. The bastard glanced into Winston’s eyes with his blue, swollen eye and then began to drag his legs and sprint backwards slowly.

He was afraid that if he turned around, he would shoot a gun in the back of the head. Leon smiled at him and pointed to the tram station in the distance.

“Go now.”

He sighed in relief and turned his back. Watching the rat limp across the field, Leon opened the holster and pulled out his pistol.

Bang.

“UWAAH!”

“Haha.”

It was ridiculous. The gun hit a wildflower that bloomed one step behind him, and like he was hit, he collapsed, and his limbs trembled. Soon, he started to crawl like an animal on the dirt floor and run away.

Leon, who had detonated a few ‘saluting cannon’ for fun, put the pistol back and gave instructions.

“Campbell.”

“Yes.”

“Track him. Don’t miss him. Let’s deal with him when it’s done.”

“Yes, I will do it without mistakes.”


Chapter 42.

Grace looked down blankly at the chipped soup bowl and chuckled.

‘My situation is really…’

One of the privates handed over clear soup boiled with leftover ingredients as breakfast. It was the menu that she always brought to the ‘guests of the torture room.’

The only ingredients were onion roots and carrot stems. There was only a bowl of soup on the tray because there was no longer ‘Sally’ who provided boiled eggs or bread to the captured revolutionary army.

No one put morphine in her mouth.

Her stomach was throbbing. As her thighs were pulled, her bruised knee hurt.

Grace frowned as her sensitive nipples brushed her bra with every breath she took. In the end, the soup was thrown, and then she lay down on the bed. It was a relief to have extra sheets in the closet. No matter how hard it was, she would not lie down on a dirty sheet.

Human habits were scary… Or should she say she was resilient?

After Winston left last night, she had been working incredibly diligently until breakfast. Closing her eyes for a moment, she wiped away the traces of sex on the bed and floor. The torture chamber maid erasing the traces of torture on herself.

…Should she laugh or cry at that contradiction?

Then, she tried to erase the traces left on her body, but it was not easy. As the semen and clotted blood were washed away, the bruises and tooth marks left on the body became clearer.

It wasn’t the only thing that was clearer.

Winston’s smell still seemed to linger on the tip of her nose.

It was definitely a smell that should have been wiped out of this bed and her body. As Grace shuddered at the body odor drifting around her like a ghost, even the sound of his gasping breath like an animal lingered in her ears. So, when she closed her eyes tightly, it unfolded vividly.

The man’s face and nudity, who crushed her while looking down at her with eyes drunk with the joy of the conqueror…

“You’re dripping milk.”

Suddenly, she remembered one of the disgusting moments of last night.

He fit the gap on the tip of his penis to Grace’s peaks, then let out his semen. The milky white liquid with a honey-like texture accumulated at the flat peak and ran down the pointy nipple down to the gentle flesh.

Winston gazed at it and made fun of her, saying that Grace was lactating. It didn’t seem like people would act so badly in the brothel.

“Ah!”

Grace wrapped her arms around her chest in a belated defense and shook her body.

Even the slightest touch between the two layers of clothes made her nipples tingle. Because Winston had been chewing on it all night, the piece of flesh did not return to its original smooth shape but swelled upright the whole time, making it even more painful.

Getting her body up, she opened the luggage next to the bed. She covered her blouse with a pointed spot in the shape of her beads with a thick cardigan and looked through the bag to see if anything was missing.

The private who had given her breakfast a while ago had brought her luggage with him. They probably opened it up and inspected it. It was fortunate that there were no items containing important information.

“Why is this…”

There was nothing missing, but there was something that should have been missing.

There was a box of high-quality stockings that had been set aside on the chest of drawers in the maid’s room that was now in the luggage. It seemed that the soldier who was looking through the luggage thought it belonged to Grace and mistakenly put it in.

‘…This is Winston’s.’

She took out the stocking box, placed it on the iron table in the middle of the room, and laid back on the bed.

“Ugh… haa…”

Her whole body was screaming, but her mind was still.

‘I thought I was going to die yesterday…’

Today, she was strangely calm. Was it resignation or disciplined? After the storm passed, silence came, but Grace knew…

…The storm was only just beginning.

‘Don’t be shaken.’

Today may be more painful than yesterday.

Grace scolded herself as she pondered all the selfish thoughts she had last night after being pushed to the brink. As time goes by, her mental powers crumble. It’d only been two days, so she shouldn’t collapse already.

‘Don’t be shaken. Don’t be shaken.’

As if she was brainwashing herself, someone knocked on the iron door.

It was strange. No one would be knocking on the door to the torture chamber. Perhaps, everyone knew it, they thought that there was no need to respect the privacy of the person inside, so they would just open the door.

Come to think of it, the private who brought breakfast a while ago also knocked on the door.

‘…What? Were they being considerate because I’m a woman?’

Grace answered as she got up and sat down.

“Yes, come in.”

Ha. There was a sad laugh. What cruel joke is this? To answer as if the torture chamber was her room.

When the door opened, Lieutenant Campbell appeared.

“Please sit down.”

He pointed to the iron table with the file folder in his hand. Grace sat on the chair and glanced at the lieutenant across.

‘He knows what happened yesterday, right?’

She wet her parched lips and pulled the frill collar that covered her neck even higher. Still, he already knew anyway. There was no need to show the lieutenant even the naked evidence.

It was embarrassing to look him in the eye. Perhaps the lieutenant felt the same way, and he did not look directly at Grace but began the interrogation as he looked at the folder with the words ‘Grace Riddle’ written on the cover.

“Father, Jonathan Riddle.”

“Yes.”

“Mother, Angela Riddle.”

“Yes.”

After verifying her identity, he accused her of charges and asked if she would admit it.

“Do you admit to infiltrating the major military facility located in Winston’s residence?”

“Yes.”

This was the standard procedure before a full-fledged interrogation. Grace was relieved to see that Campbell was proceeding with the procedure as usual.

Then, by the end of today, Winston would report her arrest to Western Command. Because of her surname Riddle, Grace was classified as a Level 1 Dangerous Person. It meant that their superiors would pay attention to her.

Being ‘big’ was annoying but sometimes beneficial.

It would take many officers to interrogate one Grace. There would always be countless eyes watching her.

So Winston, who valued his dignity as a nobleman, wouldn’t treat her like a horned dog. Possibly, she would move to Western Command. It was Winston’s principle that women were not interrogated in this torture chamber.

‘Please…’

Whether it was Western Command or the concentration camp, please let her get out of here in a few days. If Winston released Fred as promised, Jimmy would be contacted within today. Then, they would set up a rescue team and try to rescue her from the convoy.

Grace only had to get out of this mansion.

“What happened to Fred?”

The lieutenant nodded his head to signify that he had been released and murmured.

“Captain Winston is a gentleman who can keep his promises to a lady.”

At those words, Grace bit her teeth, trying to contain the ridicule.

‘…Gentleman? That’s funny. Was he being sarcastic?’

However, there was no such nuance. Was he brainwashed? He must have heard all the vulgar sounds that leaked out of this room yesterday.

“I don’t know. That gentleman called me a whore.”

Campbell curled his eyebrows and glared at the sly, smiling spy. He was actually holding back the words that she was a whore from inside him. It was only because he was afraid of Captain Winston that he treated her with respect as a lady.

The rat, the torture chamber guest, the greenhorn, the fool…

The Captain always called the Blanchard rebels in this way, but he continued to call the woman Riddle. It was no surprise that he recalled the Captain’s face again the moment Wilkins revealed Sally’s identity.

Leon Winston had the face of a broken-hearted man.

‘Ha… He like the spy, what to do?’

Leon was also the person who seemed the farthest from a woman so far. Still, it wasn’t for Campbell to advise because the Captain already knew better.

Men, especially soldiers, would soon forget their conquered woman. Even so, if Campbell called a woman whom the Captain had not yet made up his mind on ‘a whore,’ only he would fly out of sight. So, he ordered the soldiers under him to treat Grace Riddle with respect.

But, this woman…

“Why does Lieutenant Campbell call me a lady? Speaking respectfully and knocking are unusual behaviors toward a spy.”

She kept provoking him to call her a whore.

It was no use as her future was bleak, and the Captain would soon send her to the camp and forget about it.

“Look here, don’t try to drive a wedge.”

Not threatened nor frightened, the woman tilted her head.

“Drive a wedge? So, if I tell the Captain that you insulted me as a whore, would the Captain hate you? Why?”

“I ask the questions.”

However, the woman didn’t listen to him.

“Ah, with that logic, it would be more effective to say you tried to attack me. Thanks for the useful information.”

What was this woman? Campbell was speechless.

The maid, who was always kind, was nowhere to be found. Campbell saw his superior in the spy. Did she get it after hanging out with the Captain? Or, it may be that birds of a feather have come together by chance.

Chapter 43.
“My head hurts.”

Grace jumped up from her seat and watched the lieutenant heading towards the door. He slammed the tightly shut door open and left it wide open so that the soldiers in the hallway could see what was going on inside the torture chamber.

Grace sighed in relief.

“fuck me… I need to send her to a prison camp immediately…”

Listening to the lieutenant’s complaint, she prayed to herself.

‘…Yes, please send me.’

 


 
Winston only came to see her in the afternoon.

‘Did he report me to the headquarters? Please, report me.’

Grace looked anxiously at the man sitting across from the iron table.

‘…What’s wrong with him?’

He was quiet.

Winston didn’t even say a blatant greeting when he came in. All he did was sit with his arms crossed and stare at Grace with eyes that she couldn’t understand the meaning of. There was no way that that man would waste meaningless time.

…Nonetheless, what did he want by watching her quietly?

Anxiety began to circulate deep in her stomach.

Uncomfortable with his persistent gaze, Grace twisted her body over and over again. Winston only moved for a short time. He only blinked his eyes from time to time and moved his pupils. Still, his gaze was always on her.

She felt as if she was hypnotized as they faced each other in silence.

Yesterday felt like a dream…

If it weren’t for the nail marks on the back of that man’s hand, she would have insisted that it was a nasty nightmare. As she thought so, Grace looked down at her nails. Would it be okay? They may be pulled out with nippers as he retaliated.

She was having a moment of self-mocking.

Grate.

The sound of the chair being pulled broke the silence.

When she lifted her head, Winston was already standing by her. As he reached out his hand, Grace tensed as the hand large enough to cover her face suddenly approached.

“What, uhp…”

She thought he was going to choke her because he grabbed her neck, so she tried to resist, but she lost her words.

Winston lifted Grace’s chin and caught her lips.

She froze, not expecting he would suddenly kiss her. When the improbable man softly pressed their lips together and then pulled his off, she went numb. However, the kisses grew more and more passionate.

He licked her lips roughly and pressed them against his lips, like something that he had repressed burst out.

‘What the hell was this guy doing?’

Then, it finally tore.

“Uhp, huhp…”

Grace’s lower lip.

Because Winston’s ferocious offensive opened up a wound that had not yet healed, the bitter taste of blood began to spread. Immediately, he carefully licked the blood oozing out of her soft flesh.

It was a shy tongue move. It didn’t fit in with Camden’s vampire that Grace knew…

‘Perfect for a boy in Abbington Beach…’

With an ominous sense of dread, Grace opened her eyes. Was he watching her the whole time he kissed her? When their eyes met, the cold eyes between his curved eyes did not smile at all.

“Hello, Daisy. My first love.”

The blue eyes fluttered wildly.

Leon finally solved the mystery of why he was only affected by this woman.

 


 
“Even here at Abbington Beach, the coastal cliffs formed by wave erosion are well developed…”

Leon looked at the tutor sitting at the end of the long table with distasteful eyes. What a boring geology class where others were enjoying time swimming in the sea.

“Sir, is it true that you can find evidence that the continents were actually all one supercontinent in the strata of the coastal cliffs?”

A displeased gaze moved to his younger brother, who was sitting opposite him.

“Jerome should have been born first.”

Every time his mother received her two sons’ report cards, his mother mumbled this complaint. It wasn’t that Leon was worse than Jerome, though. There were just different subjects that stood out from each other.

His mother favored Jerome, who excelled in noble studies that suited her taste. In addition to that, she was a person who considered soldiers to be blood-crazed savages. Because of that, Leon, who showed outstanding talents in military-related subjects, would not be highly appreciated.

“I’m so glad that sissy guy isn’t the eldest son.”

For exactly the same reason, his father favored Leon.

So, even if he received his mother’s subtle and outright cold treatment, he never felt much regret.

‘I don’t like her either…’

He was tired. He was tired of her treatment of his father, a great soldier and wealthy man, as a half-noble with no titles. Countess Winston was keen to use every move of the family, even at summer vacation, thoroughly to fulfill her wish.

Leon was still too young to talk about marriage. Nevertheless, his mother had already shoved him into a suffocating nagging, telling him that he had to look good for a good marriage.

“Leon, at the very least, since we’ve set up a meeting with the Duchy ladies, why don’t you talk about boring things like hunting and cricket?”

“Then next time, I’ll talk about military law.”

“Oh, my gosh! Why the hell are you even resembling your father with that crooked personality? The two father and son are very determined to kill me.”

Jerome talked about dinosaur fossils in front of the ladies, so why was he the only one getting into trouble? Leon was always dissatisfied as she disliked and treated him as a chess piece that would make her dream come true.

Once he complained, his father burst out laughing and patted him on the shoulder.

“Leon, listen. All humans are just chess pieces to others. What matters is whether you’re a pawn or a queen.”

Those words were of great comfort to Leon. It was enough for him to treat his mother as a chess piece.

“You should try to be at least a knight.”<?i>

Obviously, Leon was more than a knight to his mother. Still, for him, his mother couldn’t even become a pawn because she was of no use.

After all, the only person who was meaningful to Leon was his respected father.

The low engine noise was mixed with the tutor’s meaningless words who criticized the theory of continental drift as nonsense. Leon looked out the window over Jerome’s shoulder. At the edge of the terraced garden, a row of black sedans were heading this way.

Soon after class, the party would begin.

‘The most boring party in the world.’

A few days ago, his mother had been arguing that a certain count and some distant relatives of the royal family were coming to the villa with daughters the same age as Leon. It was quite tiring to watch the girls exchange their jealousy and contempt for each other in prettier packaging.

Besides, there was another girl he wanted to see.

Leon put his hand into the pocket of his trousers. He thought about what had happened a few days ago, fiddling with the chocolate that had melted in the hot weather.

The first time he saw the girl was the day he came to this villa. While taking a walk on the beach attached to the south side of the villa, he ran into a girl picking up seashells. She was two or three years younger than him, and she seemed to be Jerome’s age.

Perhaps, she forgot to put on her swimsuit, her light blue skirt was soaked in seawater and wrapped around the girl’s skinny legs like seaweed. There were no adults by her side.

“Hey, kid! This is the villa’s private beach, outsiders are not allowed!”

When the servant chased her away, the girl pouted her lips and ran away.

Dark skin on brown hair. She was cute, but it was a common appearance and would soon be forgotten if only he hadn’t met her every day…

As he was riding out of the villa in the carriage, the girl was standing on the road. As he was taking a walk along the wall, the girl stood outside the iron bars of the front door. He even made eye contact with the girl sitting on a tree outside the wall.

At first, he thought it was a coincidence. However, no one happened to hang around in front of someone else’s house every day.

‘A thief…?’

Could such a little girl be a thief?

It was annoying. Until the girl’s face won’t leave his mind all day long. So two days ago, he asked impatiently.

“What are you doing?”

The girl, who had been sitting on an orange tree outside the wall, glancing inside like a meerkat, was startled by his sudden appearance and slipped off the tree.

“Kyak!”

Leon ran under the tree. It was a reflex action, even though he knew she would not be seriously injured because the tree was not that tall.

‘Ugh…’

As soon as he received the girl safely, he hurriedly lowered her like a man holding a fire. The girl’s face, as she pulled down her upside-down skirt, was as red as Leon’s.

“…Sorry.”

“It’s okay.”

It wasn’t until the moment the girl accepted his apology in a tiny voice that Leon realized something was wrong.

“Wait. Why am I apologizing? Shouldn’t you be the one who apologizes? You peeped into someone else’s villa?”

“Why can’t I look at it?”

“Don’t you know that peeping into someone’s house is rude and bad? Isn’t that what thieves do? Are you looking at it because you’re a thief?”

The girl didn’t show any signs of embarrassment or anger when he drove her as a thief. In fact, her face looked like she did not listen to Leon’s words. Seeing her glaring at him with her distinctive turquoise eyes, Leon twisted his body.

“I didn’t mean to steal. I was spying.”
Chapter 44.
“…What?”

“You.”

Leon, who was about to say that spying was bad for him, was speechless.

“You look really pretty.”

The girl covered her blushing cheeks with her hands, and she smiled bashfully.

It was the first time he had been told he was pretty, but he had been tired of hearing that he was good-looking. Even his mother, who didn’t like him, said that she liked him for his good looks.

“To a man, you don’t say ‘pretty,’ but ‘handsome’.”

“Wow… you look pretty when you’re angry.”

She was a really weird kid. Looking at the twinkling turquoise eyes, it was strangely warm, even in the shade of a tree.

“Well, you see.”

The girl clasped her hands behind her back and twisted her body as if there was something she wanted to ask of him.

“What?”

“Can I touch your hair just once?”

Leon was speechless once again by the unexpected request.

‘Why are you doing this to someone you’re seeing for the first time?’

Leon’s face didn’t look very good, and the girl panicked, giving reasons for the strange request.

“Sorry. Still, it was so pretty that I wanted to touch it! I think it will be soft and fluffy.”

“I am not a dog.”

“It’s not like that…”

“I’ve never seen a girl like you.”

The girl pouted her lips. Her big eyes started to get wet. Leon got nervous because he thought she was going to cry soon.

“No, I don’t mean that…”

I don’t mean that in a bad way.

He was just amazed to see a child who spoke straightforwardly after seeing girls who always covered up their inner feelings. To be honest, it was fun. It made him wonder what kind of strange words would come out next.

“Here.”

Leon bowed his head. Still taller than her, the girl tiptoed, and he bent his knees.

The girl’s hand touched his hair, smooth with pomade. He laughed at the thought that anyone would be astonished to see Major Winston’s son being petted like a dog by a commoner girl. However, when the girl smiled broadly like an excited puppy, the crooked corners of his mouth straightened.

“Wow, it’s soft. I thought it would be cold because it was a cold color, but it’s hot.”

“Because it’s summer.”

She was a really stupid kid.

“I think it will feel like this when you touch the sun.”

When the girl withdrew her hand, he straightened his bent body.

“Thank you.”

“I hope all your doubts are cleared.”

The girl nodded her head.

“I’m jealous. I want to be blonde too. My whole family is blonde, but I am the only one with brown hair.”

The child was talking about things he didn’t ask.

Usually, Leon would use a reasonable excuse to avoid the place when girls were telling their stories that he didn’t care about. He left the place with an excuse for his upcoming riding class, but oddly enough, his foot didn’t step away from the place.

The child was chattering to herself, and she suddenly blushed and rummaged through the small bag that was slung across her body.

“Here, chocolate.”

The sloppy-branded chocolate from quite a distance from here was pushed around the corners as if it had been in a bag for a long time.
Leon didn’t like sweets. Even though he always refuses, this time, he inadvertently accepted it. Besides, the cheap chocolate that his mother would tell him to throw away as though it was unclean…

“Why is this?”

“Price for spying.”

I saved it to eat.

The girl added that and smiled shyly.

It was literally like taking candy from a poor child’s mouth and eating it. At the moment, he just wanted to give back.

“I’ll come to spy again.”

The girl waved her hand and ran away. She even proudly told him she would spy again next time.

‘She’s a really weird kid.’

He noticed that she forgot to ask for her name.

To forget such a basic thing… Leon thought it was her fault for being so overwhelming that he got distracted. He was going to ask if they met again, but it rained all day yesterday.

That child looked a little naive. He was so nervous that he would come to spy even in such bad weather.

Perhaps, it was Leon who was really naive. It was because he sat and waited all day by the window where he could see the wall where she was always hanging out. He then put an umbrella next to it. Nonetheless, the child did not come.

…It was a relief, but why was he upset?

‘Aren’t you coming today?’

As soon as class was over, Leon went to the window where his gaze had been stuck all day yesterday and was disappointed again. All that was there when he turned his back to stare at the orange tree was nothing but oranges.

“Where are you going? A guest has arrived.”

As he was taking out his bike from the parking lot, the bookworm with a bow tie came and whined.

“Yes, I know.”

“These are the people mother called to greet you.”

“Jerome Winston, for the sake of mother who wants you to be the eldest, today you are the eldest.”

Leon got on his bike and said sarcastically in his father’s favorite commanding tone.

“I am not your subordinate!”

As he pedaled, Jerome shouted from behind. Leon stopped and glanced back at his brother.

“Why weren’t you born first?”

“I will rat you out!”

“Snitching sissy.”

He again imitated his father’s habits. Jerome kept his mouth shut as if his self-esteem had been hurt and snorted.

“Jerome, you’re so honest that it’s no fun.”

Leon chuckled at his brother over his shoulder and then pedaled again.

‘If you don’t come, I can go.’

The problem, however, was that he did not know where the girl lived. Did he have to check all the orange trees in Abbington Beach? After searching for about an hour on the hill where high-end villas were gathered and the shopping street below it, he was a bit discouraged.

The sun slowly rose. He was thirsty for riding his bike under the scorching sun.

Leon, who was following the beach, stopped when he saw a snack shop selling ice cream. When he parked the bicycle on the railing by the roadside…

“No money?”

…It was the girl’s voice.

‘Found you.’

Leon neatly swept his hair, which might have been messed up by the bike ride.

“I am so hot and thirsty… I will bring it to you tomorrow.”

Grace clung to the newsstand and begged one more time.

“Bring your parents.”

However, the man who sold ice cream did not back down even an inch.

I don’t know where my parents are. This morning, obviously, I got money from my father, but after playing on the beach, it disappeared. It’s a waste of money. If my father found out, he would scold me. So, should I eat only oranges on the road today?

It’s not like this in our town, everyone outside seems to have a heart made of ice.

Tears were churning. Sad and hurt, Grace took a step back and grumbled to the innocent seller.

“Why not? Tsk… too much. It works in our town.”

“Then, go back to your village. Don’t bother when you’re just a beggar.”

“I am not…”

As she bowed her head and was about to leave, an unfamiliar hand clasped Grace’s shoulder.

“You can’t help a lady in her plight, but to be rude and reveal your bottom line.”

Grace’s eyes widened as she raised her head.

‘Gasp! The pretty kid.’

Her cheeks became hot. Perhaps because of the hand that gently wrapped around her shoulder and perhaps because of the shame that she had shown the most insignificant side of her.

“I’ll have a bottle of sparkling water. Not Appenzeller, but Chalet. And, to the lady…?”

When the boy asked her politely, calling her a lady again, Grace answered with haste.

“A stick of ice cream for me. Just that.”

The boy was also cool enough to buy a bottle of sparkling water.

He ordered even the one with the difficult label in a foreign language ??to order, and the sparkling water looked like a fine wine. On the other hand, ordering an ice cream stick made her feel like a child. So, she added that she didn’t know what to order though she really wanted to eat it.

“What flavor?”

The boy was pretty and handsome, but he was even kind. He even asked her what flavor she wanted to eat.

“Chocolate and vanilla sell best. If you don’t like it, orange, lemon, strawberry…”

The seller, who was terrifying to Grace a while ago, was different in front of the boy. He took out all the flavors of ice cream sticks from the icebox and showed them. Perhaps even if Grace had brought the money, he wouldn’t have been this stoked.

Perhaps, it was because the boy looked like a nobleman no matter how.

Even if it was not for the expensive-looking polo shirt and wristwatch, he exuded a noble atmosphere from his posture of standing with his back straight and his relaxed eyes.

“Then, strawberry…”

As the boy watched, the seller quickly took out a strawberry-flavored ice cream and held it to Grace with both hands.

“Yes, strawberry for the lady. Here it is.”

Obviously, she was taught that nobles were terrible. The grown-ups called the nobility greedy pigs. However, when she came out of her town, she wasn’t sure. Everyone seemed to like nobles.

Grace didn’t know other nobles, but this boy was good.

“Thank you.”

The boy smiled gracefully.
Chapter 45.
“Let’s go.”

She followed the boy, not knowing where he was going. After walking for a while, it occurred to her that even the boy did not know where he was going.

“Hey.”

Grace, who was glancing at the boy walking along the seaside promenade with his bicycle, courageously spoke up.

“You were like a prince a while ago.”

The boy who was pouring the carbonated water bottle into his mouth, coughed.

He took his handkerchief out of the back pocket of his pants and paused. Tilting his head as he looked down at Grace with the ice cream in her mouth, he frowned slightly and sighed.

“It’s melting.”

He handed the handkerchief to Grace and wiped his wet lips with the back of his hand. Even the look was cool. The boy asked her as she looked up as if she saw a carbonated water commercial.

“Why didn’t you come today?”

“Huh?”

The girl who tilted her head again smiled with her lips turned red from the strawberry ice cream.

“Did you wait?”

Leon’s cheeks were as red as the girl’s lips.

“Then, did you come to find me?”

“Huh? No. There’s, there’s just nothing to do…”

He rolled his eyes and frowned.

“I see…”

Seeing the look of disappointment on her face made him think that he should just be honest.

“Name.”

“What?”

“My name is Leon. You?”

“…Daisy.”

Leon didn’t know why the girl hesitated for a moment.

“Does Leon live here?”

“No. It’s just a villa. You?”

He already knew she wasn’t from here. However, Leon pretended he hadn’t overheard Daisy’s conversation with the seller from a while ago, so he asked.

“I come from somewhere far. Like a family vacation…”

Grace turned around without saying where the ‘somewhere far’ was and without explaining why it was ‘like’ and was not a family vacation.

“I’m so excited because it’s my first time here.”

She had never been out of the remote mountain town before. Even more so than staying in a luxury resort for such a long time. The sea she saw for the first time in her life was amazing, and she ran into Leon while walking along the beach on the first day he came here.

“But, is it okay if you go alone without your parents?”

Why was there always no one by the girl’s side? It was difficult for Leon to understand, as he was always followed by an adult wherever he went.

“…Uh.”

Grace wasn’t actually allowed to go alone.

At first, she thought it was just a family vacation because her parents, who were often away from home, came back after a long time and asked her to go to Abbington Beach.

However, it was a little strange since they left her older brother. It was only when they arrived and unpacked their luggage in a secluded accommodation that she realized that it was not actually a vacation but a ‘mission.’

Grace had no idea what duties the adults were talking about. It was just a righteous act of saving the world, so she could only guess that they were the hero she saw in the book—like the heroes who save the world, they had to keep their identities a secret.

She overheard grown-ups saying that their mission was to get information from a bad soldier like Winston.

Still young, Grace’s job was to ‘cover up’ the adults who came with her to make them look like ordinary travelers. All the adults were busy and didn’t have time to take care of Grace. So in the morning, they left the money at the bedside of her bed and left.

With that, she spent the past week having a lot of extravagance and fun, but today, when she met Leon, she had lost the money and looked shabby in front of him.

“Oh, I got pocket money this morning. But I must have lost it while playing on the sandy beach.”

Grace mumbled an excuse he didn’t ask. Looking up at Leon’s face, the orange tree spread over his head naturally caught my eye.

“Leon, then, in return for buying me ice cream, shall I pick oranges?”

Grace didn’t know why Leon’s eyes were shaking. She looked around for the most ripe and tried to climb the tree though another hand touched her shoulder.

“Don’t climb trees in a skirt.”

“Why?”

“…It’s vulgar?”

Why didn’t this child know this? Daisy blinked her eyes wide, filled with question marks as if she couldn’t understand even the word vulgar.

“Pink.”

Did she understand now? Daisy’s face turned bright red.

“Oh no! I wore white today…!”

“…Why are you saying that with your own mouth?”

Adults passed by the boy and a girl facing each other under an orange tree with faces like ripe sunshine and gave a meaningful smiles.

Embarrassed, Leon took the bike and started walking again. Meanwhile, Grace hesitated, not knowing whether to follow him or separate from him. He stopped after three steps. The girl who was supposed to follow him was still standing idly under the tree.

It was then that he realized.

That girl never said that she was going on a date with him today, but from the moment they met, of course, they should.

‘Wait. I haven’t told her it’s a date yet, right?’

He had never said such a thing… No, he didn’t have to.

The socialization between the sons of the nobility was determined by their parents, not the party involved. When, where, with whom, and what to do were all decided beforehand, Leon had to follow it whether he liked it or not.

For the first time in his life, he had the opportunity to spend time with the girl he wanted. Still, the problem was…

‘How do you say, let’s go on a date?‘

Leon hesitated without saying anything. The moment his head turned white because he thought Daisy would just want to go away, he let out a terrible word.

“If you want to repay me for buying you ice cream, you can play with me.”

His hand pointed across the street to the grand carnival.

‘Play? Are you a kid?’

Leon wanted to slap himself on the cheek. Besides, he bought her an ice cream that didn’t cost a few pennies and talked about repayment. What cheap threats! Apparently, this date was ruined before it even started.

Daisy’s expression wasn’t very good.

“…Yes.”

The unexpected agreement came. Soon, the two took a bewildered step for their own reasons.

‘I heard that noble children have separate children to play with, am I like that now?’

Grace was a little offended. However, after she rode the rides three times, she completely forgot about it.

“Leon, I want to ride that one this time.”

“Okay.”

Leon stood in front of the carousel’s ticket booth without a word of complaint. He asked her to play with him. Nonetheless, in the end, it was he who played with her. Taking a merry-go-round, he was willing to ride a ride with the child.

Besides, he helped Grace ride the horse as kindly as a real prince. She felt like a princess.

While Leon secretly fiddled with her right hand, which he had held, he climbed onto the horse next to her. The merry-go-round began to spin as light music played. Grace, who would normally look outside and wave her hand, could not take her eyes off the other side this time.

Leon was also looking at her the whole time. He smiled shyly, then asked.

“Why? Do I look pretty?”

“Yes.”

The boy smiled softly at Grace’s serious answer.

“But, do you have a real horse at home?”

He nodded his head.

“Then, this won’t be fun.”

“Ah… It’s not…”

For some reason, he was perplexed. He couldn’t figure out why he started to gibber and talked about why the merry-go-round was more fun than riding a real horse.

“There’s a roof here, so I don’t have to worry about heatstroke….”

“Right. Right.”

It was absurd to even when he thought of it. Still, Daisy took his nonsense seriously. Actually, it was Leon who thought the merry-go-round was boring. Regardless, why did his heart pound like when he rode a roller coaster?

Then, there was the haunted house.

“Kyaak! Don’t let go! Don’t let go! You can’t let me go!”

Leon smiled secretly as he embraced the girl who kept clinging to her. He was glad it was dark.

“Hoo, that was scary…”

When she came out of the haunted house, Daisy’s face was wet with tears.

“Sorry. Then, as an apology…”

Before Leon could finish his words, Daisy’s hand pointed somewhere. At the end of it was a large dolphin doll hanging from a shooting game booth.

The two went to the booth. Five shots at a time. To get the doll, they had to score a hundred points. Leon paid the man who was guarding the booth and checked the scores of the targets on the opposite wall.

‘The highest is 25 points, followed by 15 points.’

As he thought so, Leon picked up the gun in front of him. It was an old rifle that was only licensed for entertainment. After checking that the barrel was not bent, he put his eye to the scale and checked that the line of sight was straight.

“Do you know how to shoot something like this? Do you want to be taught first?”

Ignoring Daisy in front of him, Leon pulled the trigger instead of answering.
Chapter 46.
Bang.

The 25-point target fell.

“Damn it…”

As it continued, the man’s swearing grew longer. At some point, the whimpering heard from Leon’s side had turned into an exclamation.

“Wow, that’s really cool.”

Leon never thought the shooting skills he had honed so far would shine here.

“This will come in handy someday when you find a girl you like.”
He suddenly remembered what his father had said while teaching him how to shoot. It was not about hunting women, and it was not about killing rivals to claim possession. Perhaps, his father meant this when he said it would be helpful?

In the end, with 125 points, he even won a doll and a voucher for the candy stand.

“Here.”

Leon took the dolphin doll from the grumbling owner and placed it in Daisy’s arms.

“How amazing! Neither my brother nor Jimmy ever made it.”

When the girl looked up at him and admired him, he felt like a god.

At the candy stand, Daisy chose a candy apple. Then, she held out a stick with an apple dipped in red sugar syrup.

“You eat, too.”

“I don’t really like sweets…”

“Ah…”

When Daisy brought the apple back to her mouth, Leon couldn’t finish what he was saying. With a bright red candy apple in her mouth, the girl raised her round eyes and gazed up at him.

Enchanted by that appearance, Leon lowered his head.

Crunch.

He bit off the other side of the candy apple. The taste of fresh apple and sweet sugar entwined his tongue.

Did kisses taste like this?

Their eyes met with an apple the size of a fist between them. It was the first time Grace knew that light in the sky could be as hot as fireworks. Meanwhile, Leon was embarrassed and wanted to take off his lips, but he couldn’t. His lips had stuck to the sticky syrup and didn’t come off.

…Perhaps, it was a very deceptive excuse.

As he tilted his head, the gently closed eyelids lifted gently before he gazed at Grace again.

Leon reached out his hand to her cheek, who forgot to eat the apple and just stared blankly at him. The moment the silky soft skin touched her, Grace’s heart sank. She felt like she was about to pass out when all he did was take the hair off her cheek.

‘It feels like we’re kissing.’

The two shared the same idea and shared an apple with a face redder than the apple.

From then on, they held hands and walked with the excuse of losing each other because there were a lot of people. As they walked, they escaped the crowded carnival and entered a quiet shopping district, but the two did not let go of their hands.

Both of them snooped around a jewelry store that they wouldn’t normally go into. The girl’s eyes did not fall from the glass bead bracelet containing the refreshing sea light.

“I think it will suit you well.”

Daisy shook her hand as Leon pulled out his wallet.

“No. No.”

“Why? If you don’t like it, something else…”

“My mother told me not to dress pretty.”

Leon was bewildered.

Where in the world would a mother tell her daughter not to dress up pretty? As if it was not just an excuse, Daisy really looked plain without a necklace or hair bow. He thought it was because she was poor, but it was because she shouldn’t dress up?

“Why?”

“I don’t know. But my mother is really, really pretty.”

“You are really pretty, too. You have the sea in your eyes.”

Again, Grace’s heart thumped.

“There is a sea… in my eyes?”

The pretty boy spoke beautifully. The sea she saw for the first time in her life was so beautiful. However, the more beautiful scenery is in her eyes.

She kept wanting to smile like an idiot.

“Me… Pretty?”

Muttered the girl, raising her collar to hide her red face. Leon picked up the straw hat from the wall and put it on Daisy’s head, laughing.

“Then, we can do it with this.”

He didn’t want to part. Leon didn’t let go of Daisy’s hand all day, even though he knew it was polite to send her to her accommodation before it was too late.

‘I’m going to get scolded when I go back to the villa.’

…Even as he thought, his eyes did not leave Daisy’s red lips.

After watching the sunset on the beach, they had dinner at a seafood restaurant. As the children who entered puberty in the time of adulthood wandered around without a guardian, curious gazes followed them. However, the two children’s eyes did not see the eyes of others.

Jazz bars opened one by one, and jazz melodies mixed with the sound of the waves. The two walked along the blackened sea and returned to the carnival.

The carnival, which was about to close, was quiet.

One by one, the rides stopped, turning off the loud lights and music. The time for the two to part was also approaching. Leon, not wanting to part, led Daisy to the Ferris wheel, which was still lit.

“Today is over. Come back tomorrow.”

After paying five times the price of the ticket, the staff politely opened the door of the Ferris wheel like a servant vagina a carriage door.

The Ferris wheel carrying only the two of them slowly began to turn.

“Wow…”

As the stark contrast of light and darkness unfolded beneath her feet, Grace marveled. Brilliantly lit shopping streets and dark beaches were separated along the coastal road.

While looking at the black sea dotted with a ray of moonlight and the lights of cruise ships, for some reason, the Ferris wheel that reached the top stopped. Even if it wasn’t, the faded jazz music started to be inaudible because of the sound of the sea breeze.

As the windowless Ferris wheel swayed in the wind, she was terrified.

Taking her eyes off the night view, Grace hugged Leon’s arm even tighter and looked up at him.

‘What’s wrong?’

Leon was staring at Grace.

Come to think of it, he had been like this for several hours. When he glanced at the sunset, he only stared at her face. Even at the restaurant, he didn’t touch the delicious lobster dish and kept looking at Grace.

For some reason, as nervous as when looking down, Grace unknowingly bit her lower lip.

“Daisy, you’re bleeding.”

“Oh…”

She bit her thin lips too hard.

“Ah, a handkerchief…”

Leon, who was rummaging through his pockets, looked puzzled. The strawberry-dyed handkerchief was already discarded during the day. He should have bought a new one.

“Wait.”

Daisy stuck out her tongue to lick her lower lip, but Leon grabbed the tip of her chin. As he ducked his head down the slanted brim of the straw hat, the tip of their noses hit.

The moment he tilted his head slightly, her lips parted.

It was something he had done before he even thought about whether it was okay or not. He could use an excuse that he was just doing what the nanny used to do as a child when he cut his hand. Of course, there was no excuse for doing this, even though he knew it was on the lips.

All day he wondered what her lips would feel like. Like Daisy, who wondered what his hair would feel like.

It was soft and warm. Leon gently pressed her soft flesh with his lips and carefully licked the bleeding wound with the tip of his tongue.

Daisy’s body shook.

He had done countless bad things that would get him scolded when caught, but his heart never beat as it did now. As he licked her wounds, their lips parted slightly, and the girl whispered in surprise.

“This is a kiss. My first kiss…”

Leon, who had expected Daisy to feel the same way, was quite taken aback.

“So you hate that…?”

“…Like it.”

Candid words escaped from between her lips in a shy smile. Leon liked her untainted honesty.

“Shall I… do it again?”

As soon as Daisy nodded, the smiling lips joined again.

It was not wrong to say that a kiss feels like flying.

The kiss secretly shared with the world at their feet in a Ferris wheel suspended high in the sky was thrilling. When a strong wind blew, Leon pressed Daisy’s face closer with one hand to the straw hat that was about to be blown away by the wind.

The Ferris wheel swayed in the wind again.

Fearing she might fall, Daisy hugged Leon’s arm even tighter. Their lips pressed more closer, and her body became hot—the refreshing scent of candy apple, the sticky texture of toffee, the mild taste of a milkshake, and blood oozed from her lips that tasted like a carnival.

Blood was sweet.

Leon thought while being immersed in a barrage of senses that stupefied his mind. He might start to like sweets from today.

Daisy’s villa was on a remote mountain.

It was good that he came out with a bike with an oil lamp. Leon climbed the dark mountain path, lit only by dim lamplight, holding Daisy in one hand and a bicycle in the other.

“It’s quite far from my villa here.”

Leon muttered with a sigh as he climbed the steep slope. By the side of the mountain road, he could hear the rough waves lapping against the coastal cliffs pretty close.

“Did you walk every day?”

Daisy nodded her head.

‘I should have talked to you earlier…’

The moment when both regret and sorry came together, Leon realized that he hadn’t asked a really important question yet.
Chapter 47.
“Daisy, when are you going home?”

“That is…”

Grace answered honestly, wishing that her parents’ mission would never end.

“I don’t know.”

“I don’t know?”

“Yes. You?”

“I’m going to stay one more month.”

‘I don’t want you nor I to go home forever…’

An unbelievable thought lifted its head.

Leon was not a child. No matter how slowly the world was changing, love between nobles and commoners was still taboo. He knew it couldn’t be more than a dangerous game of fire during a vacation.

Still, the strange place made him a different person. He disobeyed his parents for the first time in his life and escaped. His first kiss was sweet.

Deviation always seemed so sweet.

“Would you like to meet again tomorrow?”

“Okay.”

Daisy’s pale expression brightened in an instant.

“Then…”

Leon, who was about to come to pick her up in the morning, felt troubled. If he returned, he would probably be grounded.

“Would you like to play at my villa tomorrow?”

“Is that okay?”

“Instead, it’s a headache if the adults find out, so let’s hide in my room and play.”

“Okay.”

What could they do in the room? Leon asked thoughtfully.

“Do you like movies? There’s a projector in my room, would you like to watch a movie together?”

Daisy rolled her eyes and nodded her head. She liked movies. That was a relief.

“Then, let’s meet at ten o’clock at the entrance to the villa beach.”

Daisy paused while Leon was making a route in his head on how to hide Daisy and bring her into the villa.

“You know, Leon…”
“Yes?”

“I’m actually Daisy…”

The moment Daisy was hesitant to say something, intense headlights flashed in front of the two of them. As the window of the black sedan stopped on a narrow mountain road, the man in the driver’s seat shouted.

“Kids, get out of the way.”

It was a voice he knew. The face that came out the window was also familiar. His eyes widened as if the other person recognized him.

“Leon?”

“Father?”

…Mother?

The moment her eyes met the blonde beauty sitting in the passenger seat, Grace’s face turned pale blue.

It was clear that her mother recognized Grace, too. The smile that she had given to the man in the driver’s seat disappeared in an instant.

When her eyes touched the blonde man whose eyes resembled Leon, it felt like blood was draining from her body. It was clear that the man, the soldier the adults were talking about, was a soldier named Winston.

‘…Is that person Leon’s father?’

The old villa had thin walls, so he could hear the adults’ conversations. Dirty monarchy pigs, the mad dog of the royal family, and the devil who brutally murdered the heroes of the Revolutionary Army… The grown-ups called the man Winston that way.

‘I’m going to get scolded now.’

Her brain became white. Playing with a boy until late at night was not a bad thing. However, if the boy were the enemy’s son, and if she had done a bunch of bad things she shouldn’t have done with the enemy, she would be severely punished.

She was out of breath. To Grace, her parents were just as terrifying as they were respectful. She might have been slapped like her brother by her father, who had been caught.

“It’s okay, Daisy.”

As Leon was trying to hide Daisy, who had begun to shake behind his back…

“Di, dirty pig!”

…Daisy shouted out loud and shook his hand away. Leon stared blankly at the girl’s back as she ran away into the darkness.

‘What did she just say to me now?’

He wanted to believe that he had heard it wrong though from the contemptuous eyes he had seen last, it was clear what she had said to him.

‘What did I do wrong?’

It felt like a blow to his head.

The next moment, his father shouted at him, who was staring into the darkness, and he couldn’t bear to look away, confused by the girl’s inner thoughts.

“Leon, go back to the villa now. Meeting me here is a secret to your mother.”

It was then that Leon realized that there was a strange woman with a hand covering her face sitting next to his father.

“Daisy!”

After waiting for the car to leave, he belatedly searched the mountain trail for Daisy, but the girl was nowhere to be found.

‘Why? What did I do…?’

It was a shout that woke Leon, who returned with his mind dazed while repeating only the questions with no one to answer.

“Are you crazy for breaking important promises and shooting your way all day? You already made it hard for me from the inside of the stomach now you’re trying to kill me, too.”

It wasn’t scary to shout loudly while wearing her pajamas and having a bunch of rolls on her head.

“Leon! Won’t you come right now? Where the hell did you learn that?”

Leon didn’t answer, went into his room, and slammed the door shut. His body leaned against the door and slipped. He crouched on the floor and kept asking the same questions as before.

“What did I do wrong?”

Dirty pig… No matter how much he thought about it, he didn’t do anything wrong to hear such a terrible thing. If she didn’t like kissing, she should have refused then. To have fun all day, only to treat him like a beast at the end.

…He really liked her, but the other person made fun of him.

Leon threw what was in his hand across the room. The thrown dolphin doll smiled without knowing his feelings.

He felt pathetic for picking up the doll that the child had thrown away and bringing it all the way here.

“Haa…”

He hadn’t cried since his hair grew thick, but he wanted to cry. It was unbelievably pathetic.


That night, Leon had a dream.

Warm breath. Soft feel. Sweet…

Bloody smell.

And…

‘Dirty piglet!’

He opened his eyes. Underneath was as wet as his face.

“Damn it.”


“Your father is still uncontactable. The rich are very much the same.”

Leon stood up with his mother nagging behind him. The leftover breakfast on the table was left untouched.

“Leon, you are banned from going out for a week. Even now, if you reflect on it and ask for forgiveness, it might be shortened to three days.”

As expected, a curfew was issued. Leon didn’t ask. Breaking the rules set by his parents was difficult the first time, but the second time was easy.

He stood at the beach where they were supposed to meet thirty minutes before the appointed time. Although he instinctively knew that Daisy was not coming, he couldn’t stop his foolish wait… She still didn’t come.

When the hand on his watch showed 11 o’clock, Leon started walking along the beach towards Daisy’s cottage.

‘…What did I do wrong?’

He had to ask. It was because she was the only one who knew the answer.

He was going to apologize if he did something really wrong, and if he didn’t, he would get an apology from her. It was naive to believe that he could.

Even though he searched all over the shabby villa and campsites in the lush, underdeveloped mountains, this time, the girl was nowhere to be found.

There was only someone else.

Leon, who was tumbling down the sparsely populated hillside, abruptly stopped. A broken headlight fell in the thick forest.

‘Is there a car accident?’

Leon went into the woods and walked along the trail of the wheels. Was it going to rain soon? A strong wind blew from the cloudy sky.

This fishy smell carried by the salty sea breeze was definitely…

‘…Blood?’

Upon realizing it, he found a black car abandoned in front of a secluded cliff.

It was a familiar sedan.

Ominous forebodings were always overstated. Leon looked into the broken window. There was only blood all over the body, lying in a bizarre posture in the back seat.

“…Father?”

The dead did not answer.


Every time the train shook, the skinny body hanging from the railing shook without strength. Adults smoked on the balcony of the last carriage. Grace, caught in the gap, stared at the distant horizon where the sun was slowly rising.

The sea was no longer visible. She didn’t want to see the sea anymore.

“You have the sea in your eyes.”

She hated her eyes.

“Dirty pig!”

He was not dirty…

The moment she cried out in fear of being scolded, the face she saw did not leave her eyes. She hated herself for shouting things like that. Perhaps because of that, she hated her cowardly self, who thought she was fortunate not to be scolded by her mother.

“Daisy!”

…No. That was not her name.

Grace covered her ears as she heard the hallucinations. She heard a voice calling her outside last night. Even after Leon’s voice disappeared, she turned off the lights all night, held her breath, and cried in the blanket.

She heard strange noises all night through the thin walls.

The suppressed screams, the angry voices of adults, and the sound of hitting something over and over again. When the sound stopped abruptly, Grace was forced to leave Abbington Beach as she hurriedly packed her bags and ran away.

“Damn it…. I didn’t mean to.”

“Dave, don’t blame yourself.”

Her father comforted the man standing next to him.

No one comforted the girl who felt guilty without doing anything.
Chapter 48.
‘The boy’s father died?’

Grace was confused. What should she do? What should she feel? No action, no emotion, was right in this situation.

While holding on to the balcony railing until her hands hurt, the conversation between adults continued.

“By the way, didn’t his son say he saw Angie?”

When uncle Dave asked her mother, Grace was taken aback. Had her mother told the other adults that she had played with the boy? Was she getting scolded now?

“I should have dealt with that guy as well…”

When she thought she might get scolded, her nervous heart sank this time.

‘…Leon is nice. Don’t kill him, uncle.’

However, the words did not come off the tip of her tongue. Her mother glanced down at Grace, who was looking up at the adults with frightened eyes, then shook her head at uncle Dave.

“He couldn’t see my face. Besides, he’s still a kid.”

Second-class passengers didn’t get suspected of killing people.

Returning to the rented sleeper, where her father sighed as it was over budget, Grace lay upstairs, staring blankly at the ceiling. Her mother, who shared the same compartment, suddenly reached her hand up.

“If you don’t have an appetite, eat this at least.”

Saying so, in her hand was a box of expensive chocolates.

She saw her mother buy it on the way past the dining car a moment ago though Grace didn’t know her mother was going to give it to her. When she came to Abbington Beach, she was excited about the train journey and waited only for the time to go to the dining car, but today she skipped breakfast.

Grace took the box of chocolates, stared at them, then stood up.

“Mo, mother.”

“What’s wrong?”

“When I grow up…”

“Yes.”

“Do I have to kill that boy with my own hands?”

Grace was still confused. She didn’t understand the situation at all. She didn’t even know what emotions she was supposed to feel.

However, one thing was clear.

…I don’t want to kill him.

“Grace… .”

Her mother called her name instead of answering her and got herself up to the bed. It was the first time Grace had ever seen a person who had always been omnipotent, like a god, look like she was about to cry.

“Come here.”

Besides, it was her first time hugging her. It was awkward. Lying next to her mother in the same bed, Grace held her breath.

She smelled of perfume, which she had always faintly smelled.

‘My mother’s smell…’

Soon, it felt cozy rather than awkward. Her mother, who was hard on Grace, even embraced her and gave her chocolate… Birthdays and Christmas weren’t as happy as it is now.

Aren’t you going to sleep?

Her mother muttered as she patted Grace on the back affectionately.

“I should have sent her to the orphanage…”

Her world collapsed.

She knew that when a person was in extreme shock, they didn’t even cry. Sometimes at night, when her parents were arguing, she pulled the covers over herself in the room next to her and heard her mother cry out.

“That’s why I said to send her to an orphanage!”

She still didn’t know it was about her… No, perhaps she tried to deny it. Little Grace subconsciously felt that neither her father nor her mother loved me. Nonetheless, from that day on, she could no longer deny that she was a being who could be abandoned at any time.

As soon as she returned home, she caught a bad summer cold.

“I will kill him… Don’t throw me away…”

Her parents left home right away for another mission. Her brother was the only person who stayed by Grace, who babbled nonsense while suffering from a high fever.

“What happened there? Huh? Grace, tell me.”

Her brother asked in frustration, but Grace kept her mouth shut.

‘They say I’m hesitant to kill the enemy and want to throw me away because I’m a lousy revolutionary army.’

If she said such a thing, even her brother might abandon her as well. The magazine Jimmy gave her to help her get better wasn’t helpful at all.

[ Major Richard Winston’s funeral held amid national mourning ]

Tragedy in the Winston family. The execution of key rebel figures coincided with the funeral. The eldest son of Major Winston, who follows in the footsteps of his father, who died an honorable death, carried on the fight to wipe out rebels.

Flipping through the text that made her head spin, she threw down the magazine. As the magazine fell to the floor and opened, Grace screamed. In the black-and-white photo that took up a page, the boy was staring straight at Grace.

‘…You tricked me. You killed my father. I liked you, how could you do this to me?’

“No. It’s not my fault. Don’t look at me like that!”

That boy’s father deserved to die… He must be a bad boy, too. All the dirty monarchy pigs are the same.
If she didn’t believe that the boy was bad, she had to believe that her parents were bad instead.

To Grace, her parents were gods. Hell was the only place for souls abandoned by God to go.

“We promise to make everyone’s life equal and prosperous… for the sake of the cause… for the sake of the cause… That utopia feeds on the blood of the revolutionary army and grows and bears fruit…fruit…”

The teachings of the village elders greatly helped Grace deceive herself.
They had lived as a devoted revolutionary army in line with the cause they speak of. Her mother, who wanted to abandon her, couldn’t help but be proud of her. And, to hide past mistakes of falling in love with an enemy…

It was a secret she hadn’t told anyone until she was ordered to infiltrate Winston.

“A new maid?”

“Yes. Nice to meet you, Captain. My name is Sally Bristol. I was assigned to the annex this time.”

The boy she met again as an adult was a very different person.

“Now we have one more person, I can turn the torture chamber into a sea of ??blood to my heart’s content.”

…A bloodthirsty demon.

She no longer had to fool herself. It was easy to hate the boy who had become a bad person, just like the words she had memorized, like a mantra.

The boy, like the girl, had risen from hatred.

“Everyone will….going to die…”

The day he fell in love for the first time and the day he lost his heart, he lost his father, who was the only one on his side, terribly. It was a tragedy that even an adult could not handle thuogh now, in a house without his side, no one was interested in the shock the boy received.

“Since you are the eldest son, you will follow in your father’s footsteps…”

“You have to take revenge on behalf of your father…”

The boy, like the girl, suffered from guilt that was not supposed to be his part. Perhaps, he could have prevented his father’s death. At that time, he should have stopped his father and gone home with him…

That woman in the passenger seat was a rebel. After learning the woman’s identity, Leon developed a habit of observing blonde women closely.

‘If caught, I will kill you. I’ll have you pay the same for what you did to father.’

Eventually, he came to hate all blonde women. And that hatred soon spread to all women.

…All women were beasts. They were cunning snakes and greedy sows.

“You looked like a prince just a moment ago.”

 

“Dirty pig!”

Whispering sweet words to seduce men, and when the men were no longer useful, they suddenly change and pour out cruel words.

His mother was no less abominable.

“My husband lost his life while being loyal to the royal family. Still, the price is only a posthumous promotion to lieutenant colonel… How bitter he must be in heaven, how pitiful Leon, who lost his father at a young age and became the head of the household, huhuu…”

Even his father’s death was only a means to obtain a title for his mother.

She pretended to love and respect his father in front of others. After asking for favors here and there, she finally failed to obtain a title and sobbed in front of the nobles and military officials gathered at the funeral.

The tears she had at his father’s death were not a tear shed in sorrow… they were tears of mourning for her, who had been reduced to the titleless ‘Widowed Lady Winston.’

‘…Did my father die for this?’

As he stabbed the awl, red liquid spurted out and soaked his hand. He was strangely not disgusted.

Leon took a deep breath.

It felt like the sharp smell of his blood filled his lungs and penetrated his brain. Strangely, when he smelled his blood, the anxiety that had plagued him all day disappeared. The more this happened, the more his father’s cruel last look, which did not disappear even if he closed his eyes or opened his eyes, became more and more dull.

Soon, birds and rats began to be found dead every day in miserable conditions in Winston’s residence, Mrs. Winston sent her eldest son to the military academy several years early.

It was fortunate that he attended the military academy where cruelty was a virtue. Despite committing countless things that would have made him feel expelled at a normal school, Leon graduated at the top of his class.

The “Vampire of Camden,” a notoriety reserved for serial killers, was an honor for a military officer.

People said he was a born soldier, but Leon knew it… He knew he was a monster. Not only that but people didn’t know this either…

The fact that Captain Winston, who seemed to have nothing to fear, suffered from nightmares.

“Dirty pig!”

The devil that appeared in each of his nightmares gleamed with blue contempt and smelled of blood.
Chapter 49.

Leon did not take his eyes off the frozen turquoise eyes.

“I wondered why Daisy called me a pig. I’m not even fat.”

He uttered that while laughing, but ‘Daisy’ didn’t.

“But, I only remembered it when I heard you call me that yesterday that the rebels call the royalists that way.”



“Dirty monarchy pig.”

Turquoise eyes, brown hair, and a bold temper… He believed that this rare combination could not have happened by chance in different people. So, there was only one conclusion.

Sally Bristol was Daisy.

He thought she was hiding the fact that she was Daisy because she had a story she couldn’t tell. However, he thought that the story had to do with Leon’s father’s death.

‘…How foolish I was.’

She was obviously in front of him, and he acted like a blind man…

Perhaps, deep down in his heart, he had some lingering feelings for his first love and refused to connect it with the terrible crime. As he grabbed the hair of the fox that had twice blinded him, the woman groaned as her neck snapped back and was forced to face him directly.

“You played with me that day, knowing your mother would kill my father. You are so vicious that even the devil would be speechless.”

“No.”

When the woman denied it, Leon tightened his grip on her head even more.

“All the cute things you said must have been lies. From then on, you would have been a whore who would kiss anyone for the Duke.”

The first love was a lie.

He could have seen and prevented his father’s death. Still, he was completely unaware and was fooled by a young girl and missed the opportunity. And because of that, Leon became even more resentful of himself.

“Was it your mission to spy out the villa? You sensed something suspicious in me, so you pretended to have a personal interest in me, and you distracted me!”

“I didn’t know you were a Winston… I didn’t even know they were trying to kill your father.”

“Don’t expect to let me be fooled again. I now know that you are a bloodless, tearless killer.”

Deep in Grace’s subconscious, there was still a sense of debt towards Leon from childhood. He unknowingly stimulated it very effectively.

“They didn’t mean to kill him in the first place! It was an accident!”

In the end, that feeling of debt caused Grace to make a slip of the tongue.

“Ha… You know quite a bit about it, to know even the smallest details. Then, how can you say you don’t know!”

Saying so, the hand that had been gripping her hair caught her chin and forced her mouth open. At the same time, the holster from Winston’s waist untied, and the loaded pistol lodged in Grace’s mouth.

“Were you there too when my father died?”

“No. No.”

“Did you try to kill me, too?”

“I had no intention of killing you. But now, I have changed my mind.”

Winston burst into laughter.

“That sounds honest.”

“At that time, I didn’t lie about anything other than my name.”

Did he know that she tried to reveal that to him honestly at the end?

“You’d like to believe it though I’m not responsible for your father’s death.”

“Then, who is responsible? Don’t fool me by saying that a woman who weighs less than 50 kg did it alone.”

“Please… Don’t do this, huh—”

Moderately intimidated by Winston. By the time she thought the frightened performance was enough, Grace began to recite the names one by one. It was because he would never believe her even if she told him right away.

“Jonathan, Riddle.”

When she called her father’s name, Winston pressed her tongue with the muzzle, saying, “Are you kidding me about calling the name of a dead bastard?”

“Pa, Patrick Pullman.”

Only then did he insert the pistol back and pull out a notebook from the inside pocket of his jacket.

He didn’t seem to know that Patrick Pullman was also dead, as he was taking down the name seriously. Perhaps when he found out, Grace would not be in this person’s hands anymore. She only hoped so.

Winston stopped his hand and glared at her as if he wanted her to give more names. Grace deliberately whimpered and shook her head.

“Including my mother, there are three of them.”

In fact, there was one more person left alive, but she was no renegade like Fred.

“You, who have been silent all this time, are also an accomplice.”

Winston glared at her with resentful eyes, further aggravating her guilt.

“I was a child back then, and now we are enemies.”

Grace caught her body that had been shaking.

It was a war… War always comes with sacrifice. They killed others countless times and were not sorry, so why should she be sorry?

“What do you want to hear from me? Would you like an apology?”

“Apology…?”

Winston sneered.

“I don’t need anything like that. I hope you weren’t expecting a tearful and heartbreaking reunion.”

His grip gripped Grace’s neck again. She had no choice but to stand up obediently from the force of the lift.

“I was thinking of breaking Daisy’s neck if I ever saw her again. Though when I found out that Daisy was you, I didn’t want to kill you gracefully.”

“Kuht…”

“I just want to see you suffer for a long, very long time.”

Winston threw Grace out of the blue. Grace, who was staggering, leaned herself on the table.

I won’t kill you gracefully.

His creepy words didn’t surprise her at all. From the moment she was caught, she was destined to be that way anyway. It was a luxury to die gracefully if not rescued.

‘It’s fine no matter how you bully me, so please get me out of here…’

While Grace was breathing impatiently, Winston moved a chair in front of her and sat down. A file folder was placed on top.

It was the paperwork Campbell had filled out this morning.

“Hmm…”

The enraged man from earlier was nowhere to be found. Winston, who was flipping through the papers page by page with a frighteningly calm attitude, muttered incoherently:

“There’s a physical examination procedure remaining.”

Tak.

He ordered, closing the folder and throwing it on the table.

“Take it off.”

A master of torture that destroyed not only the body but also the mind. Winston, who knew how to humiliate the proud Grace, chose not to do so himself but to let her undress herself.

Not wanting to show any signs of shame already, she stood upright with her head held high and proudly took off her clothes. As she took off the cardigan, Winston smiled while crossing his arms. His gaze rested on Grace’s breasts, to be precise, on the nipples protruding from under the sheer fabric.

“Ah!”

The tip of the riding whip in Winston’s hand pricked her nipple.

“This is just a physical examination. What did you expect? Or do you have the quirk of getting excited about taking off your clothes in front of your enemy? Either way, it’s downright obscene.”

‘…This is swelling because you bothered me so much yesterday.’

She couldn’t bear to say such a thing. He was obviously driving her to be a prostitute, knowing Winston as well. This was a ploy to make her speak about what happened to her the day before, unable to withstand the humiliation. Then, in the end, to suffer even more contempt.

Grace gritted her teeth and endured it. She didn’t want to give the monster satisfaction by reacting in any way.

And it was like that. When there was no reaction, the whip that had been mercilessly crushing the flesh withdrew.

“Continue.”

Winston returned to his calm demeanor.

As Grace took off her clothes one by one, he rested his chin and watched expressionlessly. Even when she took off her bra and exposed her chest, he didn’t rush like yesterday. Even after stripping off the stockings and bloomers and becoming completely naked, he did not react.

“Blanchard’s prostitute. I was expecting it because of the rumors… You’re not even great.”

Were those words sincere? The man’s eyes, looking at her body, contained no emotion, let alone lust.

…It was better if it was sincere.

It was not like yesterday to take it off, just to attack her. It was just an act to humiliate. That was why he was just looking at her with eyes, like looking at a piece of meat.

Grace tried hard to believe that.

If that was the intention, Winston had already succeeded admirably.

The tip of her red, swollen chest quivered visibly. It would be clearly visible even in the eyes of that person. Grace crossed her neatly gathered legs to hide her secret place and carefully covered her chest with her arms. Still, she couldn’t hide all the traces of last night.

Apparently, yesterday’s dirty ‘deal’ was made by the two of them.

The man in front of her now sat in the form of an impeccably virtuous human being. While a woman standing bare like a beast with clear traces of a love affair—together

He, who was not really a human last night, was dressed in an officer’s uniform with all buttons neatly buttoned up and had cold eyes as though he was staring at uncivilized livestock.

The shame that followed along with the dirty deal was only on her side.

Chapter 50.
As she chewed her trembling lips to hold back her emotions, the ridiculing silence was broken.

“Get up.”

Winston pointed to the iron table with his eyes. As he sat down at the end of the table, he stood up and approached her. The tip of the whip lightly stabbed Grace in the shoulder as he told her to lie down.

The table was cold.

Winston grabbed her crouched limb. The shackles hanging from the legs of the table were fastened one by one at the ends.

“You look good in this.”

The black ceiling that didn’t show even when blood splattered…

The man gazed down at her with an observer’s gaze with little interest, anticipation, and a far-reaching sense of distance. As she looked up from the cold metal table with her limbs wide open, she was acutely aware of her situation.

Mice on the dissection table.

In his eyes, staring down at her, who had turned into a helpless little creature, a cruel joy began to shine faintly. The officer’s jacket was draped over the chair. Grace’s eyes trembled as she watched the approaching man with his sleeves rolled up neatly.

That man, not a soldier in a white shirt, looked like a mad scientist in a white coat. He was the kind of lunatic who would take a scalpel and forceps and turn her into a piece of meat.

As he approached, he paused.

A cold gaze lingered on the box of fine stockings on the edge of the table. Soon, the box was removed and in its place was a folder with Grace’s name on it. There was the sound of papers being flipped, followed by the sound of footsteps moving away.

While Winston was leisurely preparing for the ‘physical examination,’ Grace began to shake uncontrollably. She closed her arms and legs, even though she knew it was useless. At the same time, the shackles painfully crushed her delicate flesh.

Griiit.

Her breath stopped when she heard the sound of heavy metal scraping something.

‘Could that be….’

If it sounded like the nipper being pulled out of a drawer, please let that be a mistake…

Grace prayed to herself, knowing all too well that what was in this torture chamber was torture itself.

‘Damn it…’

An ominous foreboding hit. The nipper’s blade flashed in Winston’s hand as he slowly walked this way.
He sneered as she reflexively closed her fingers to hide them.

“You acted like you weren’t afraid of anything though you’re a normal human being, too.”

Yes, unfortunately.

Grace was also a human being who felt pain.

She had been trained to endure torture, but that only taught her ‘how to endure it.’ In other words, she was training to hold on without divulging important information, but it did not dull the pain of having her nails pulled out. Or maybe, the pain of having a tooth pulled out.

Grace bit her teeth as the sharp tip of the nippers traced her lips.

Eventually, as the cold blade soon fell off her lips, Winston cupped her head affectionately and bowed his head. Slowly tracing the curves of her naked body with nippers, he kept their eyes on each other from a distance of less than a hand’s length.

“You and I have a pretty tough relationship. No, should I say Blanchard is the terrible one?”

“Huht…”

“He sent his prostitute to kill my father and sent me the daughter of that prostitute.”

This was to make fun of his father’s death and to look down on him. Leon couldn’t stand it. Neither did Grace, who could not stand the ridicule directed at her respected mother.

“If my mother is a prostitute, then your father is a bad soldier who died at the hands of a prostitute.”

‘Cheeky woman. She doesn’t even know her situation.’

As he thought so, Leon twisted his lips. This woman would be begging for mercy on him soon, too, like the other rebels.

“Oh, what a touching love. Your mother in hell must be so proud of you, the daughter who failed an operation and turned into a whore in my torture chamber.”

Bang.

The nipper, prowling over her, landed between her spread legs. As the table rang, Grace shuddered. She could tell without looking that the nipper’s blade was directed towards her secret place.

“Thank you, Miss Riddle. To be caught by me. Thanks to you, I can enjoy the feeling of getting revenge properly. I can see my father’s face in heaven.”

He solemnly kissed her pale, cold lips and rose.

“Do you know what your parents did to my father?”



“If you don’t know, I will teach you.”

This time, instead of the nippers, the tip of the riding whip ran through her body. Each time the triangular leather lightly tapped the tip of her fingernails, Grace turned blue.

“They pluck out all the nails…”:

She got it now. Why did he tie her to the table, what was he going to do with her tied up…

‘The autopsy of Richard Winston.’

To tie up the revolutionary army like a corpse on an autopsy table and read his father’s autopsy report, pointing out each body part. After reading the report to the end, the contents were demonstrated on the prisoner’s body as it was. Stopping right before the direct sign… No, sometimes it was torture that never stopped.

It was also the reason why Leon Winston became the most notorious of the many torture engineers.

‘You’re going to do that to me. I don’t want to die.’

All those who were lucky enough to survive the torture went mad…

As Grace trembled hard, she was more afraid now than yesterday when this man tried to violate her.

“And, the left side of his scrotum… Wait, you don’t have a scrotum. I’d never seen anything like this before. Hmm… what to do.”

He spoke in a very pleasant voice.

“Ahhk!”

When Winston thrust the tip of his whip between Grace’s legs, the flat leather cut through the closed slit and rubbed the clitoris mercilessly. The moment she met his eyes, which flashed with vulgar joy, Grace saw a way to live.

She rather aroused him.

“Ah, please, huht, stop…”

She groaned and deliberately twisted her body. Her heart, which couldn’t let go of last night’s events, shook greatly.

Winston’s eyes slowly began to change.

‘Yes, right, get aroused for me.’

“Ahk, is this revenge? At least your father wouldn’t have been raped like I was yesterday?”

“What do you mean raped? it was a deal Oh, this is rape.”

Winston finally got into heat.

He quickly unfastened his belt and pulled out his blood-filled cock. As soon as the flesh, rising the tip like its owner, appeared, it slammed into Grace’s mouth.

“Ugh, huhp…”

Her body was mercilessly dragged upward. At the same time, her head that was thrown over the table bent back, and a merciless viper burrowed into her wide open throat.

“Uhp—”

The heavy table creaked following the waist’s fierce movement.

“Haa…”

With a moan of admiration, Winston caressed the nape of her neck where his flesh was moving in and out. Even though she couldn’t see it, Grace could vividly feel that the thick fleshy cock bulged up her throat every time it was driven deep.

As if he had no human soul, his pale eyes blazed with lustful joy like last night.

Grace looked into the beast’s eyes and shed tears of relief. It was a miserable thing to rejoice at being violated. Still, she was a human being who wanted to avoid terrible pain and death even by doing miserable things.

“Do you know what the definition of a prostitute is?”

…A woman who sold herself for a price. If selling herself to save her life is a prostitute, yes, she’d rather be a living prostitute than a dead saint.

“Kuhk…”

Winston pulled out his saliva-soaked flesh as Grace gasped and twisted her body.

“Haa, let’s continue the physical examination.”

Since then, the brutal autopsy had been transformed into an obscene physical examination. Grace responded calmly to Winston’s promiscuous touch, occasionally adding light resistance and strange moans to keep his desires alive.

“Ahht, it hurts… don’t do, it…”

“These are my bite marks yesterday. Even I thought I was like an animal, too.”

He still acted like a scientist dissecting mice. Fortunately, he was not a mad scientist but a nymphomaniac. He touched her body here and there to ‘examine’ her and recorded the shameful observations in a document as if writing an experiment report.

“Hmm… Can I write it as the feeling of kneading a marshmallow? What do you think about it?”

Winston, who was clutching her chest and kneading it like dough, asked with a mean laugh. It was terrifying to have something like the feel of her chest be written permanently on a record that anyone in the military could see.



However, Grace didn’t open her mouth. If she begged him not to, he would write more humiliating words on the paper.

“The feeling of it sticking to you and the feeling when sucked…”

Saying so, he took one long suck on her nipple as if to hear it, making a loud noise.

“Huht…”

“Great. That skinny girl grew up pretty naughty. I like that.”

…It was terrible. To think that the sweet boy of her childhood had grown into such a vicious man.

His hand that was on her chest groped down her flat belly before burying it deep in the wet petals.

“Uht, gasp, stop, ahhk!”

“Feels good? I know you like it very much though can you let go of my finger?”

Squelch.

The moment his finger was pulled out…

“Ah!”

Clang.

The chains hanging from her ankles slammed against the table.

Chapter 51.
“Haa, haa…”

Leon opened his hands at the woman’s climaxing walls, oblivious to her shame. Red bumps were exposed as he peeled away at her wet, pink flesh.

Blood rushed, and her swollen clitoris beat like a heart. Beneath it, when he opened the hole, red and swollen from last night’s events, he could clearly see the vagina soaked in lewd water and twitching and convulsing.

Last night that flesh clamped on him. As he recalled that moment, his mind was about to become cloudy again.

“Miss Riddle, you look very experienced.”

Grace bit her lip at his taunt.

Less than a day has passed since she suffered her first experience. Winston asked, holding up the black fountain pen, reminding her of the countless bad things he had done in that short amount of time.

“So, who was the first man?”



“For a thorough investigation.”

As she glared at him instead of an answer, the tip of the whip struck Grace’s clitoris.

“Hahk! Le, Leon Winston…”

Faced with a smile imbued with vulgar satisfaction, Grace could not hold back her anger and spat out.

“…A bastard named Leon Winston.”

Winston wrinkled his brow and twitched his lips.

“Blanchard’s prostitute is willing to eat bastards. Disgusting.”

‘Enjoying copulation with bastards,’ he wrote on the paperwork and glanced down at the trembling Grace and smiled.

“Miss Riddle, shall I bring another military bastard? I’ll let you choose the one you like.”

“I’m good with everything except for the bastard in front of me.”

“Oh dear, what should I do?”

Saying that, he gave a little sneer and thrust his fingers inside her.

“Ahh!”

The fingers that came out after poking around once were soaked in slippery love liquid.

“It was pretty urgent, so the only bastard I prepared is the bastard between your legs right now.”

The nippers between her legs disappeared, and the shackles on her wrists were released. Grace got up. And before she could see, she was grabbed by the waist and slithered to the other side of the table where Winston was propped up.

The still-bound legs were bent upwards and wide open. As soon as the buttocks hung over the edge of the table, the flesh that had risen between the man’s legs broke through the vagina.

“Aahht!”

As the thick piece of flesh pierced her whole inside at once, Grace twisted her back and struggled.

“Ha-uhk! Too, deep!”

“I didn’t even put all of it in, you’re exaggerating.”

It was already difficult to accept him without the healing scars from last night.

As she pulled her hips back, his large hands squeezed and pulled at her pelvis. A scuffle broke out between the woman who had to hold her heels on the edge of the table to avoid being dragged away, and the man who had to shove himself all the way into her body.

“Ah-heuk, stop! It hurts!”

Bang. Rattle. Crash.

The table and chains wept noisily along Grace.

“Ugh…”

This was a fight she lost from the start.

In the end, Winston’s lower abdomen pressed against the gaping hole. Grace reflexively pushed him away as he pressed his body. Winston kissed her quivering fingertips, then untied the shackles from the table legs and tied Grace’s wrists around her ankles.

Creak.

The heavy table started shaking. Under the black ceiling, the man’s disgustingly dignified face also shook violently.

“Ah, heuk…huht, slowly…”

“You’re not in a position to order me, are you?”

Winston’s hands clasped the inside of her legs, which were folded up so tightly that his knees rested on her shoulders. Every time the fragile flesh revealed between them was hit strongly, a sensation bordering between pain or pleasure welled up to the tip of her head.

“Ah, aht…”

“Looks like you’ve already gotten used to my body. The response is faster than yesterday.”

Even though she wanted to refute it, Grace couldn’t. It was because the evidence of her whole body responding willingly to him was laid out in front of her.

The cock, which had been buried in the stomach, protruded out. As the flesh holding the manhood caught on the glans and came out, she could clearly see her own flesh biting into the beast’s flesh. The bronzed skin was already wet with love liquid and glistening.

The clitoris pulsated with anticipation of intense stimulation when he plunged into it. She couldn’t deny the evidence that she was also in heat.

‘This is better than torture… This is better.’

Grace repeated the chant and closed her eyes.

“Haa…”

Leon looked down at the woman with tears between her closed eyelids, and he sighed.

…Daisy. Sally. Grace.

What should he call her?

He didn’t know what to call her, but he knew what this woman was.

‘You…’

Leon quietly repeated the same words in his mouth, only caressing her body with his hand.

It was a skinny body though the traces of constant training were clearly visible. Leon, whose muscles were well attached and smooth, ran his hand over her smooth stomach and held a hand full of the softly swaying flesh following his rhythm.

The immaculate flesh remaining on his large hands protruded convexly between his fingers and out of his grip.

Although it was softly crushed when he applied strength to his hand, the elasticity that pushed his hand was amazing. He also liked the feeling of the soft skin clinging to his palms, wet with sweat. It was a softness he had never felt before.

The flesh sticking out between the fingers was a ripe red color instead of yesterday’s pure pink color. It was quite a pleasure to corrupt the chaste virgin into a seductive prostitute.

He lazily rolled the nipples, which had been distinctly hardened even before the woman took off her clothes, and asked.

“Is this because I sucked on it so much that it doesn’t come back into shape?”

“Ah-huu…”

The hurt woman grimaced and groaned. It was too raunchy to be lying under him naked. Even after being so unconsciously coy, this woman would insist that she was the poor victim.

“Oh, sorry. I have to use it cleanly. So when Jimmy receives it, it won’t look like someone else used it already.”

At those words, the woman opened her eyes, which had been tightly closed. He had to only put her fiancé up on his lips, and she would glare at him shamelessly as if the unscrupulous one was him.

“Are you kidding me? No man in the world would have been this easy. To fall for your seduction twice, like an idiot.”

It was clear that the leaders of the Blanchard rebels had sent this woman after some reasonable calculation. The calculation was that if she won his heart once, it wouldn’t be difficult twice.

And, this woman succeeded with impractical ease.

Still, it was all his delusion.

“I never tried to seduce you. You came on your own. Thanks to you, do you know how difficult it was for me to receive such a dirty order? Didn’t you see that I was deliberately trying to get fired?”

A short sigh escaped from Leon’s twisted mouth while the woman’s revelation continued. In the end, even his dismissal, which he thought was my own decision, was played by this woman’s trick.

“Make it clear what is right and wrong. Why are you saying it’s my fault when you’ve been in heat by yourself and followed me around like a dog?”

Yes, it must have been his fault from the start.

The first time and this time, it was her who was dazzling in front of him and attracted his attention. But it was Leon, whether in Abbington Beach or here, who pursued the woman who had no intention of coming to him.

Yes, like a bastard. Disgracefully.

“Do you want me to do it once and then stop?”

When Winston stopped moving, he asked. It was a trap. When her intuition told her so, Grace shut him up.

“Yesterday it was a deal, and today it was rape, but now how about a confrontation? That’s fair.”

Was it fair to bind all of her hands and feet and pierce his flesh to her?

“Whoever comes first loses. If I lose, I’ll let you go. But if you lose…”

His fingertips moved into the heavy object as if it was about to tear her and drew at the trembling secret place.

“You will have to be prepared.”

Like preparing for a confrontation, Winston untied his black tie, which was still neatly tied. Grace answered before he even heard it.

Let me go. Let me go. Let me go…

The same words lingered in Grace’s mind over and over again.

“I’d be willing if you let me go forever.”

As Winston took off his shirt, he stopped his hand and narrowed his eyes.

“Negotiating… You still don’t know where you are.”

“If you feel like losing, you can refuse.”

With Grace’s provocation, he smiled and nodded.

“Yes, as you please.”

Grace closed her eyes with determination. It was a fight with nothing to lose. After all, his interest wouldn’t have been intended to end it once from the beginning. Meanwhile, Winston cupped his lips on hers like players cross their hands for a handshake before a match.

After the hateful polite kiss, her body began to shake.
Chapter 52.
The next target of the living prostitute was to be a free prostitute.

Grace gently tightened and loosened her inner flesh in accordance with his rhythm of moving inside. This time, she read Winston’s expression without closing her eyes.

“Uht…”

She, soon getting the hang of it, squeezed her walls as the penis slipped out. The foreskin held by her puckered inner flesh pulled up and rubbed the tip roughly where the sensory points were concentrated.

“Haa, your lower mouth’s teasing technique is different from yesterday.”

Winston uttered in a voice as if it was astounding to use her energy to do something she thought she would never win. Then, he soon mocked Grace like a twisted human being.

“Yes, that’s how you do it. You’re good. I taught you that method of sucking with your mouth yesterday. You have good application skills.”

As their hot skin touched without a gap, he hugged the sweaty, slippery body as if he would crush it before continuing to thrust violently. His penis was pulled out, scratching at the inner wall just before it got stuck in the tip of the vagina.

It may not be a lie to say that she was good at it. Grace’s efforts seemed to be working, and his movements became erratic, just like it was before he climaxed last night.

It meant that his body, conquered by pleasure, was getting out of his control.

His lips, too, seemed to be out of control as he continued to gobble up her lips and greedily poke his tongue into her wet mouth.

“Oh, it feels so good. You are doing very well.”

Make the most out of it. I am the one who will win this confrontation.

The moment she was in anticipation of gaining her freedom soon, Grace even shook her hips as he moved wildly.

All of a sudden, Winston’s long fingers dug between the pubic bone where they met.

“Ahk, stop! This is against the rules!”

“The rules should have been set beforehand.”

Because her hands were tied, Grace couldn’t move his hands away from rolling furiously on her clitoris. Even though she shook her lower body and tried to avoid his hand, even that was useless as Winston’s body covered her.
It was a really cunning move. Even if it wasn’t, the clitoris, which had been swollen like it was bursting with blood due to the repeated friction, started twitching in an instant.

“Huht, no…”

Grace clenched my fists and gritted her teeth until her nails dug into her hands to suppress the feeling of climax incoming, but to no avail.

Sparks flashed in front of her eyes every time the hard piece of flesh slammed into her skin, which had become more taut from the force. As if he had already figured out all of her body, Winston persistently hit only one part.

Slam.

“Ha-ugh!”

He pressed her down and brutally stamped her waist down again.

“Do, don’t…”

A pleasant defeat for that devil, a devastating victory for her.

The bottom that had been teasing had long since escaped Grace’s control. She didn’t have the time to stimulate him, so she let go of the strength underneath. Still, the inner wall contracted arbitrarily without the owner’s order.

“Don’t. Ahk, don—”

“What’s wrong? Just cum.”

“Huk! No, Hahk!”

In the end, the moment the piece of flesh that had been rubbing against the inner wall was slammed into place, she couldn’t overcome the feeling that rose to the tip of her chin. Grace came in vain, her whole body trembling on the table, wet with her own sweat.

Where were the delightful defeat and the devastating victory…

In the end, all she got was a sense of excruciating pleasure.

“You came already? You lost too easily.”

“Huhk…”

“Did you really want to be fucked by me that much? It seems that because you’re a lady, you can’t just ask me to pierce your bottom? Hmm, I was indifferent.”

The hot flesh licked away the tears that flowed down the corners of her eyes.

“But, wouldn’t it have saved your face if you pretended to be trying to win?”

The lips that whispered cunningly in her ear fell away, and at the same time, the genitals were pulled out from the gap in the still twitching flesh. As soon as the red-hot lump of flesh placed its head on the dent in her lower abdomen, the gap opened and Grae was covered in a thick, white turbid liquid.

“Haa…”

The man’s deeply wrinkled brow straightened. However, the deep heat in his eyes did not cool down.

After that, nothing different from what happened in bed last night. He just did her again and again endlessly.

“Ahk, no more… .”

“cum. cum as much as you want to get fucked.”

After that, he offered a few more confrontations. How many times had she had to respond to the pressure and lose mercilessly forcefully?

Grace didn’t even have the energy left to tell him to stop. Winston’s eyes turned cold when he glanced down at the woman who had completely lost her will to fight. It was the exact opposite of the bottom, where the heat seldom cooled down.

“You must have thought you could hold me tight and control me, when you can’t even control your body?”

The focus returned to the blurry blue-green eyes. Grace’s pupils shook as they met the cold, light sky-colored eyes.

…He saw through everything.

That person saw right through from the start that she had secretly seduced him to avoid torture.

“You’ll have to pay the price for being arrogant.”

It had already been paid.

Grace replied with her eyes and then turned her head away.

“Do you know how many people have died or ruined their prosperous future at the hands of that woman called your mother? If you lined it up, it would be enough to start from here to the entrance of the mansion. In other words, the line of people eager to do this to you is that long.”

‘Throw me to them. Get me out of here and throw me somewhere infested with them, whether it’s Western Command or a camp. Please get me out of here…’

The scenery in front of her eyes changed several times—the pitch-black ceiling, the table glistening with sweat, the wall with all sorts of ropes, shackles, and leashes.

“Haa… Get down.”

The table was shaken again by the force of the movement.

Grace stared at the hand, squeezing her wrist in her shaky vision. The hands on the wristwatch were past dinnertime. Mrs. Winston probably thought her son was busy with the rebels and missed dinner.

‘That wasn’t wrong.’

The table, which had been cold, had long since become hot. Winston pressed her body as it kept slipping on the metal top smeared with semen and love liquid.

Both her legs dangled weakly at the end of the table and swayed. Every time that happened, the chains drooping from the shackles that snaked around her ankles twisted around her body and scratched the floor.

Rattle, rattle. Squelch, squelch.

The sound of dry metal and the sound of wet flesh didn’t match at all. Amidst the cacophony, Grace stared blankly at the hand holding her wrist.

Both her body and mind were completely wrecked.

Even after all the shackles had long since come off, she couldn’t move. It was hard for her to breathe, spread out on the table in the same position that Winston had left after finishing for the last time.

Her blank eyes were fixed on the doorless bathroom.

Standing in front of the mirror above the sink, the man was adjusting the shape of his tie. Soon, he walked out of the bathroom smelling of soap. The man wearing the jacket he had hung up on the chair narrowed his eyes.

A milky liquid ran through her legs, which were still trembling, and dripped onto the black floor. Grace wanted to pull her legs together in shame, but her thighs wouldn’t work.

Step, step.

Hearing footsteps approaching, she struggled to look away from him and met his eyes with hers. The neatly dressed man in an officer’s uniform gazed down at the woman, who was still panting from the forced climax, with impassive eyes.

To those who didn’t know, the woman looked like she did it herself.

‘He must have reported to command. I’ll be escorted somewhere soon. Then, I will be rescued so I just need to hold on for a few more days…’

She chanted the words like a mantra she had been repeating while he was taking a shower.

“Meals three times a day. If there is a menu you want, feel free to tell the orderly. Cleaning was originally your job, so do it yourself. You should give the laundry to the orderly when you receive your meal.”

Grace’s eyes trembled.

‘Why is he telling me that? Why is he making rules that are unnecessary for someone who will only be locked up for a day or two!’

Even though she judged with her eyes, Winston continued to recite the ‘torture room rules’ in a businesslike manner.

“Interrogation and training once or twice a day unless there is something special. I will do it myself.”

“…Training?”

When she asked, straining her voice, he raised a corner of his mouth.

“Your body is a top-class prostitute though your skills are terrible. I must have a lot to teach you since your commander-in-chief didn’t teach you anything.”

“Now, wait…”

As she difficulty got up, Winston turned his back and headed to the other side of the table.

</>Riip.

The cheap stockings hanging from the chair were mercilessly torn.

“Please wear the stockings I bought you.”

“Winston, wait. Don’t go. Talk—”

“I’ve told you, you are not in a position to command me.”

It was the same as last night. Grace couldn’t help but look at his back with eyes full of despair. Yesterday and today… what did she expect from a man who tirelessly gave hope and was not afraid to take it away?

“But please…”

Bang.

The door closed.

Click.

Then, the sound of locking followed.

“Let me go.”

The masked beast of Captain Leon Winston, the owner of an elegant and noble family and a capable military officer, had left while imprisoning a woman who was proof that he also had a savage lust.
Chapter 53.
When the office door burst open, Campbell jumped up from the couch where he had been sitting on his butt for hours and saluted.

“Go home.”

The Captain strode inside and instructed him. There was another long fingernail mark on his hand holding the yellow file folder.

Campbell glanced away and approached his superior.

“Captain.”

“What?”

The reason Campbell waited for him without leaving work was because there was an issue that hadn’t been decided yet.

That was, Grace Riddle’s future.

This hadn’t even been reported to the superiors yet. If the report were delayed, the superiors would be displeased, so he thought it would be safer to decide what to do today.

“What of Grace Riddle…”

“Grace Riddle?”

He hesitated for a moment, not knowing why Winston asked again while narrowing his eyes. The captain lit Grace Riddle’s files with a lighter and threw them into the fireplace.

“Who is that?”



“Oh, by the way, Sally Bristol left the mansion this morning.”

Campbell quickly nodded his head. This meant that Grace Riddle’s arrest would be kept a secret known only to the staff of this annex.

“Then, I will inform the soldiers in charge as well.”

He was stopped by the Captain as he was about to leave, saying that he should close his mouth so that this information would not leak out of the annex, whether it was to the superiors or the Winston family.

“One more. The torture chamber’s closed since a ghost started appearing.”

At those words, Campbell nodded his head as he walked out. Leon muttered as he looked down at the ashes in the fireplace.

“A female ghost who responds to the name Daisy.”

Daisy, Sally, and Grace. There were so many names, what to call her.

Daisy. It was a cute name that did not suit a girl with dark skin and a bold temper.

Sally. This name, too, was inappropriately cute for its cleverness and guts.

Grace…

This name was even more inappropriate. A grace… She was a disastrous grace that came upon his perfect life.

‘Whatever your name is…’

Even though he didn’t know what to call her, it was clear what she was.

‘You are mine now.’

 


 
[ Dear James Blanchard Jr.,

I had a very satisfying time with the personal maid prostitute you sent me.

Have you ever seen Miss Riddle naked?

I’m guessing you have never seen it. If it had been, you wouldn’t have sent her to me. I’m thrilled that you sent such a great item. Besides, I didn’t expect you to value me so highly to send your fiancée for me. In particular, I prepared for her solitary confinement.

For the sake of your poor fiancée, who is still expected to give birth to an heir to the Blanchard family, the ‘Royal Family of the Revolutionary Army,’ with a body stained by my cum, I’d like you to pay a visit. You’d better hurry, because if it’s too late, you might end up getting my baby first.

Western Command Intelligence, Domestic Intelligence Division
Captain Leon Winston. ]

 

“Damn it…”

The letter was badly crumpled, and someone put a hand on Jimmy’s shoulder as he rested his forehead.

“Jimmy…”

Among those who comforted him, the faces of several elders who opposed Grace’s extraction stood out. Seeing them exchange dark glances, Jimmy closed his eyes in disillusionment.

“You tried to make the dog eat the dog…”

“The dog you sent to eat has been eaten.”

When he opened his eyes and glared at the two elders, they cleared their throats and shut their mouths.

“What should I do with Grace… that poor thing…God look after that child.”

When the female elder sitting next to him clicked her tongue and made a cross, the gray-haired man replied sullenly.

“Still, her life was saved. I guess he’ll keep it alive for a while, so I’m lucky. I feel sorry for Wilkins.”

The man glanced at the only empty seat at the round table with bitter eyes before taking out a cigarette and asking. Fred’s father, Dave, was not present preparing for the funeral.

Jimmy glared at the elder smoking a cigarette.

He felt sorry for Fred.

No one knew how he was discovered just before the extraction. Fred said he had talked about Winston before Nancy could ask what heinous things Winston had done to him though he kept quiet about how he was discovered. And suddenly, he disappeared from Winsford’s house and was found dead in a ditch the next day.

So, only Grace would know the answer.

Nonetheless, Jimmy knew. Probably all the elders gathered here know intuitively that it wasn’t Grace’s fault.

“Let’s start with the operation.”

Having regained his composure with difficulty, he began planning a rescue operation for Grace.

“I gave orders to Peter to keep an eye on the Winstons’ movement, and a rescue team was dispatched to the Winsford side in advance, and during the escort…”

“But, there’s a chance the Winsford safe house will be discovered.”

“No, I don’t think so. There are no suspicious movements or trends yet, even Nancy says there was no tail or surveillance.”

“The rescue team found a new safe house…”

It was when Jimmy was about to continue discussing the rescue operation.

“Anyway, Grace knows too much so I’m worried.”

Everyone was silent at the elder’s words. Everyone gathered here was destined to be shot the moment Grace opened her mouth. While exchanging unspoken meanings through their glances, the eldest elder smiled bitterly at Jimmy and brought up difficult words.

“Then, an honorable death…”

Jimmy’s eyes shook at the thought of ordering her suicide. Immediately, a heated discussion ensued across the table.

“Still, she hasn’t even played her part yet.”

“You’re right. She’s a card, and it would be a shame to burn it like this.”

“However, isn’t that card now in the hands of the military? It would be like giving them our location.”

“If they know the value of the card, it could be used for propaganda against us…”

“That’s not right. If they find out, they will get rid of her.”

There was a moment of silence as if everyone agreed with that statement.

“Anyway, I think it’s reasonable to give Grace a chance to die in peace.”

The executives who had reached an agreement began to stare at Jimmy though he wasn’t ready to answer.

“Jimmy.”

Grate.

There was the sound of a chair being pulled, and one of the elders who had opposed Grace’s extraction came up to him and put his thick hand on Jimmy’s shoulder.

“There are many women. I hope you don’t have any personal attachments.”

“To be honest, Angie was alive at the time so I kept quiet, but from the moment you got engaged to a woman of dirty blood, I wanted to object.”

An elder who could not be unaware of Jimmy’s discomfort added.

“I may sound cruel now, but you are our commander-in-chief. You have to think of everyone and the cause first, not your personal feelings.”

“Yes, is there anyone here who hasn’t sacrificed someone they love?”

It was not wrong.

“Think about what your father would have done.”

At those words, the air in the conference room grew heavier and heavier. Jimmy let out a long sigh and reluctantly opened his mouth.

“There is no way to deliver the order. Starting a new infiltration is too risky, and there is no guarantee that Grace will be given a newspaper there…”

“You have Peter.”

“Peter can’t get inside Winston’s fence…”

“I mean, I believe Grace sent me a list of what was supplied to the torture chamber. Hide the order inside and send it to Peter’s side.”



There was no room for more objection. Jimmy nodded his head eagerly and closed his eyes.

 


 
April, when the sky was capricious, was over before anyone knew it, and sunny days continued.

It meant the beginning of a season that Leon, who had a keen sense of smell, didn’t like very much. Even so, after entering the garden, the delicate scent of lilacs kept wafting around his nose and bothering him.

On the way to the greenhouse, he suddenly stopped in front of lilacs in full bloom. As he reached for it, he ignored the curious glance from his mother, who was walking beside him, with her arms crossed.

Flap, flap.

A brown bird sitting on a branch of light purple flowers and drinking nectar flapped its wings in surprise. As the bird broke off the branch on which it was sitting, his mother whispered, glancing out of the corner of her eye at the walking guests.

“It’s not dignified to give to the Grand Lady.”

Instead of replying, Leon only lightly twisted his lips.

The Grand Lady…

This was a gift to that woman.

It might not be a bad idea for him to pick May’s flowers for that woman who did not know the date or season. He was very curious about what kind of face she would make when she knew that the lilacs were in bloom.

Taking the flower branch in his hand, he took his steps again. As he started walking through the lilac garden and up the straight-lined gray tree path, his mother smiled as she patted the silk handkerchief tucked in his chest.

“It looks good.”

She was talking about him wearing a suit instead of an officer’s uniform, as she hated military uniforms. She rummaged through his closet a few days before the appointment with the Grand Lady and prepared a suit.

It was a little funny when she pleaded with him and told him to take off the uniform, knowing he was going to come in his officer’s uniform.

So, he ended up wearing a suit that was far from the old-fashioned things his mother had picked out, but his mother seemed to be fine with it.

“If you receive the title, quit the military.”

Leon couldn’t believe it, to think that a smart son could come out of such a woman. The Grand Duke was discussing an engagement with a military official because his family needed it. However, to quit the military… did she know what she was saying?

“You did a good job closing the torture chamber.”

Leon stared down at his mother, who smiled approvingly. It was unknown to her that her son was hiding a woman under the ground somewhere in the mansion.
Chapter 54.
“I hope you haven’t forgotten who the real owner of this family is.”

“Yes, Captain. I will keep quiet.”

 

The head maid, Mrs. Belmore, was faithfully following his instructions.

It was inevitable to reveal to Mrs. Belmore that an anonymous woman was imprisoned in the basement of the annex. If meals went into the torture chamber that was said to be closed and women’s clothes are mixed in the laundry, it was only a matter of time before rumors spread.

“Then, why do you still have soldiers in the annex?”

Elizabeth thought that the hideous soldiers would disappear from the mansion as well. However, it was unexpected that the soldiers were not only guarding the annex while Leon almost lived there and did his work there.

“It’s something related to the military, so you’d better not be curious about it.”

As her son gave a knife-like answer, Elizabeth had a sharp look.

“It’s my mansion’s business, but it’s not my business.”

“Winston is my business.”

I am the head of the house, so don’t interfere.

Elisabeth, whose pride was hurt, lowered her voice and asked, knowing that there was a guest.

“Well. If you had always been wise, I would have trusted you and entrusted you with everything in the family as before.”

She alluded to the only mistake her son, who was always wise, had made. Rumors had been circulating for some time that Captain Leon Winston had a housemaid as his mistress. From Leon’s mouth, who couldn’t have known that, the words Elizabeth wanted to hear came out.

“That woman, you will never see her again. Not just mother, no one.”

“I trust you.”

Elizabeth was reluctant to follow up, so she didn’t ask.

“It should suit Rosalyn’s taste, by all means.”

The Grand Lady, who was seated across the gorgeous tea table, smiled softly at Elizabeth’s kind words.

“It’s an etiquette for ladies to refuse dessert, but I can’t possibly refuse this cake.”

Elizabeth smiled happily. She liked Rosalyn’s manner of speaking, which was noble and modest, yet with a good sense of wit.

“I was worried that it might have been prepared according to my old-fashioned taste, but I’m glad.”

“What do you mean old fashioned? I’m rather happy. I have heard that Madam has a good eye.”

It was very true that it was so lame… Her taste, this conversation.

Watching his mother and the Grand Lady exchange pretentious compliments. Leon tilted his teacup as he thought so.

“The Winsford Herald this time, too…”

The Grand Duke, who was listening to the behind-the-scenes story of a recent investigative report by one of Jerome’s media outlets, had the face of someone who wanted to leave immediately.

It was Leon, not his mother, who called Jerome to this meeting. He had a strong premonition that the Grand Duke would bring out some annoying works, so he called Jerome to distract him. However, the conversation began to flow in the direction the Grand Duke wanted.

“Dr. Winston.”

The official title for Jerome, who held a doctorate in the humanities, was doctor.

“The analysis article you published the other day in your business magazine was quite helpful.”

“It’s an honor, Your Excellency. By the way, which article are you talking about?”

“The development of Bria’s diamond mine.”

It was obvious that he was trying to get to his point by forcibly changing the topic.

Leon sneered from behind the teacup.

Bria Diamond Mine. The mine, which had just begun development overseas, was rumored to contain the most prominent diamond deposit ever.

As the government of the Republic of Bria, suffering from financial difficulties, recently announced that they would hold open bidding for the mining rights, the largest-ever competition was also scheduled.

The Grand Duke was thinking of entering the bidding competition.

No matter what the Grand Duke did, Leon had no business, but asking him to invest was an annoyance.

The Winston family already owned a diamond mine, albeit on a smaller scale than the Bria mine. Even if it was themost significantt scale ever expected, Leon had no intention of making duplicate investments in the same kind of luxury goods.

While he had some spare money, he had already decided to invest in the aviation industry and New World real estate, which would one day replace a large share of the shipping industry.

Nevertheless, Grand Duke Aldrich repeatedly asked for a joint venture to develop the Bria mine.

 

“Baron Chapman has also agreed to join us. You know what I mean.”

 

Yes, it meant that the royal family would suck up the sweet water from the Winston family and throw it away.

The Baron was the King’s maternal uncle. In other words, the baron only lent his name and the actual investor was the King.

If the Royal Family directly participates in the open bidding for mines in the Republic of Bria, words will come out in many ways. With a history of collapse due to the people’s revolution, and with only a few decades since the monarchy was restored, the unstable royal family was quite concerned about public opinion.

So, the royal family was investing overseas by mobilizing distant relatives, including the Grand Duke and the Baron, and they asked the Winston family to join them… An idiot who thought this chance was an honor might have bowed his head and held out his hand.

Still, Leon was no idiot.

The royal finances were not very good. The Grand Duchy had many assets, but it also had many debts. The Winston family’s asset stability was far superior.

‘…It means that only the Winston family’s money will be invested like water to win the bid, and the return on investment will be shared between the Royal Family and the Grand Duchy.’

It was clear that his mother, who only wanted to accept the title, would ask him to participate regardless. However, the Grand Duke did not bring up the joint venture with his mother, as if he had no intention of discussing business with a woman.

“Captain Winston, you can use the most precious diamond from there to give Rosalyn an engagement ring.”

The Grand Duke, who had been debating the investment value of the Bria mine with Jerome, eventually revealed his true feelings to Leon, who had been silent.

“It’s a shame, but it will take at least two to three years for the development of the Bria mine to begin.”

It was an excellent strategy to have Jerome in this position. Moreover, even his oblivious mother came to his aid this time.

“You cannot leave a beautiful girl unmarried for so long. Don’t worry, Your Excellency, I’m already looking out for an engagement ring for Rosalyn. Some time ago, in a mine owned by my family…”

While the other members of the Winston family took care of their annoying guests, Leon remembered the woman he had left tied up in the basement of the annex.

‘I wonder if she’s holding up well.’

What if she couldn’t hold out? Leon’s sneering gaze stopped at the tea table, which was lined with cakes ordered from a cafe near the mansion.

‘Come to think of it…’

He quietly raised his finger at the sudden thought.

The maid, who was standing at the door of the conservatory, approached quickly. He then gave the lilac he thought he was giving to the Grand Lady to the maid. Elizabeth, who had smiled as he plucked the lilacs, wondering if his son had a boyish naivete, frowned.

“Tell Mrs. Belmore to deliver it to the annex at 6:00 without omission.”

Besides, she didn’t like the fact that his son was planning to have dinner alone in the annex even today.

“Captain, there’s been an interesting rumor going around lately.”

The Grand Duke, who was looking back at the maid as she walked out of the conservatory carrying a branch of lilac, spoke to Leon. It was obvious that he brought up the topic with a meaningful smile after he gave the flowers to the maid.

“Rumors are covered with rumors.”

Leon put down the teacup and gave a relaxed smile. It was not the attitude of a person who was interrogated for his affair with a maid.

“I have dispelled the vicious rumors about me…”

Even the Grand Duke knew that this wedding talk was just a deal. It was just for pressure because he didn’t like the way he dealt with it. In any case, wouldn’t it be good if the dishonorable nonsense about his impotence was put to rest by having an affair with the maid?

“Don’t worry, you can talk to mother.”

Elizabeth did not hide her smile, showing that she was proud of her son. The scandal with the maid made her feel like she was standing on a tightrope. Nevertheless, it naturally passed as if he was acting deliberately to silence the gossip.

At times like these, it was to her liking that Leon was clever.

“Then…”

Looking for a chance to leave the place with the Grand Duke, Elizabeth folded a napkin and placed it on the table.

“As an old woman, I should get up at this point to let the young people spend time. Oh, come to think of it, there is a new painting I bought at the last auction in the royal capital, and I want to show it to you first.”

It was just an excuse to let the Grand Duke appreciate the painting in a noble way while the two were going to discuss the terms of the snobbish engagement.

“Grand Lady.”

When the Grand Duke disappeared, Jerome revealed his true nature to the Grand Lady.
Chapter 55.
“How do you view the investment value of the Bria Diamond Mine?”

Unlike most men who look at the body or face when meeting a woman for the first time, Jerome unconditionally tested her head first. It was more like a fight than a test, though. In general, the ending was for the woman to degenerate into a doll with an empty head in front of everyone.

Leon checked his watch, thinking it would be arrogant of Jerome to do it to the Grand Duke’s daughter, and even to the person who would become the next Madam of his family.

“I am not interested in investing in mining.”

“Ah, I see.”

She answered the mocking.

“There are other things I am interested in. I had something to say to the doctor today.”

“To…me?”

The Grand Lady came to this place because she was obviously betrothed. However, it was unexpected to Jerome that she had business with him rather than his brother, who was her fiancé.

“I read the Winsford Herald yesterday.”

“Ah, an honor…”

“They scathingly ridiculed Professor John Chadwick’s rocket engine theory as an absurd science fiction screenplay written by someone who had no knowledge of high school physics.”

“That’s…”

“Since Doctor is the editor-in-chief, do you have the same opinion?”



“On the contrary, I saw the reporter who wrote the article as an outsider with an inferiority complex eager to ridicule the pioneers of science to hide their lack of intelligence that they couldn’t understand even high school level physics.”

“Tate has a bachelor’s degree in physics…”

“Still, the article was written without understanding rocket science at all. Wasn’t it basic to research diligently and then write an article based on understanding? Even if it is for a report, it is a great disappointment that the editor-in-chief passed the article without confirmation.”

Jerome smiled awkwardly as he corrected the glasses that were slipping down his sweaty nose.

“Since there are many articles to check… I’ll instruct the reporter to re-cover and correct it.”

“It would be nice to have a correction and an apology posted on the front page.”

“…I will.”

While his gaze at the Grand Lady changed little by little, Leon remembered what had happened at this greenhouse about a year ago.

 

“What is your name?”

“My name is Sally Bristol, Doctor.”

 

She was the maid who came to say that Mrs. Winston would be a little late at tea time… that was his first impression of Sally Bristol.

‘Sally,’ his mother’s dedicated maid at the time, was only one of the many accessories of the mansion that had no reason to impress him. And, Jerome Winston was a nasty bastard who tried even the head of such accessories.

He didn’t remember what kind of pedantic thing Jerome said at that time. All he remembered was the maid’s answer, which was bright but strangely uncomfortable.

 

“Wow, I have a bad head so I don’t know what you are talking about, but they are so amazing. Did Doctor discover this? Ah… You just read it in a book. Reading books is fun, right? Haha. I also thought that Doctor found it by researching yourself since you said that.”

 

Leon burst into laughter a year later.

He realized now that the woman had mocked Jerome by pretending to be stupid. From then on, she had a wild side, unlike a maid, but at that time, he didn’t care about her, who was just a mere maid, so he ignored her.

“I wonder if the Winston family covers the damage if the research funding is cut off, even innocent readers naively believe in the article.”

“I will take responsibility for that, too. I didn’t know you were interested in that, by the way.”

“Because I have an astronomy degree.”

“Ah…”

“So, did you read that article yesterday, right? According to the reporter’s absurd claims, when the rocket leaves Earth’s atmosphere…”

The roles had changed.

He quietly observed the two of them and smiled. Today’s tea time was quite fun… Jerome Winston being verbally beaten by a woman. While he wanted to see the rare spectacle through to the end, he had more important things to do.

Leon, who was checking his watch repeatedly, proposed to Jerome.

“Doctor Winston, why don’t you give her a tour of your lab?”

That was how he left his fiancée to his younger brother and came out of the greenhouse.

While walking down the endless green road, Leon did something stupid. He looked back one by one to see if he had ever encountered ‘Sally,’ when she was his mother’s maid.

‘I’m moderately obsessed.’

His bizarre obsession only points itself at the woman.

The other women, even though they were still naked, looked like chunks of meat. Those who fell for the world of beauty were thought to be idiots. Aside from admiring his father, he thought it was a stupid mistake to be tricked by the prostitute.

However, he visited the prostitute’s daughter from time to time and rushed at her like a mad dog in heat. He had to admit that he was an idiot in this situation.

‘…No, I’m not like them.’

At least he wouldn’t lose his life or bet everything he had on her. That girl didn’t know that he feared her as much as she feared him.

Even though he was calm and indifferent to everything she did, he reacted violently to her every word and gesture. Leon thought she was conquered though he felt like he was going to be conquered, so he was going to keep her locked up forever.

So, she wouldn’t conquer him.

 


 
Rattle, druuck—Whiing.

“Haa, haa.”

The sound of rapid breathing was as regular as the sound of the ventilator. The room was so dark that she couldn’t even see her hands. Still, even if the lights were on, Grace wouldn’t have been able to see her hands since both her arms were tied behind her back.

Not stopping there, he hung her wrists from the ceiling with a rope to keep her back straight and her weight shifting towards her head.

Balanced with her feet on the floor and her arms tied to the ceiling, Grace muttered expletives.

“Son of a…”

There was no slack in the rope length that hung her arm. He had tied her up like this so she couldn’t straighten her back. All she could do was twist her numb body little by little because it felt like her arm would fall off no matter how she moved.

“Aht…”

That awful pervert… He did not forget to put a rope between her tightly tied legs. Moreover, he made a thick knot in the place where her clitoris was.

With each twist, her clitoris rubbed into the knot. When she raised her head in surprise at the sharp sensation, her arms were pulled and she had to moan again. In addition, as the stimulation continued, her legs were shaking, and it was getting harder to stand up.

Gradually, Grace calmed herself down and chewed on the moment just before this happened.

…Interrogation every day at 2 PM, and ‘training’ every night at 10 PM.

Winston, who was regular without even a minute’s error, came in today at 1:00 PM.

“Take off your clothes and stand by on time.”

So, there was no way he could not have followed the new rules he had set up only a few days ago. As soon as he entered, he stripped off all of Grace and tied her to the wall in an X shape.

“Who is your master?”

It was a question that she had heard tirelessly, but it was a question that did not come out smoothly even after answering countless times.

Grace gritted her teeth.

Before her eyes, the riding whip in Winston’s hand flexed flexibly. She glanced fearfully at his fingers, pressing the tip of the whip. The moment he let go of that, she would suffer from burning pain somewhere in her body.

“Leon Winston…”

She reluctantly replied just before Winston let go of his finger. She could only add as he tilted his head as if waiting for something.

“…Sir.”

“You understood well? Though why won’t my little mouse listen to her master…”

The tip of the whip brushed the nape of Grace’s neck, and she lowered her head and trembled.

“Do you think a revolution led by a small number of people is possible?”

Today, too. Winston started the interrogation and criticized the Revolutionary Army. It was a trick to shake the mind with speeches pretending to be logical and to make them doubt their comrades and the cause.

“How can a revolution without the support of the people be called a revolution, isn’t it a rebellion?”

Grace spoke in her head no matter what Winston said.

“The revolution that won the support of the people ended up failing.”

The tip of the whip, which had been going down the nape of her neck, passed her collarbone and made its way to her breastbone.

“Because of the heads of the corrupt and disorderly revolutionary government. You must have learned history at school, so you know it.”

Textbooks fabricated by monarchy pigs.

“Huht…”

Soon, the tip of the whip flicked her nipples.

“I’m giving valuable lessons, but you’re not listening well.”

“Ah-hht—!”

The piece of rugged leather pushed the nipple into the flesh and dug it out. As she struggled with the unbearable pain and pleasure, the heavy piece of flesh hanging from her shoulder swayed mercilessly.

As always, the way he looked at her changed. Then, the purpose of the interrogation would change in an instant.

‘Yes, go on a rut. Get the interrogation out of your head.’

However, today was different. Winston checked his wristwatch and let out a short sigh before continuing the interrogation.
Chapter 56.
“Haa…”

As the whip finally fell from the tip of her chest, the whip slid down Grace’s sweaty belly as she caught her breath.

“This is all for your comrades. Shouldn’t we get rid of the brainwashing as soon as possible and stop making useless sacrifices?”

He meant for her to reveal the location of the base.

“I don’t know.”

The whip that had been running down her belly flinched away in an instant.

“Ahk!”

The place where the tip of the whip landed back again was the open pink flesh. The pain spread like ripples in an instant.

A large hand grabbed her hair and forcibly lifted her bowed head.

“Did you forget your last name? Who is fooled by the fact that the leaders do not know their base?”

“Haaa, because of my parents’ duties, I moved from place to place. How do I know where the base is? Orders always came over the phone.”

“Did you get engaged to Little Jimmy over the phone?”

“It was an engagement arranged by the adults.”

Did the lie work? Winston let go of her hair and looked at his watch again. It seemed like he had a prior appointment.

“Then, I’ll make the blood flow through your head well, so look through your memories.”

After his words were done, he tied her up like this and went out and still hasn’t come back.

“fuck, ha-uhk, bastard.”

Grace’s arm went numb, and she twisted her body and then groaned again.

“He doesn’t know how to do it within limits, really…”

When Leon Winston showed the role of a brutal torture technician, she would rather see the dog in heat.

“Until.”

Beads of sweat dripped down her chin and onto the floor.

“Until when…”

She didn’t know how much time had passed.

Rattle, druuck—Whiing.

There were footsteps outside the door.

It wasn’t Winston’s footsteps.

‘…Isn’t the door locked?’

She was so confused that she couldn’t remember if she had heard the door lock when he left. Because of that, Grace began to panic when the stranger’s footsteps stopped right in front of the door.

It seemed that they wanted to come in.

Soon, she could hear the sound of a key getting inserted into the keyhole. Even though Winston must have locked the door, it didn’t help at all.

Clack.

She could clearly hear the sound of the lock vagina.

‘Gasp…’

Winston wasn’t the only one with the key, judging by the key in the soldiers’ hand that brought her meals.

‘No.’

Her buttocks were toward the door. So as soon as the door was opened, her secret place would be exposed.

‘No…!’

With a terrifying twist, the door opened.

damn it.

The sound of someone’s footsteps coming through the door was definitely not Winston’s.

“Get out! Don’t touch me!”

When Grace was just about to turn her head to check the man’s face, his large hands covered her eyes.

“Winston?”

Please, she’d rather it was that bastard. She’d rather be harassed by him than to be humiliated and even raped by another man.

Still, the man didn’t answer, tying something that felt like silk to Grace’s head and covering her eyes. He began to grope Grace’s trembling naked body, but her hands and feet were all tied, so there was no way to resist.

His hand movements were messy, with a lot of useless movements. It was not Winston who was precise without a miss.

Unfamiliar hands randomly opened and dug the exposed secret place. As if trying to find her clitoris, thick fingers opened up her flesh and pressed hard against the soft insides. If it were Winston, he would have found it at once without pressing the wrong place like this man.

“Wh-who are you? Stop it, do you think the Captain will let you go if he finds out?”

Did the threat work through? His hand went away.

…No, the threat didn’t work. It was because the next moment, Grace could hear the belt buckle unbuckle from behind her.

“Don’t do it! Please stop, aahk!”

As soon as the rope that ran between her legs tilted to the side, a piece of hot flesh stuck into her vagina at once.

“Ugh…”

She tried to stop the hot flesh from pushing into her slippery path, but it was no use.

The man squeezed her waist tightly and jammed his dirty object into her until his thighs were against her rear. Right away, the thrusting started. It was a hasty move as if he was doing something that should not be caught.

“I will kill you!”

As she screamed hoarsely, the man shoved something like a cloth into her mouth.

‘What kind of bastard would do this to me?’

The feel of the fabric touching her bare legs was different from Winston’s officer’s uniform. It felt a little lighter and smoother. How many people in this mansion could afford such fine fabric…?
While Grace tried to guess the identity of the man who was taking her against her will, he slipped through the ropes and grabbed her shaking chest with both hands.

Please, I know Winston would just be making fun of me.

However, the way he caressed her breasts and the rhythm that hit her stomach was all unfamiliar. When the man rolled the wet knot of rope to stimulate her clitoris, she felt disgusted.

‘Stop. Please stop…’

She may be a prostitute, but she did not want to become a toy for all the soldiers deployed in this annex.

‘Did he leave me tied up to fall into this situation?’

Grace poured out her resentment toward Winston, who was not here, with tears.

‘Could Winston instigate it…?’

She didn’t know if he might, seeing as the threat to just tell him the information didn’t work. If it was that devil, he did that enough.

‘Dirty… I feel disgusting and pathetic. I’ll kill that son of a bitch, and then I’ll die, too.’

“Huuk…”

The moment a sorrowful cry leaked out through the cloth covering her mouth, the violent movement stopped. Grace’s legs gave way to the abominable whispers that immediately flowed into her ears.

“Shh. Honey, it’s me.”

It was Winston.

“It’s fine. It’s fine.”

As he picked up Grace, who couldn’t stand on her own, he then untied the rope from the ceiling. Like a knight who saved the Princess, Winston even shamelessly took her in his arms and comforted her. Even so, the ropes tied to her body were not untied so the prominent parts stood out.

“Are you very surprised?”

The man was smiling. It was clear he had deliberately tricked her.

“It’s your master, calm down.”

True to her words, Grace, who was really relieved the moment she found out that it was Winston who had actually raped her, could not hold back the tears at the miserable situation.

“Huu…”

“Oh, you were very surprised.”

“Huff…”

She was able to cry as the cloth covering her mouth was suddenly pulled out. However, before she could properly let out a cry, a lump of wet flesh pushed into her mouth.

I will kill you. If I can’t kill you, I’ll cut off your tongue.

Even though she bit his tongue with her teeth, Winston moved his body slightly and forced her jaw open. Grace gasped and laughed as the disgusting flesh slipped away in an instant. While she was delighted, the taste of his blood spreading in her mouth was unpleasant.

He was sure to retaliate right away. She held her breath and waited for his next move, but Winston hugged her instead.

“Ugh…”

Her hard chest swelled with each breath she took. Her chest was compressed, and it hurt. When a hot breath brushed against her ear, Winston whispered excitedly.

“If you want to get back at me, you should have been more careful. This is still a failure.”

His hand squeezed Grace’s cheek hard as his thick tongue pushed into her mouth, so she couldn’t even try to bite him again.

Still a failure.

It wasn’t until his bloody kiss lasted long that Grace realized what he meant.

By giving blood, the beast was rather excited. The sharp taste that spread between the messy entangled flesh gradually faded, and only when saliva flowed down her chin because it couldn’t wet the corner of her mouth that his lips finally left her.

“Haa…”

“So…”

He licked her from her chin to the corners of her mouth like an animal with only instinct left. He then asked in a human voice that was filled with only cold reason.

“Did you remember where your fiancé is?”

Winston, who tied Grace to a chair, pulled away, and the gramophone was soon placed on the chest of drawers by the door turned on and a sweet saxophone melody played out. Her nerves didn’t loosen at all, even with the calming music.

‘What the hell is he going to do?’

These days, before she did anything to make a big noise, he played music. Grace didn’t know why he wanted to bury her voice since he never cared about the noise leaking out of the torture chamber.

“I’m tired of this now, too.”

Muttered Winston as he walked this way.

“I’ll bring something else tomorrow.”

He got tired of music, but he was not tired of this…? As she thought so, Grace glanced down at her body, strapped to the chair. Her hands were tied to the armrests, her legs wide open and tied to the leg of the chair.

It was the same as before, but the rope between her legs was loosened.

So, instead of being happy, she was even more anxious.

What is he trying to do here?

Across from Grace, who was sitting in a position where her open flesh could be seen clearly, Winston brought a chair and sat down. The distance was only half a step. He could do anything to her vagina if he stretched out his hand.

She hoped the interrogation was over. She hoped it was just to satisfy his perverted desires.

However, judging from the fact that he asked again about her hometown before tying her up, it was obvious that it was not that. Putting his elbows on his knees and resting his chin on the knuckles of his lightly clasped hands, Winston asked as he stared at Grace with a faint smile while leaning his body towards her.
Chapter 57.
“You didn’t miss me?”

A cold glance would have been enough for the answer.

“I was only thinking of myself.”

How to bully her, that was probably the only thought in his mind. To say something creepy like a lover and treat her kindly…

‘Maniac.’

Suddenly, his unusual attire attracted Grace’s attention.

Winston was dressed to the best in his light gray suit. Rather than being formal, the nose of the brown shoes, which seemed to follow the trend these days, blatantly scanned her calves. The tie that had just covered her eyes was navy.

Except for the disgusting medal, compared to the man who went to this place in an officer’s uniform of achromatic color, he was looking quite stylish.

“I guess you had a date?”

“Yes, I did. Though I couldn’t get you out of my head, so I stood her up and came to you.”

It was as if she could hear a hallucination asking, ‘Isn’t it an honor?’

“I feel sorry for the Grand Princess. The man she is to marry is a pervert who locks a woman in the basement of the house and takes her every day.”

Grace started stirring up his sex drive again.

‘…Please stop the interrogation and just hit me until you’re exhausted, and then go out.’

“Pervert…?”

He laughed lightly

“Well, that’s true. Maybe a workaholic too.”

Draaag.

Winston pushed back his chair and stood up.

“I must be a workaholic now.”

Contrary to her earnest wishes, he prepared the interrogation. After rummaging through the drawers, he took out a long object from a paper box and came back. Realizing that it was a red candle, Grace held her breath.

‘What is he trying to do with that?’

While imagining all sorts of horrible things, Winston sat across from her and raised his lips.

‘Crazy…’

One of her terrible imaginations seemed to be the correct answer. He put the candle in Grace’s vagina. The smooth rod of wax slid through the dense flesh.

“Don’t feel it already.”

Winston twisted it and pressed it against her lower stomach.

“Don’t worry. It’s as thin as yours, so I can’t feel anything.”

He only smiled but did not fall for her provocation.

Winston soon let go of his hand after inserting the candle about one-third the length of her forearm. Even though it didn’t reach the end of her vagina, it was so deep that she couldn’t push it out just by tightening her inner flesh.

“Just looking at you made me want to shove my pistol into your cramped walls and stir it up.”

Grace recalled the terrifying words Winston had said in an ecstatic voice on the day she was discovered. Her body trembled at the thought that one day he might really try to shove a pistol in here.

‘…A candle is better than a pistol.’

However, she was wrong to expect this to be stirred in her. Winston did not forget the purpose of the candle, and the next moment, he took out a lighter and lit the wick. Grace could feel the blood draining from her face seeing that.

Now the candle was long enough that the flame hung outside the chair, but sooner or later, it would burn her secret place.

“Do you have no thoughts? If you burn this place, where are you going to put it in the future?”

“Huh… A loud mouth talking loudly without knowing its place?”

Crazy bastard…

Although she squeezed down with all her might and tried to push the candle out, the walls of her vagina weren’t as flexible as her hands.
As Winston stood up after watching her struggle for a moment, he approached the door and began to open the paper box in front of the phonograph with a leisurely motion.

“How does it feel to have your body trampled by the very same instruments of torture that you have perfectly taken care of?”

Grace didn’t answer. Red candle wax began to drip onto the edge of the chair instead of on the floor.

“Your comrades who passed through here must have hated you. The nippers that I used to pull out their fingernails have been cleaned by their princess, Miss Grace Riddle!”

It was inevitable to work for the enemy when undercover so she didn’t have to feel guilty. In the end, they escaped, thanks to her infiltration anyway.

“Because you’re special, I don’t want to use the things I used on other guys. So, I got a special tool.”

Saying so, he took something out of the box. It was a small machine that looked like a modern hair dryer that Mrs. Winston used.

When the name on the box caught Grace’s vision, she was confused.

Electric massager.

She had seen advertisements in the newspapers claiming that this machine restored lost vitality. However, what was that man trying to do with a massager that women use for beauty and treatment…?

‘I’m sure he’s a man who wants me to wither and die instead of finding vitality.’

Leon gazed at the woman who had completely confused eyes and laughed. It seemed a little cute when a clever woman was so ignorant about sex.

‘Cute…? I’m losing my mind.’

He plugged the cord into an outlet behind. When the switch on the body was turned up, there was a loud motor sound, and the round, convex head like a button hanging from the body started to rotate like a drill.

“One of my classmates at the military academy was a porn collector. He had a bachelor party a few months ago, invited my classmates, and put his collection up for auction.”

Approaching her, he sat down in front of Grace while holding the roaring massager in his hand like a pistol.

“He was caught by his fiancée.”

Leon laughed softly as if he was having fun and finally revealed the purpose of the object.

“Among the things he showed me was this. He used this to massage a woman’s private parts.”

Grace’s eyes widened.

“Ah. Don’t get me wrong. I didn’t buy it. Thinking about it now, it was a good decision because I don’t need porn.”

“Then, can I guess?”

Leon nodded at the woman who was glaring at her accusingly.

“To m—hah!”

“Right. Because you’re here.”

The head of the massager, spinning as fast as the wheels of a sprinting car, touched her sensitive nub. At that moment, Grace’s whole body stiffened like a corpse in post-mortem stiffness. If it continued like this, she might really become a corpse.

From the moment that object touched her body, she couldn’t breathe even once. She couldn’t breathe, so there was no way she could tell him to stop.

“Kuhk, ah, ahkk…”

The power of the small machine was beyond imagination.

If this person’s hand was one, this machine was a hundred. And to Grace, even Winston’s finger was a very scary thing.

‘Gasp, that’s ridiculous.’

In an instant, an overwhelming sense of climax filled her, like an ant facing a tidal wave the size of a house. Her eyes flashed rapidly, and the face of the man observing her with eyes that looked like he was about to pull out his penis and fuck her at any moment faded.

“Hmm, that sure is fast.”

It was only at the threshold of the climax, where her body was about to break apart, that the machine finally left.

“Haa…”

Winston explained the rules for the day as Grace rested her neck on the backrest and caught her breath, already exhausted.

“If you answer my questions honestly, I will use this on you.”

He held up the massager in front of Grace, still spinning furiously.

“You don’t have to answer if you don’t want to. However, if it caught fire there, it would hurt quite a bit.”

“…Are you sure you got it right? Why would I, haa, answer and volunteer to be tortured?”

“You still don’t understand.”

This was the reason Grace should only hope to be attacked with that hideous massager.

When she felt her climax, she tightened her vagina tightly without any gaps for water to leak. At the same time, she did not tighten enough to break Winston’s penis, she even pushed him away. Without that strength, she could push the long object out with all her strength.

In other words, he wanted her to beg him to attack her like that, so she would take out the lighted candle herself.

It wasn’t nonsense because some parts were pushed out a moment ago.

‘Haa… Please someone save me.’

Her eyes went dark. To be captured by this ferocious yet clever enemy also meant that each day a new hell awaited her.

“Did you know that when a woman gets excited, she shoots water just like men do? Why don’t you turn off the light anyway? I don’t know if they can do it alone while tied up.”

The moment he said that, a good idea came to mind. Still, no matter how she was in such a binding situation, how could she do such a thing in front of that man…

It was really a last resort.

The cruel devil just watched Grace and only opened his mouth when the candle that protruded out was only as large as the middle finger.

“I guess we can start now.”

Grace still kept her mouth shut during the interrogation trying to find out the location of the home base. She bet her luck that Winston couldn’t completely destroy the only woman that could satisfy him.

The red wax stains on the iron chair continued to grow bit by bit and began to draw a red path toward her pubic area.

Now, the candle was shorter than the index finger.

The question stopped. The two stared at each other in silence. The air between the two forced each other to give up first became tense.

“Yes, do as you please.”

Winston abruptly rose from his seat.

Bang!
Chapter 58.
The chair kicked by the brown shoes fell backward with a roar. Candle wax dripped from the end of the candle.

“Oh!”

The chair stopped just before she hit her head on the floor. In the dizzy vision, Winston stood with his shoes, grabbing the edge of the chair.

Grace glanced down between her legs, breathing heavily. The candle was still in place, burning a yellow flame. Most of the wax fell onto the chair, but a few drops got stuck in the ropes tied to the lower abdomen.

After confirming that she got no burns, she was relieved though it was a bit premature.

A drop of wax pooled at the tip of the candle overflowed and began to slide down the smooth column. The liquid that was as red as blood and must have been as hot as flames flowed slowly down her vagina.

Terrified, she looked up at him with begging eyes. He just watched with his hands stuck in his trouser pockets with eyes that didn’t care what happened to her.

“Winston, please don’t do this.”

As his once smooth brow wrinkled, Grace hurriedly corrected his title.

“Master, please…”

Rattle. The chair rattled up in an instant. The candle wax, which was about to touch her flesh, fell onto the chair.

“Huk…”

Once again, she burst into tears at her miserable state. Winston cupped Grace’s sadly sobbing cheek and pressed his lips gently to her forehead.

“If you answer honestly, we don’t have to do this. Huh? I don’t want to do this to you either.”

‘Heinous devil. One day you will call me Master and beg me.’

He stood up after staring at her, secretly grinding her teeth.

“Am I asking for too much?”

Then, asking for cooperation even for small things, he dug into a locked drawer and brought out a file folder.

“In January, the Royal Heritage Bank Billford branch was attacked by armed robbers. Thanks to this, the royal family, the actual owner of the bank, suffered losses.”

Three montages unfolded before Grace’s eyes.

“I believe it was the work of the Blanchard Rebels.”

Even though the candle was now shorter than a thumb, she only shook her head at repeated questions.

“Huhk, I really don’t know. Think with common sense. How can I know all these people’s faces? Are you sure they belong to us?”

It was true that she didn’t know all of her comrades, but in fact, all of them looked familiar. As Grace kept pretending to cry while she burst into tears, acting like her mind was unsteady, Winston, who was watching, couldn’t help but feel anxious.

“You can’t tell me that.”

He tried to get her to divulge the methods of financing and laundering, but she gave no clues.

‘Hold on a little longer. If I don’t give anything, he might give up and throw me to the headquarters.’

Grace stopped answering the questions and deliberately whimpered in front of the man who was staring at her with a stern expression while struggling to push the candles. The heat of the flames slowly began to come to her.

‘Cunning rat.’

Leon glared at the woman who was still trying to control him.

It was just laughable when other captives acted like this. When they get bitten once or twice by the Camden vampire and see the gates of hell open in front of them, everyone suddenly regains memories that they at first did not have and confesses the things he didn’t even ask.

At that moment, he suddenly realized.

“I wondered why the rats didn’t open their mouths this year, and it was because you were watching.”

Grace held her breath as he suddenly stood up. She thought he was going to kick the chair, but he turned around and stood behind her.

“You are scarier than me, so you’re never a fool. Who are you trying to fool?”

“Ahk!”

As the head of the massager, turning furiously like a drill, pressed against her clitoris, Grace struggled, forgetting that there was a burning candle between her legs.

“Aaahkk! Stop!”

The woman’s screams tore through his eardrums. The roar of the machine’s motors became a whisper.

Extreme pleasure was no different from extreme pain.

Leon smiled as he looked down at the blue eyes in terror. When he opened the flesh with two fingers, the round nub popped out. He did not hesitate to completely expose this woman’s most sensitive sensory points and mercilessly crush them.

“Ugh…”

Nothing was on it, but it seemed like her throat was being strangled. Her clitoris trembled at a terrifying rate, vibrating all the sensory points in her belly below it. A flash of pleasure struck from between her legs to the top of her head in an instant.

Her vagina rippled wildly, chewing the candles, fighting the heat that seemed to burst her heart.

“Huuhk…”

It was very hot between her legs. It wasn’t just because blood pooled over.

With her head bent behind, Grace’s eyes trembled as much as her thighs. The candle’s flame blazed a mere thumb’s distance from her vagina.

“Please! Stop…!”

No matter how much he begged, Winston just held the machine between Grace’s legs with a nonchalant face.

“Ahk!”

At that moment she was about to use even the most embarrassing last resort. The harsh climax came as if being burned.

Her body, tied to his chair, soared upwards. While she was shocked by the overwhelming pleasure that she couldn’t even feel the pain of her wrists and calves rubbing against the rope, her stomach tightened up so that her stomach felt stiff…

Tap.

The piece of candle fell onto the chair.

“Haa…”

When she slumped on the chair, the massager, which left for a moment, came back.

It was different from just a moment ago when it was only squeezing her clitoris. Following Winston’s hand movements, the head of the massager moved in a circle, stimulating all over the pubic area.

“Huhk…”

Her whole body was trembling as the aftershock had not yet subsided. Even if it wasn’t for it, the explosive climax made her feel like there were cracks here and there, but if another climax hit her like that, she felt like her body would be shattered into pieces.

“Ha-uhk! St, stop!”

It was futile as the man never let go once bitten.

Winston even stuck two of his fingers where the candle had come out. His fingertips, thicker than candles, mercilessly pounced on the flesh that was still twitching.

“Ahk, str, strange…”

A strange sensation welled up under the clitoris each time his fingertips pricked the upper part of her vagina. At first, the sensation that was only tickling quickly became a sense of urgency to spurt something.

Every time he hooked his fingers and pulled at the inner flesh, clear water already splashed between the clitoris and vagina.

Winston whispered in Grace’s ear as she strained her stomach.

“Remember when I said that women spray water just like men do when they get excited? Show me.”

“Hah, no….”

“If you can’t play the role of an informant, you should be playing the role of a prostitute properly. Come on, show me.”

“HAAH!”

The moment the machine that had been rounding on the labia pressed down on the clitoris, the strength below loosened. As thin streams of water gushed out, joy and sorrow crossed the faces of the two.

The candle, which had been rolling dangerously between her legs, was extinguished only when it was hit by water from Grace’s vagina. Winston’s palms were also very wet, dripping with water.

“Great job.”

“Please stop…”

She begged Winston, who kissed her on the forehead, but the hand and machine buried between her legs did not know how to stop.

What really stopped was her plea to stop.

The only sound that came out of the woman’s gaping mouth was the sound of rapid breathing. Grace gasped as badly as her master as she received his fingers. Leon, who gently stirred the hot, damp inner wall with his fingertips, exhaled slowly.

He could feel the inner flesh had reached climax several times.

She always felt like she had sharp thorns on the outside, but on the inside, she was a soft woman.

Her vagina twitched, biting his fingers again and again. The moment it squeezed the intruder tight, Leon remembered the feeling that this place had clamped on his cock like this. His lower body, which had risen like it was going to explode a little while ago, became more stiff.

“Haa… fuck…”

But today, he was not going to give this cunning woman the ending she wanted.

She was glancing up at him with unfocused eyes, her neck bent back. It was an exhausted face, wearing the face of a tortured person for a week after just a few climaxes.

Leon turned off the machine and set it on the table.

The gurgling sound of the water was still loud. His hand, buried in her vagina, continued to pierce the soft flesh.

As if it was a switch, he pushed the swollen bump up and down with his thumb, about to explode from thousands of frictions. Every time that happened, the woman who was strewn like a corpse shook her body like she had received an electric shock.
Chapter 59.
Leon, who straightened her head that was bent helplessly to the side, pushed his tongue between her parted lips. The woman could no longer resist.

There was a difference between a woman who didn’t resist and a woman who couldn’t.

He laughed, squeezing her trembling breasts in one hand and crushing them.

“Huht!”

It was only at the moment when the flesh clinging to his fingers made a loud noise that the woman uttered a voice. He had already removed his hand, but the woman began to sob, occasionally shaking her body convulsively.

“Huuff…”

“You should have known your place.”

‘…Terrible bastard.’

Grace moved her hand and inwardly cursed Winston with everything she knew. As soon as he untied the rope that bound her, he put some chocolate in her mouth, telling her not to burn out. She wondered why he was kind when he was that ruthless devil…

“The maids will bring the meal soon. Clean it up before then.”

It was for Grace to clean up the messy chairs and floor.

To clean up the traces of the insult to her, naked in front of him. Leon Winston was a demon who had mastered the art of killing people without touching them.

‘I won’t die… because you have to die at my hands.’

The man she wanted to kill was sitting at the table, leisurely smoking a cigar.

At the edge of her vision, as she was wiping the chair covered in love liquid, was the tips of his brown shoes. Grace could feel his gaze looking down at her. She had her head down, so it was impossible to tell what kind of eye he was looking at her.

She didn’t really want to know.

Was the interrogation not over yet? A man who used to come at two o’clock during the day and leave before four o’clock stayed in the torture chamber until past five o’clock today. Moreover, today he did not turn into a beast in the middle of the interrogation.

‘Why is he like that?’

She was disturbed by the unexpected behavior.

“Ha…”

Now, only that man and her would know that something nasty had happened in this chair.

As she tried to put away the clean chair, Grace closed her eyes. There was a small puddle of water on the black floor.

“Ack!”

As she crouched down to scrub the floor, her legs faltered, and she fell. It was the moment when she hurriedly touched the floor, the slippery shoes stopped and came this way.

At the sound of the buckle unfastening, Grace laid face down and bit her lip.

“Ahk!”

A gentleman in a stylish suit began to take the woman lying on the floor like a dog.

What kind of gentleman he was. He was a brute… yes, that was right.

The more this man endured, the harder it was for Grace, not himself. As if he was more excited than ever, the feeling of the volume filling her stomach was enormous. His fingers had already poked her inside for a while, still it was hard to accept him even with the softened vagina.

The maids would come soon.

Even though she wanted to listen to the footsteps outside the door, she couldn’t as on the gramophone, the saxophone melody was still repeating itself tirelessly.

A thick forearm embraced Grace, who anxiously watched the door swaying along with her body. The shirt sleeves crumpled with a rustling sound. Unable to overcome the weight, he whispered in his ear at the same time as her chest, which had been shaking in a circle below, was crushed.

“Why do I need porn when I have you?”

Grace gritted her teeth. She accepted the thrusting of the bastard wearing a gentleman’s mask and repeated to herself.

A living prostitute was better.

There was only one thing better in the torture chamber than the maid’s room… that hot water always came out.

“You bastard, huhk, I will kill you.”

Grace let out a cry and swearing among the loud sound of water. It was time to wash away the sadness and anger she had endured.

She wanted to stand forever in the dripping water and misty mist, but she couldn’t. As she turned off the faucet, she could clearly hear a rattling sound from outside the bathroom. There was also a faint smell of food.

As she pulled her hair and squeezed it dry, then a thick, soft cloth wrapped around her back.

While Grace blinked at the unexpected action, Winston wrapped a towel around her without saying a word and went back to his place.

The place he was was the wall at the entrance to the bathroom since the bathroom had no door. Winston stood against the wall as if to keep no one from coming this way the whole time she was showering.

However, if she looked at his hungry eyes, he may have been watching her in a bad way rather than protecting her.

Hungry.

She was stunned. Wasn’t he the man who, until ten minutes ago, had pinned her to the floor and let go of his desires?

“Captain, today’s appetizer is oysters sprinkled with lemon juice, and the meal is topped with thinly sliced truffles…”

A young maid’s voice came from beyond the bathroom entrance.

It was a voice she knew. There was tension in the maid’s voice, perhaps it was more excitement than fear. Grace soon stepped out of the shower and began wiping herself with a towel. As soon as his soggy eyes clung to her dry body, she wanted to wash again.

Meanwhile, the maid admired such a colorful glow saying that his stoic side rather made her body hear out.

‘Ascetic…?’

She was so shocked that she let out a snort of laughter.

“…I hope you like it. And, the wine to accompany the meal..”

As if wanting to peek at the person locked in the torture chamber, the clear voice drew closer. How would the maids react when they find out that Sally Bristol, whom they used to share the gossip of the Winstons, was imprisoned here?

‘Hello, I’m actually Grace Riddle. Headquarters, the Grand Duchy, anywhere is fine. Please go out and spread the word that a woman with the last name Riddle is being held in a torture chamber.’

The feeling grew stronger that Winston had not reported her arrest to his superiors. Speculating, she asked about his superior’s reaction and the benefits he would gain in the army from this matter, but Winston avoided the subject.

The soldiers were his subordinates, so they would never spread rumors outside the private room.

However, the chatty maids might.

‘I have no intention of dying locked up here.’

As Grace took a step towards the entrance. Winston gave a chin to the invisible maid to back off. Soon after, she received the same warning.

Grace, who had neither the courage nor the energy to agitate him further today, quietly dried his hair.

“Captain, dinner is ready. Do you need anything else?”

Winston’s answer went unheard. Perhaps responding with a nod of the head or a gesture of the hand, it wasn’t long before she heard the door slam shut.

Only then could she get out of the bathroom. Winston sat down at the table while Grace wrapped herself in a towel and went to bed. She took out clothes from the bag next to the bed when she heard a clicking sound behind her back.

“I brought in a closet, but why don’t you use it?”

Well, because she didn’t want to stay here long.

Without saying a word, she got dressed and sat across from Winston. He had his sleeves rolled up neatly, and he had put on his tie again. Grace smirked as she glanced down at the iron table covered with luxurious white tablecloths.

How long had it been since he laid on top of her here and eat her?

‘He has good stomach, too’

Perhaps, for dessert, he would lay her down here again and eat her.

She had already lost his appetite. As she glanced over the plates lined up on the long table with dark eyes, the vase placed between Winston and her caught her eye.

‘Lilac…?’

A light purple lilac in full bloom was set in a small crystal vase.
Soldiers had never brought decorations to the meal, and the Winstons’ servants did not put lilacs on the table. As she wondered, Grace raised her gaze and looked at the man sitting across from her.

The light blue eyes, reflecting faint curiosity, were staring at him tenaciously.

‘That man’s doing it.’

It didn’t feel romantic or friendly. Rather, it just felt like a mockery.

‘Look at this. The lilacs were already blooming. Oh, you didn’t know?’

Did he think she would be willing to play with his ridicule?

“Fancy suit, fine cuisine, expensive wine, and even pretty flowers. Captain, is this a date?”

When Grace asked with a smile, the corners of his eyes curled, and the man sitting across from her snorted.

“You have a wild dream.”

“Phew…”

She stroked her chest in a showoff.

“That’s fortunate because I really didn’t like my date.”

Winston twisted his lips in amazement. Grace smiled and opened the silver lid that covered the plate in front of her.

“I hope the picky princess likes the meals.”

Winston sarcastically said she was the last princess of the rebel royal family, but Grace didn’t respond and just stared at the middle of the plate.

Expensive oysters.

Now, it was Grace who was astounded.

Winston told her to order anything she wanted, but she had never ordered a meal. However, how did he give the instructions? It wasn’t the soup for the torture chamber’s guests, nor the meal for the employees, nor the meal for the sergeant in charge of the annex though the Winston family’s meal.

Even when he wasn’t eating with her, it was always that.
Chapter 60.
“Eat everything.”

He ordered, pouring wine into Grace’s glass. Grace glanced sideways at the plates lined up beside her with blank eyes.

She wanted to live, so she was not in a position to refuse her food. Besides, when she had the worry about them giving her rotten food, she didn’t have to refuse this hospitality beyond her expectations. However, the problem was…

“Don’t think you can get anything out of a hunger strike.”

Grace’s cutback on food these days was misunderstood by Winston as preparing for a hunger strike.

‘It’s fortunate that he doesn’t seem to know the real reason.’

She was losing her weight anyway, thanks to that beast harassing her so hard, so maybe it was okay to eat a good meal.

Grace took a sip of the refreshing wine and picked up the oyster.

‘Anyway, it’s creepy that he was keeping an eye on the amount of food I ate.’

The man’s hungry eyes remained the same throughout the meal. It was not an appetite, as he spent more time looking at her than chewing something in his mouth.

“Anyway, why isn’t your fiancé looking for you?”

Halfway through the main dish, he suddenly mentioned Jimmy to his mouth. It was an out-of-the-box subject to Grace but not to Leon. He was on the alert that Little Jimmy might try to save her. Nonetheless, he saw no signs.

No signs of them planting new people, no signs of raids, no surveillance, nothing.

It was embarrassing.

‘Did he give up?’

The woman in front of him looked pitiful.

“I don’t know what you like about that kind of irresponsible man, he even promised to marry you. Miss Riddle, you look pathetic.”

Grace, believing that it wasn’t that Jimmy wouldn’t rescue her, just that he couldn’t, was unfazed.

The first step in the rescue was for her to get out of the annex. Grace knew very well that attacking Winston was not easy in reality and that it would do more harm than good, so she wasn’t upset at all.

“He was a very exemplary pimp, dedicating his woman to the military. Miss Riddle, being engaged to a pimp is turning you into a prostitute.”

‘Hurry up and eat or go.’

As she thought so, Grace moved her fork, pretending not to hear Winston continue to speak ill of Jimmy.

“So, tell me what the prostitute school is like.”

The woman who kept ignoring his words cast a sharp gaze.

“Ah, I already know you couldn’t go there. I mean, your friends would have gone.”

“Why do you keep talking nonsense like that?”

Nonsense… Yes, it could be nonsense.

Leon leaned loosely on the back of his chair and smiled.

“Yes, the school must be an exaggerated rumor. However, it is true that they use honey traps to seduce officers and steal information.”

When he told the woman, who denied that that was nonsense, about the recently captured mistress of the Western Commander, she got an astonishing reply.

“You must have mistaken her for a mistress just because they ate a few meals. Men are ahead of themselves more than you think.”

Leon was speechless for a moment. Those words sounded like she was saying that with sincerity, rather than protecting her allies.

“Are you Grace Riddle?”

Grace tilted her head at the sudden question.

“Are you from the Riddle family? Why do you know nothing about leadership? You don’t even know what I know.”

“Isn’t it normal to think that I might not know, that you are the one who’s mistaken?”



“I don’t use honey traps. Do you think I don’t know that the dirty monarch pigs would get into heat and attack a female comrade without permission and then accuse them like that?”

‘Isn’t the evidence right in front of you?’

“Like you.”

Winston smiled cheerfully and pulled a cigar case from his jacket hanging from the chair.

“No. It is a proven fact that the Blanchard rebels plant mistresses among officers in key positions in the military.”

The tip of a lit cigar pointed at Grace.

“Like you.”

“I am not your mistress.”

Winston laughed out loud. There was plenty of ridicule.

“Yes, I guess.”

He took a cigar and puffed out white smoke.

“You said you were ordered by your fiancé to seduce me.”

damn Jimmy. damn executives. Thanks to this, the truth that Blanchard’s Revolutionary Army did not use honey traps was refuted.

“That was unprecedented. That’s why I couldn’t believe my ears.”

When did they fall like this? Grace hoped that the executives who had learned from this failure would never issue such an order to anyone again.

“I guess you’re that important. I consider it an honor.”

The sarcastic woman calmly continued her meal. Leon stared at the woman with serious eyes, forgetting about his portion of dinner that was getting cold.

Brainwashing? It could be.

However, it also seemed like she really didn’t know. Did it make sense that the leader’s family didn’t know this? Her mother was notorious for being a honey trap.

Could it be that she hid it?

Why?

In the meanwhile, the surrounding was quiet. Because of that, Grace slightly raised her gaze as she cut the fish to see Winston resting his chin, deep in thought.

It was the moment when she lowered her gaze again because she felt uncomfortable with the eyes staring at her…

“…This is nonsense.”

Unsure of what was going on, Grace returned his gaze to Winston.

“Do you want to believe that? That you guys are clean?”

“I don’t want to believe it, but we are really clean. We are all willing to sacrifice. It’s not something the dirty monarchy pigs, united by selfish greed, will understand.”

“Yes, selfish greed. Not wrong.”

That woman may have wanted to insult him, but what he already admitted was no insult at all.

“The royal family is corrupt, but at least I know I am corrupt. You rebel rats who are corrupt but believe in integrity are dirtier.”

At least he knew he was the dirty squire’s pawn though that person mistook herself for an apostle of justice. As expected, the woman gripped her knife tightly, and she glared at him with eyes that wanted to stab him at any moment.

“I am telling you this because I care for you very much. My first love was brainwashed and raised by a group of crazy fanatics. That is heartbreaking.”

First love?

He dared speak of first love when he was trying to kill her slowly and painfully? Grace wondered why they were eating together, perhaps this was also an interrogation.

No, it was torture.

The utensils she held in her hands were gathered neatly on one side of the plate. Expressing that she would not eat anymore. Then, she stood up.

“Are you one to stand up first during the meal without asking for permission?”

How very polite to preach a sermon at mealtime.

Grace responded inside and then turned her back. She wanted to get out of the place but she could not.

As she made her way to bed, thinking of putting on a blanket, like an ostrich burying only its head in the sand to hide from enemies, Winston raised his voice more ferociously than a moment ago.

“I have told you to eat everything.”

“I tried, but I have no appetite, Captain.”

She suffered all afternoon. Grace was too tired to suffer again.

Unlike when arguing over the honey trap, she lowered her tail while having eyes that seemed genuinely angry. But still stubborn, she thought he might drag her off and tie him to the chair though Winston reacted unexpectedly.

“Sally.”

Grace paused.

‘Why is he calling me by that name?’

What was his intention?

She glanced back impatiently. Contrary to the expectation that he would mock her, Winston had a serious face. To her surprise, it was close to the face of a requester, even the tone of voice.

“If you don’t have an appetite, at least eat dessert.”

She was going to ask what kind of dessert it was and tried to eat it…

‘…It’s Madame Benoa’s cake.’

The moment Winston opened the lid of the plate, her head raced. She guessed why he called her Sally. To him, the person who liked Madame Benoa’s cake must have been Sally, not Daisy or Grace.

Perhaps, that was why he prepared it on purpose?

It was a really crazy guess.

She was the spy and the enemy’s daughter. Why would he do such a thing to a woman whom he only wants to kill painfully? The night she had the dirty ‘deal’ with him, she briefly thought that the guy might be liking her. Still, judging from what she has been through, that was a complete illusion.

There was probably a party at the mansion, and the maids served the cake that came into the kitchen as a dessert without much thought.

‘Then, maybe he didn’t tell me to get to know what dessert it is and eat it.’

Leon moved his portion of the cake to the plate of the woman who was completely deluded.

*

Continue in Part 2!!
